An analysis of perioperative cholangiography in one thousand laparoscopic cholecystectomies.We undertook this retrospective study to ascertain the proper role of perioperative cholangiography in the management of 1002 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy for symptomatic cholelithiasis.Nine hundred forty-one patients were categorized as being at high or low risk for choledocholithiasis according to the presence or absence of jaundice, pancreatitis, elevated bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase, or radiographic evidence of common bile duct stones (CBDSs).Intraoperative cholangiography (IOCG) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were equivalent in the detection of CBDSs, and laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (CBDE) was successful in 12 of the 21 patients (57%) in whom it was attempted. The ducts of the other 52 patients with CBDSs were successfully cleared by preoperative or postoperative ERCP.Laparoscopic IOCG is successful in detecting CBDS in high-risk patients and half of these ducts can be cleared laparoscopically. The incidence of CBDS in low-risk patients is 1.7%, a risk that does not warrant routine cholangiography. These data suggest ERCP should be reserved for those at-risk individuals in whom IOCG or laparoscopic duct clearance has been unsuccessful.Operative cholangiography: 1,000 cases.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and gray-scale abdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of jaundice.Fifty-five patients with suspected obstructive jaundice were studied with both ERCP and abdominal ultrasound. Biliary tract obstruction was documented in 49 patients and parenchymal liver disease in 7. A definite cause of jaundice was demonstrated by ERCP in 45 of 49 patients with biliary tract obstruction but in only 28 of 49 patients by ultrasound. Bile duct dilatation, where present, was detected by ERCP in only 33 of 42 patients. ERCP was particularly effective in patients with common duct stones; common duct calculi and a dilated common duct were detected in 15 of 16 such patients. Dilated bile ducts where present were detected by ultrasound in 22 of 42 patients. Ultrasound was particularly helpful in patients with pancreatic cancer in whom a dilated common duct could not be opacified during ERCP. ERCP and abdominal ultrasound together provide a rapid and safe method of diagnosis in the jaundiced patient with suspected bile duct obstruction.Utility of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the evaluation of idiopathic abdominal pain.We investigated the role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in 86 consecutive patients with idiopathic chronic or recurrent abdominal pain. There were 18 males and 68 females with a mean age of 48 yr. Forty patients (47%) had previous cholecystectomy. Patients were divided into two groups: group I (normal serum alkaline phosphatase and total bilirubin) (n = 52), and group II (elevated serum alkaline phosphatase and/or total bilirubin) (n = 34). Pancreatograms were normal in all patients, including five with pancreas divisum. Cholangiograms were abnormal in 10 of the 34 patients in group II (30%), and in only three of the 52 patients in group I (6%) (p = 0.003). Bile duct stones were present in 18% of the patients in group II, and in none of the patients in group I (p = 0.003). Of the 40 post-cholecystectomy patients, four patients had bile duct stones and five had common bile duct dilation without stones. However, no stones were found in any post-cholecystectomy patients with normal liver tests. Of the 46 patients with gallbladder in situ, two patients with abnormal liver tests had common bile duct stones and two patients had common bile duct dilation without stones. These results indicate that, among patients with idiopathic abdominal pain, cholangiography should be performed primarily in those with abnormal liver tests; however, further investigation with pancreatography is unnecessary.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) has become established as the gold standard in imaging of the biliary tree. Recently, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) has been introduced as a new, non-invasive imaging modality for the detection of bile-duct stones and other pathology related to the biliary tract and pancreas. The aim of this study was to determine how MRCP compared with ERCP in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.A prospective study of 133 patients referred for either ERCP or MRCP was carried out to compare the results of both these methods in determining the presence of choledocholithiasis.18 patients were excluded from the analysis: ERCP was unsuccessful in eight of these patients and MRCP was not possible in the remaining 10 patients. There were six false negative results with MRCP; in five of these the calculi were less than 5 mm in diameter. MRCP showed a sensitivity of 84%, specificity of 96%, positive predictive value of 91%, negative predictive value of 93% and diagnostic accuracy of 92% when compared to ERCP as the gold standard.MRCP has high sensitivity and high specificity for stones greater than 5 mm in diameter and should be performed in preference to ERCP as the first-line investigation in patients with gallstones and abnormal liver function tests in the elective setting. Adoption of this guideline at our institution would result in a 9% reduction in the number of ERCPs performed.[Diagnostic value of routine cholangiography during surgical treatment of the biliary ducts].Diagnostic and therapeutic value of ERCP and prediction of outcome: a retrospective analysis.The objective is to analyze the experience of using diagnostic and therapeutic ERCP and to attempt identifying the independent factors that predict positive and useful procedures. The medical records of 198 patients seen during the period 1991-1993 were retrospectively reviewed. There were 102 males and 96 females with a mean age of 45.2 SD + 16.7 years. The main indications for performing the procedure were jaundice, abdominal pain, nausea and/or fever. Laboratory tests showed elevated direct bilirubin in 50% of patients, deranged liver enzymes in 43%, and ESR was raised in 51% and fever was documented in 52% of patients. The cannulation of both ducts was successful in 93% of all procedures. The commonest finding was gallbladder and common bile duct stones (CBD). In 54 patients out of 64 with CBD stones, stones were removed endoscopically. Stepwise regressive analyzis has identified age above 40 years, presence of jaundice (total bilirubin > 2.5 mg/ml) and raised ESR (> 25 mm in the 1st hour) as significant factors that independently predict a positive ERCP that revealed findings previously unknown (useful procedure). Diagnostic and therapeutic ERCP is an integral part in management of biliary and pancreatic ducts disorders. The validity of clinical prediction role should be tested prospectively.Evaluation of operative cholangiography in 2043 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a case for the selective operative cholangiogram.There is still some controversy over whether to use laparoscopic operative cholangiograms routinely (RLOC) or selectively (SLOC). Due to their high cost as well as other issues, in March 1997 we converted from RLOC to SLOC. The purpose of this study was to validate that decision.The results of 2043 laparoscopic cholecystectomies (LC) were compiled and analyzed. The results of RLOC in 1556 patients undergoing LC from March 1990 through February 1997 were compared to the results of SLOC in 16 patients undergoing LC from March 1989 through February 1990 and 471 patients undergoing LC from March 1997 through December 1998. The literature was reviewed and data were compiled. Reasons that are typically given for operative cholangiograms (OC) were collected and scrutinized. Finally, cost surveys for RLOC and related procedures were obtained.Overall, laparoscopic operative cholangiogram (LOC) was attempted in 1661 patients and was successful in 1656 cases (99.7%). Bile duct stones (BDS) were evident in 166 patients. Laparoscopic bile duct exploration (LBDE) was attempted in all cases. None were referred for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). In the RLOC group, evidence of BDS was observed in 136 patients (9%). Forty-two were unsuspected (2.8%) and five were false positive (0.3%). In a collection of other RLOC studies, the average rate of unsuspected BDS was 2.9%, while the average rate of false positive cholangiograms was 1.6%. In the SLOC group, LOC was indicated in 139 of 487 patients (28.6%). None of the patients who did not have a LOC developed symptomatic residual BDS in < or = 11 years of follow-up. In a large collection of other SLOC studies, the rate of symptomatic residual BDS was 0.3%. A cost survey in February 1997 revealed that the average minimum global charge (MGC) for an OC was $1283.21; for a transcystic duct LBDE it was $1055.10, and for a transcholedochal LBDE it was $3263.61 [corrected]. The MGC for an ERCP with papillotomy was $4303.00. Thus, to avoid one patient with symptomatic residual BDS, 354 unnecessary procedures (333 RLOC, 18 LBDE, and three postoperative ERCP) costing $473,927.52 would be performed. There were no false negatives, bile duct injuries, or other complications attributable to RLOC or SLOC.The increased morbidity and cost of RLOC to avoid symptomatic residual BDS is not justified. All other reasons given for RLOC are either flawed or indicate that the procedure can be safely employed selectively. SLOC is an effective method of verifying suspected BDS and is safer and less expensive than RLOC.[Peroperative investigation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Laparoscopic ultrasonography versus cholangiography. A prospective study of 150 cases].From November 1994 to March 1996, 150 patients treated by laparoscopic cholecystectomy were included in a prospective study, in order to compare intraoperative cholangiography and laparoscopic ultrasound. The biliary tree was successively explored by the two methods in the systematic detection of common bile duct stones. The feasibility of laparoscopic ultrasound was 100 per cent. Cholangiography was performed in only 125 cases (83 per cent). The duration of the laparoscopic ultrasound exam was significantly shorter (11.6 vs 17.6 minutes, p = 0.0001). In this study, common bile duct stones were found in 14 cases (9 per cent). The detection rates with laparoscopic ultrasound and intraoperative cholangiography were similar. For laparoscopic ultrasound, sensitivity was 80 per cent and specificity was 99 per cent, versus 78 per cent and 97 per cent for cholangiography, respectively. The combination of the 2 examinations had a 100 per cent sensitivity and specificity. Laparoscopic ultrasound failed to recognize the intrapancreatic part of the bile duct (25 cases: 17 per cent), did not show anatomical abnormalities detected by cholangiography, but detected unsuspected digestive lesions. Laparoscopic ultrasound is safe repeatable, and non invasive, but a learning curve is necessary to increase this efficacy. Comparison of cost must be evaluated.[Use of endoscopic retrograde pancreatocholangiography in diagnosing and treating choledocholithiasis].Selective operative cholangiography. Appropriate management for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To evaluate the results of selective intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Retrospective study.Mayo Clinic, Rochester, Minn, from 1990 to 1991.Five hundred forty-two patients underwent attempted laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Excluding 28 (5.2%) who underwent conversion to laparotomy and 19 (3.5%) who did not respond to a follow-up questionnaire, there were 495 respondents (mean follow-up, 25 months).Incidence and management of choledocholithiasis, extrahepatic bile duct injuries, and other findings potentially affected by IOC.Twenty patients underwent preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for suspected common bile duct abnormalities, and 10 had common bile duct stones removed. Nearly a third (n = 161 [32.5%]) of the patients underwent IOC for laboratory, historical, or operative findings or for training purposes. Common bile duct stones were discovered on IOC in five patients (3.1%), three of whom were treated successfully with postoperative endoscopic therapy; the two others had normal findings on endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (false-positive results of IOC). In three other patients in whom IOC was unsuccessful or incomplete, symptomatic common bile duct stones developed. Two patients were treated with endoscopic techniques, and one required open common bile duct exploration. Among the 334 patients who did not undergo IOC, symptoms suggestive of retained stones developed in eight (2.4%) (all within 2 months of surgery; mean, 18 days), but stones were found at endoscopy retrograde cholangiopancreatography in only four patients. Two had preoperative criteria for performing IOC. In only three patients (0.6%) from the study population would symptomatic retained common bile duct stones have developed with selective IOC and routinely successful IOC. No common bile duct injuries occurred.Selective IOC during laparoscopic cholecystectomy is a safe practice when the ductal anatomy is clearly defined and there is no laboratory or clinical evidence of common bile duct abnormalities. Symptomatic retained common bile duct stones will be infrequent, and bile duct injuries will be rare when IOC is performed for the appropriate indications. These data do not support the need for routine IOC, although this procedure is an essential tool for the laparoscopic surgeon.Operative cholangiography.Retrospective analysis of 174 operative cholangiograms done over a 3-year period confirms its substantial benefit when used selectively in patients with clinical criteria for common bile duct exploration. A low incidental ductal stone rate of 1.6%, together with a 3.3% false positive cholangiogram rate and a case of bile duct injury resulting from the procedure makes its routine application appear superfluous.Prevalence of common bile duct stones according to the increasing number of risk factors present. A prospective study employing routinely intraoperative cholangiography in 477 cases.To determine if the use of Intraoperative choliangiography (IOC) should be routinely performed and, if not, which criteria should be used to select patients requiring IOC during open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy.495 Patients with 1 or more gallstones were included in a two-year study. Twelve clinical, laboratory, ultrasonographic and intraoperative factors were chosen and evaluated in all cases. Prior to cholecystectomy, IOC was performed after having identified the common bile duct (CBD) and cystic duct. The majority of the patients were operated on by the same surgeon to avoid differences in criteria and techniques. Statistical evaluation made use of the exact Fisher test and chi square test and, a p-value less than 0.05 was considered as significant.IOC could be performed in 479 out of the 495 cases. IOC resulted in a normal CBD in 76.0%, had a false positive in 2.7%, a false negative in 0.48%, and a presence of 1 or more stones in the CBD in 20.9%. The study revealed that when none of the 12 risk factors were present, there were no cases with CBD stones. As the number of risk factors increased, so did the number of cases presenting with CBD stones.Not all 12 risk factors show the same index of predictability; only 5 in particular (jaundice, ultrasound diameter CBD 7 mm, bilirubin over 26 umol/it, cystic duct > 4 mm and CBI, diameter over 9 mm) showed a high rate of predictability. However, when careful measurement and evaluation of risk factors for CBD stones are undertaken, it is possible to avoid the routine use of IOC.The clinical impact and cost implication of endoscopic ultrasound on use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in a Canadian university hospital.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is a safe alternative to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) for diagnostic biliary imaging in choledocholithiasis. Evidence linking a decline in diagnostic ERCP with the introduction of EUS in clinical practice is limited.To assess the clinical impact and cost implications of a new EUS program on diagnostic ERCP at a tertiary referral centre.A retrospective review was performed of data collected during the first year of EUS at the University of Alberta Hospital (Edmonton, Alberta). Patients were referred for ERCP because of suspicion of choledocholithiasis based on clinical, biochemical and/or radiological parameters. If they were assessed to have an intermediate probability of choledocholithiasis, EUS was performed first. ERCP was performed if EUS suggested choledocholithiasis, whereas patients were clinically followed for six months if their EUS was normal. Cost data were assessed from a third-party payer perspective, and cost savings were expressed in terms of ERCP procedures avoided.Over 12 months, 90 patients (63 female, mean age 58 years) underwent EUS for suspected biliary tract abnormalities. EUS suggested choledocholithiasis in 20 patients (22%), and this was confirmed by ERCP in 17 of the 20 patients. EUS was normal in 69 patients, and none underwent a subsequent ERCP during a six-month follow-up period. One patient had pancreatic cancer and did not undergo ERCP. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS for choledocholithiasis were 100% and 96%, respectively. A total of 440 ERCP procedures were performed over the same 12-month period, suggesting that EUS resulted in a 14% reduction in ERCP procedures (70 of 510). There were no complications of EUS. The cost of 90 EUS procedures was $42,840, compared with $108,854 for 70 ERCP procedures. The cost savings for the first year were $66,014.EUS appears to be accurate, safe and cost effective in diagnostic biliary imaging for suspected choledocholithiasis. The impact of EUS is the avoidance of ERCP in selected cases, thereby preventing the risk of complications. Diagnostic ERCP should not be performed in centres and regions with physicians trained in EUS.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the elderly: a single unit audit.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) has an established role in the management of pancreato-biliary disease, but its role in elderly patients has not been evaluated. A prospective study was carried out in 50 elderly patients, aged between 65 and 94 years, to compare the sensitivity and specificity of ERCP in this age group with ultrasound and liver blood tests, and to examine its safety and therapeutic effectiveness. ERCP was successful in 46 of 50 (92%) procedures. Thirty-four patients had abnormal findings, and 18 sphincterotomies were performed. No complications were recorded. There was a poor correlation between ultrasound and ERCP with agreement in only 45% of cases; sensitivity 35% and specificity 75%. Liver blood tests, alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyl transferase were elevated in all 30 cases with obstructed ducts on ERCP. Ultrasound revealed obstruction in only 10 (33%) of these. Thus, liver biochemistry proved a more reliable indicator of biliary obstruction than ultrasound. In 22 cases endoscopic stone clearance or demonstration of inoperable lesions obviated surgery while in 9 cases surgery was indicated, because of multiple large stones not cleared at ERCP, or for bypass of a malignant stricture. ERCP is therefore safe and effective with a high diagnostic and therapeutic yield even in the poor risk elderly.Prospective evaluation of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in patients with biliary disease: comparative study with conventional ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography diagnostic algorithm.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is an accurate technique that can replace invasive diagnostic methods of the biliary and pancreatic duct.Our aim was to assess sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasonography using the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography as reference, and to establish a diagnostic algorithm under which circumstances magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography can replace endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Eighty-three patients with suspicion of biliary disease based on clinical, biochemical and ultrasonography findings were studied.Ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were performed, comparing the results of the techniques for the determination of their sensitivity and specificity.Sensitivity and specificity results obtained by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography were: 100 and 92.8% when dilated ducts were detected (n=61); 97.4 and 97.2% in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis (n=38); 100 and 96.7% in malignant lesions (n=14) and 81.8 and 98.4% when biliary ducts were normal. The percentage of images of diagnostic quality was 97.6%. Sensitivity and specificity achieved by ultrasonography was: 100 and 57.1% in detection of dilatation, 71 and 97.2% in choledocholithiasis, 92.8 and 96.7% in malignancy and 66.6 and 96.8% in normal ducts.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is a technique with high sensitivity and specificity in the evaluation of biliary ducts. Thus, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography may replace diagnostic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for purely diagnostic purposes, following an initial clinical and ultrasonographic exam.Preoperative selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and laparoscopic cholecystectomy without cholangiography.The aim of this study was to show that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography. We performed a retrospective analysis of 1750 consecutive patients (1170 females and 580 males with a mean age of 51 years) who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy between January 1991 and January 2000. In all, 193 patients (11%) were selected to undergo preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) on the basis of several criteria for risk of stones. No patients underwent intraoperative cholangiography. ERCP allowed us to make a diagnosis of biliary stones in 62.7% (121 cases). Extraction of the stones was successful in 96% of the cases. In 12% of cases ERCP findings were normal; in the remaining 26.3%, useful diagnostic information was obtained. There were three complications (bleeding and pancreatitis) after endoscopy (complication rate: 1.5%). Laparoscopic cholecystectomy was successful in 92.7% of patients, with a postoperative morbidity rate of 3% (0.5% of major complications). There were no deaths in this series. During a mean follow-up of 60 months (range, 12-120), 7 patients (0.43%) were found to have residual biliary stones (5 had not had preoperative ERCP). The study confirms the hypothesis that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be safely performed without routine intraoperative cholangiography, with selective use of preoperative ERCP.The operative cholangiogram: its interpretation, accuracy and value in association with cholecystectomy.The value and errors of one method of operative cholangiography were assessed prospectively with the aim of reducing further the incidence of unnecessary explorations of the common bile duct and the occurrence of residual stones. Operative cholangiograms were obtained using a cystic duct cannula in 174 cases, the technical failure rate being 2%. All cases were followed up using intravenous cholangiography where necessary. Of 129 judged normal by the operator, 2 were found to have common bile duct stones-false negative rate 1%. Of 45 judged abnormal by the operator, 10 had negative explorations- false positive rate 6%. Anomalies were discovered in 12% of patients. It is concluded that meticulous technique and accurate interpretation are essential for the best results. The high incidence of anatomical variations present is of interest and this alone emphasises the necessity of carrying out the investigation and the need of experienced interpretation.[Diagnosis and therapy of biliary calculi. Combined use of ERCP, PTC and endoscopic papillotomy].MR cholangiopancreaticography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography in patients with suspected common bile duct stones.To prospectively compare MR cholangiopancreaticography (MRCP) vs. endoscopic retrograde pancreaticography (ERCP) in patients with suspected common bile duct (CBD) stone disease.Fifty consecutive patients with suspected CBD disease underwent MRCP and then ERCP within 12 h of each other. The result of the MRCP was blinded to the reader of the ERCP. The MRCP was done using a superconducting 1.0 T unit with a heavily T2-weighted breath-hold technique. The ERCP was done in the fluoroscopy suite by one of the clinicians and was evaluated by one of the radiologists who had not read the MRCP examinations.There were 28 true-positives, 17 true-negatives, 1 false-positive, and 4 false-negatives. The sensitivity was 87.5% and the specificity 94.4%, respectively. The positive predictive value was 96.6% and the negative predictive value was 81.1%.MRCP was shown to be good enough to replace ERCP as a diagnostic method in patients with suspected CBD disease. MRCP is now our modality of choice after ultrasound in the diagnostic evaluation of these patients.Diagnosing extrahepatic bile duct stones using intraductal ultrasonography: a case series.Intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS), a new ultrasonographic diagnostic procedure, was used to assess the presence of extrahepatic bile duct stones.The IDUS apparatus consisted of a 6-French high-frequency (20 MHz) probe. Prior to clinical application, in-vitro studies were conducted in a water tank. Clinically, IDUS was successful in 31 patients after endoscopic retrograde cholangiography. Interpretations of IDUS images were evaluated in comparison with cholangiographic and fluoroscopic findings.Experimental testing demonstrated that stones or fragments were typically visualized as strong, high-echo images with acoustic shadowing; air bubbles were seen as fan-shaped high-echo areas or comet-shaped high-echo areas; and sludge was visualized as soft, easily changing, high-echo structures. Extrahepatic bile duct stones were visualized by IDUS in 30 of 31 patients (96.8%), while fluoroscopy and cholangiography identified 19 (61.3%) and 25 (80.6%), respectively. Accurate differentiation between stones and air bubbles was also possible.IDUS could be a useful modality in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones.Laparoscopic cholangiography. Results and indications.One hundred sixty-five operative cholangiograms were attempted in 364 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (45%). Laparoscopic cholangiography was successful in 150 of 165 attempts (91%). Eighty-nine per cent of studies were normal (134/150) and 11% were abnormal (16/150). All 134 patients with normal cholangiograms remained asymptomatic (false-negative rate, 0%). False-positive studies occurred in 3 of 150 (2%) total cholangiograms and 3 of 12 (25%) abnormal cholangiograms consistent with choledocholithiasis. A total of 16 of 364 patients had proven common bile duct stones (4.4%). Eight of the sixteen stones were removed by preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography/sphincterotomy. Five of sixteen stones were found at cholangiography, four of which were unsuspected (4/150, 2.6%). Retained common duct stones were found in 3 of 214 patients not undergoing cholangiography (1.4%). No complications or deaths occurred that were due to cholangiography. One biliary injury occurred (1/364, 0.3%), in a patient with aberrant anatomy who did not undergo cholangiography. Laparoscopic cholangiography is a safe technique with a success rate greater than 90%. Routine cholangiography is presently recommended for prevention of biliary injury, detection of stones in the cystic and common ducts, and for training purposes, especially during the learning phase of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the urgent diagnosis of common bile duct stones in acute pancreatitis.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria in predicting common bile duct (CBD) stones was analyzed in 76 patients with acute pancreatitis undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) during the same hospital admission. Forty patients had ERCP within 72 hours; cholangiography was successful in 92%. Fifty patients had biliary pancreatitis; 25 patients had CBD stones and all were successfully removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES). Twenty-six patients had nonbiliary pancreatitis. Two patients had complications from ERCP and/or ES; two patients died (no CBD stones) but ERCP was noncontributory. Significant differences were found between the biliary and nonbiliary disease groups with respect to age, and bilirubin. gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, alkaline phosphatase, alanine transaminase, and amylase levels. The first four factors also discriminated between those patients with and without CBD stones. Logistic discriminant functions were estimated providing probabilities for the presence of CBD stones for each patient but were too cumbersome for clinical use. A simple scoring system was devised on the basis of cut-off levels: bilirubin greater than or equal to 40 mumol/L, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase greater than or equal to 250 IU/L, alkaline phosphatase greater than or equal to 225 IU/L, and age greater than or equal to 70 years, indicating CBD stones. Bilirubin alone had a sensitivity and specificity of 80%; the specificity increased to 93% with all four factors. These results suggest that clinical and biochemical criteria and ERCP and/or ES may have important roles in the management of patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in elderly patients.the presentation of common bile duct disease, value of investigations and treatment outcome in elderly patients undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were assessed.the clinical presentation, liver function tests, full blood counts, abdominal ultrasound and ERCP results were assessed retrospectively in 101 patients (59 women, 42 men; mean age 83 years, range 75-100) sequentially investigated for possible common bile duct disease.59 patients had common bile duct gallstones, 35 had malignant biliary obstruction (13 with co-existing common bile duct stones) and seven had other outcomes. In the malignant-alone group 68% of those who had jaundice presented painlessly compared with 24% in the gallstones-alone group; 49% of the gallstones-alone group had pain compared with 28% of the malignant group. In the gallstones-alone group 43% had atypical presentations (non-specific symptoms or painless jaundice). Non-specific symptoms were found in 19% of the gallstones-alone group but in only 5% of the malignant group. Of the patients who had common bile duct stones, 18% had pancreatic or biliary malignancy. The co-existence of gallstones and malignancy was emphasized by eight patients in whom the clinical and ultrasound diagnosis was of common bile duct stones but malignancy was detected by ERCP. The sensitivity of ultrasound was 86% for detecting dilated common bile ducts was 86%, but only 69% for diagnosing gallstones within the common bile duct and 67% for diagnosing pancreatic masses. Ultrasound and ERCP were in agreement in 60 patients (60%). Endoscopic clearance of common bile duct gallstones was successful in 53 of 54 attempts (98%). Palliative ERCP treatment was performed in 30 patients who had malignant biliary obstruction and was successful in 22 (73%); in a further four patients (13%) an endoprothesis was successfully inserted percutaneously. The commonest complication of ERCP was cholangitis (four patients); pancreatitis and biliary perforation occurred in one patient each. Twenty-two patients (63%) who had malignancy died during follow-up, the mean survival being 11.3 weeks (range 3 days-2 years). Carcinoma of the ampulla was associated with a relatively good prognosis (three patients survived 18 months or more).in elderly patients, common bile duct stones often present atypically and co-existence with malignancy is not unusual; ampullary carcinoma has a relatively good prognosis and ERCP is a safe and effective procedure in the management of biliary obstruction.Cholangiography during cholecystectomy: a plea for selective use.Routine peroperative cholangiography was retrospectively studied in 376 patients who underwent elective cholecystectomy. Adequate cholangiograms were obtained in 325 patients using a C-arm image intensifier. Pre- and peroperative indications for common bile duct stones were correlated to the outcome of peroperative cholangiography. The sensitivity and specificity of the cholangiographic technique were 96 and 95 per cent respectively. A false-positive rate of 4.6% and a false-negative rate of 0.6% were found. No serious complications due to the method were observed. Peroperative cholangiography prevented unnecessary exploration of the common bile duct in 70 per cent of the patients with clinical indications for exploration. Abnormal cholangiograms were rare (0.8%) in the absence of clinical signs of stones in the bile ducts. These results demonstrate that selective rather than routine peroperative cholangiography should be performed.Per-operative endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography for common bile duct stones.Laparoscopic sonography: a real alternative to cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy?The routine use of intraoperative cholangiography (CGP) during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is still under debate. Previous reports suggest that intraoperative sonography can replace CGP in the evaluation of common duct lithiasis during open cholecystectomy. The present study was performed to evaluate the possible role of sonography during LC.45 patients were submitted to laparoscopic sonography of biliary tree during LC. In all cases, CGP was performed.In 37 cases, sonography did not show the presence of stones; in 7 cases, common bile duct stones were identified by sonography; one false negative was observed. A sensitivity of 87.5%, a specificity of 100% and an overall accuracy of 97.8% were obtained. A false positive was obtained with CGP with a sensitivity of 100%, a specificity 97.3%, and an overall accuracy of 97.8%.Laparoscopic sonography can represent an adequate substitute for CGP as a screening procedure during LC.Comparative evaluation of preoperative and operative radiology in biliary-tract disease.Intraductal ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones: a comparative study.Intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS) is highly accurate in detection of extrahepatic bile duct stones. This study was to compare the accuracy of IDUS and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones.Thirty patients suspected of extrahepatic bile duct stones on B ultrasonography, CT, or MRI were enrolled for study. ERC was performed using a Fujinon duodenoscope (ED-410XT, ED-410Xu), then IDUS was done by inserting a Fujinon microprobe (PL2220-15) through the endoscopic biopsy channel to detect the extrahepatic bile duct. Finally stones in the extrahepatic bile duct were detected and extracted by endoscopic sphincterotomy (EST).Among the 30 patients, 26 were diagnosed as having cholelithiasis accurately through ERC. In one patient the stone detected by ERC was really floccule. Misdiagnosis happened in 2 patients with extrahepatic bile duct stones. So the overall accuracy and sensitivity of ERC in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones were 86.7% (26/30) and 92.9% (26/28) respectively. In contrast, IDUS showed the results of diagnosis were in consistent with those of EST stone extraction. Its accuracy and sensitivity in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones were 100% (30/30) and 100% (28/28) respectively.IDUS which is superior to ERC in diagnosing extrahepatic bile duct stones can avoid the visual error of ERC.Comparison of endoscopic retrograde and intravenous cholangiography in diagnosis of biliary calculi.The results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (E.R.C.) and intravenous cholangiography (I.V.C.) were compared in patients undergoing surgery for biliary calculi. E.R.C. gave a significantly higher rate of correct diagnosis of gallbladder calculi (p = 0.026) and common bileduct calculi (p = 0.002) than I.V.C. Biliary stones may thus frequently be present in patients with a normal I.V.C. and E.R.C. may reduce the rate of diagnostic errors in patients with symptoms of biliary disease.Peroperative cholangiogram--routine or selective results of a prospective study.Peroperative cholangiography (POC) performed as a routine during cholecystectomy for cholelithiasis was evaluated in 102 patients. POC was normal 93 patients. Nine patients had abnormal POCs: 5 were true positive--CBD stones (4) and sphincteric fibrosis (1): 4 were false positive--air bubbles (2) and sphincteric spasm (2). Preoperative indication of CBD stones were present in 12 patients-5 of these had abnormal POC (4 true positive and 1 false positive). CBD exploration was avoided in 7 patients with normal POC. Ninety patients did not have any preoperative indication of CBD stones-4 of these had abnormal POC (1 true positive and 3 false positive). None of the patients with a normal POC had any clinical evidence of residual stones on follow up for one year. POC did not help in any case to delineate biliary ductal anatomy. Routine POC during cholecystectomy should be abandoned and should be performed selectively in patients suspected to have CBD stones only to avoid a negative CBD exploration.Identification of bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To identify patients with common bile duct stones, all patients considered for laparoscopic cholecystectomy in this unit undergo intravenous cholangiography (IVC) with tomography and, more recently, operative cholangiography. To date 100 consecutive patients with symptomatic gallstones have undergone laparoscopic cholecystectomy with no specific exclusion criteria. Eight patients of 100 were found to have duct stones on IVC with one false-positive. These IVC data were compared with data from 52 patients who also had operative cholangiograms performed. One stone was detected on operative cholangiography that was not identified on IVC. No additional information was gained from operative cholangiography. These data suggest that preoperative IVC is adequate for the detection of duct stones in patients considered for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Detection of choledocholithiasis: comparison of unenhanced helical CT and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.To compare unenhanced helical computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the detection of common bile duct calculi.Within 13 months, 51 patients (aged 18-94 years) with clinically suspected choledocholithiasis underwent unenhanced helical CT immediately before undergoing ERCP. CT scans were evaluated for the presence of bile duct stones, ampullary stones, the gallbladder and gallbladder stones, intrahepatic biliary dilatation, and the size of the bile duct at the porta hepatis and in the pancreatic head. ERCP images were evaluated for the presence of bile duct or ampullary stones, as well as for biliary dilatation.Unenhanced helical CT depicted common bile duct stones in 15 of 17 patients found to have stones at ERCP. Three patients had stones impacted at the ampulla, all of which were detected with CT. In addition, there was one false-positive finding at CT. CT had a sensitivity of 88%, a specificity of 97%, and an accuracy of 94% in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones.Unenhanced helical CT is useful for evaluating suspected choledocholithiasis.Preoperative ERCP approach to common bile duct stones: results of a selective policy.In a previous study, we made a plea for more selective indications for preoperative ERCP in patients with gallstones based on the results obtained from a liberal policy. Following 3.5 years of implementing this selective policy, a report on the results are presented here. This study was performed in a referral academic hospital.Between June 1994 and December 1997, 328 patients underwent cholecystectomy because of symptomatic cholelithiasis. Absolute indications for preoperative ERCP were: acute cholangitis (4 patients); obstructive jaundice (22 patients); gallstone pancreatitis (within the first 24 h in 14 patients), and wide common bile duct (CBD, >8 mm) with suspicion of stones in the biliary tree (2 patients).In 42 patients (12.8%) a preoperative ERCP was performed for these indications. Stones were found in the CBD in 30 patients and edema in the papilla in 2 patients (total 76.2%). The stones could be extracted by endoscopic sphincterotomy in 24 of the 30 patients (80%). Complications were seen in 7 patients (16.7%). All these complications (bleeding of the papilla in 4 and mild pancreatitis in 3 patients) could be treated conservatively. During a mean follow-up of 2.5 years, CBD stones could be demonstrated postoperatively in 3 patients (0.3%). No mortality was observed in this series.The results of this selective policy included the expected outcome of a significant reduction in the number of ERCPs performed from 29 to 12.8% (p < 0.001, chi(2) test) and a better yield of stones, from 29 to 76.2% of the patients. The mortality of the procedure decreased from 2 to 0% whereas morbidity remained the same. This selective policy seems adequate for the preoperative assessment of CBD stones.One hundred consecutive laparoscopic cholangiograms. Results and conclusions.In 100 consecutive patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the feasibility, reliability, and cost of routine laparoscopic cholangiography were prospectively studied.Fluoroscopic cholangiograms with multiple exposures were successfully completed in all patients in an average time of 6.9 min.Twenty-one percent were abnormal, and 15 common duct stones and 6 significant anatomic anomalies detected. Thirteen out of 15 patients with common duct stones had preoperative suspicion of common duct stones. Two out of 15 were completely unsuspected. The average cost of cholangiography was $768, and there were no complications related to the procedure. There were no false interpretations.When compared with selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), routine laparoscopic cholangiography is safer, more accurate, and less costly, and may have the added benefit of potentially reducing iatrogenic injuries in patients with anatomic variations. Routine laparoscopic cholangiography should be considered by all surgeons.Endosonography- vs. endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography-based strategies in the evaluation of suspected common bile duct stones in patients with normal transabdominal imaging.Endosonography (EUS) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) are highly accurate techniques for evaluating common bile duct stones.To compare the clinical impact and costs of EUS- and ERCP-based strategies for evaluating patients with suspected common bile duct stones but normal transabdominal imaging.The costs of EUS- vs. ERCP-based strategies were compared in patients with suspected acute biliary obstruction from common bile duct stones but normal transabdominal imaging.Over a 15-month period, 110 patients were recruited. EUS detected a common bile duct lesion in 73% (common bile duct stones: 68%; pancreatic cancer: 2%; ampulla tumour: 2%; cholangiocarcinoma: 1%). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of EUS were 98%, 100%, 100% and 93%, respectively. EUS prevented 30% unnecessary ERCP. The mean difference in cost per patient between EUS- and ERCP-based strategies was US$166. When stratified according to clinical indications, an EUS-based strategy was costlier only in suspected biliary sepsis. Costs were similar when the indications were cholestatic jaundice, acute pancreatitis and cholestasis.EUS prior to biliary interventions in patients with suspected common bile duct stones prevented unnecessary ERCP. It allowed a definitive diagnosis to be made prior to more invasive procedures.Laparoscopic ultrasonography versus operative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: review of the literature and a comparison with open intraoperative ultrasonography.Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) has been used increasingly over the last several years as a new imaging modality. To define the role of LUS during laparoscopic cholecystectomy, we evaluated LUS by prospectively comparing it with operative cholangiography (OC), by reviewing the literature on LUS, and by retrospectively comparing it with intraoperative ultrasonography performed during open cholecystectomy.LUS and OC were compared prospectively in 100 consecutive patients during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The success rate of examination, the time required, the accuracy in diagnosing bile duct calculi, and the delineation of biliary anatomy were evaluated.The success rate of examination was 95% for LUS and 92% for OC. The main reason for unsatisfactory LUS was incomplete visualization of the distal common bile duct. The time required was 8.2 minutes for LUS and 15.9 minutes for OC (p<0.0001). Nine patients had bile duct calculi. LUS had one false-negative result and OC had two false-positives and one false-negative. The accuracies of LUS and OC were comparable except for a slightly better positive predictive value of LUS (100% versus 77.8%; p>0.1). In a literature review, 12 recent prospective studies comparing LUS and OC and three studies on open intraoperative ultrasonography were reviewed. Twelve studies of LUS with a total of 2,059 patients demonstrated results similar to the present study. The success rate was 88% to 100% for both tests. The time for LUS was approximately 7 minutes, about half of the time needed for OC. Overall, LUS was associated with fewer false-positive results than OC; the positive predictive value and specificity of LUS were better, while the sensitivity and negative predictive value of LUS and OC were comparable. OC detected ductal variations or anomalies more distinctly than LUS. Compared with open intraoperative ultrasonography, LUS had a slightly lower success rate and required a slightly longer time because it was technically more demanding, but the two procedures had a similar accuracy for diagnosing bile duct calculi.Because of their different advantages and disadvantages, LUS and OC can be used in a complementary manner. There is a learning curve for LUS because of its technical difficulty. Once learned, however, LUS can be used as the primary screening procedure for bile duct calculi because of its safety, speed, and cost-effectiveness. OC can be used selectively, particularly when ductal anatomic variations or anomalies or bile duct injuries are suspected.A comparison of intraoperative ultrasound versus cholangiography in the evaluation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Indications for intraoperative evaluation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy are controversial, as is the goal of either anatomic definition or assessing for choledocholithiasis. One hundred twenty-five consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy underwent both intraoperative ultrasound and intraoperative cholangiography. Cholangiography required slightly more time to perform; it was more sensitive (92.8% vs 71.4%) but less specific (76.2% vs 100%) for choledocholithiasis than was ultrasound. Ultrasound was somewhat more difficult to perform, and, particularly in the setting of intraabdominal obesity, was often inadequate at providing clear visualization of the intrapancreatic common bile duct. It did not provide the same anatomic definition as an adequate cholangiogram. The overall incidence of choledocholithiasis was 11.2%.[Selective intraoperative cholangiography].300 consecutive cholecystectomies performed from 1984 through 1986 were studied retrospectively to answer the following questions: which are suitable preoperative indicators for selective operative cholangiography, and which is the failure rate to detect biliary concrements by selective cholangiography? Patients with a history of jaundice, suspected concrements from preoperative intravenous cholangiography or ultrasound examination, a common bile duct wider than 8 mm, and elevated serum levels of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, ALAT (GPT) or ASAT (GOT) all had significantly higher rates of biliary concrements. Of these indicators, preoperative radiologic studies, serum levels of ALAT (GPT) and serum levels of alkaline phosphatase showed the best sensitivity, specificity as well as positive and negative predictive value. If two criteria, preoperative radiology and serum levels of ALAT (GPT), had been used, intraoperative cholangiography would have been performed in 34% of the cases. 82% of all biliary concrements would have been detected; in 3% of all cholecystectomies, the diagnosis of concrements would have been missed. We conclude that prospective studies should be performed to better define necessity and benefit of routine operative cholangiography still widely performed today.Ultrasound detection of choledocholithiasis: prospective comparison with ERCP in the postcholecystectomy patient.The role of ultrasound as a screening test for choledocholithiasis was prospectively assessed by comparing the results of upper abdominal ultrasound with direct cholangiography in 59 unselected symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 13 of 29 patients (sensitivity, 45%) and their absence in 29 of 30 (specificity, 97%). A positive ultrasound diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was correct 13 times out of 14 (predictive value, 93%) whereas a negative diagnosis was correct on only 29 of 45 occasions (predictive value, 64%). No significant learning effect was seen. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones. Duct stones were present in 25 of 35 patients shown to have a dilated common duct on ultrasound, and in 4 of 24 with nondilated ducts; the predictive value of duct dilatation at ultrasound for duct stones was therefore 71% and that of nondilatation in excluding stones was 83%. Dilated intrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated at ultrasound in only 17% of patients with choledocholithiasis. We conclude that ultrasound cannot reliably diagnose or exclude bile duct stones and is an inadequate screening test for the symptomatic postcholecystectomy patient.The importance of intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) using an electrosurgery energy source was successfully performed in 59 (95%) out of 62 selected patients. The procedures were performed by different surgical teams at Trakya University, Medical Fakulty, in the department of General Surgery and the Karl-Franzens-University School of Medicine, in the department of General Surgery. Cholangiography was routine at Karl Franzens University and selective at Trakya University. Laparoscopic intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was performed in 48 (81.3%) patients, and open IOC was performed in 3 patients. Two patients had common duct stones; one of which was unsuspected preoperatively. These cases underwent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and endoscopic papillotomy (EP). One patient had a choledocal tumor, unsuspected preoperatively. Anatomical anomalies were not identified. Cholangiography could not be performed in one case in which there was no suspected pathology. ERCP was performed on one patient 30 days after being discharged because of acute cholangitis. In this case, residual stones were identified in the choledocus. Four patients underwent open cholecystectomy because of tumor, unidentified cystic duct or common bile duct pathology that could not be visualized on the cholangiogram. Our study suggests that cholangiography performed via the cystic duct before any structures are divided can prevent the most serious complication of laparoscopic cholecystectomy--common duct injury. We recommend that cholangiography be attempted on all patients undergoing LC.Routine versus selective intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a survey of 2,130 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Routine use of intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is a matter of debate.Data from 2,130 consecutive LCs and patients' follow-up during 9 years were collected and analyzed. During the first 4 years of the study, 800 patients underwent LC, and IOC was performed selectively (SIOC). Thereafter, 1,330 patients underwent LC, and IOC was routinely attempted (RIOC) for all.In the IOC group, 159 patients met the criteria for SIOC, which was completed successfully in 141 cases (success rate, 88.6%). Bile duct calculi were found in nine patients. All other patients with no criteria or failed SIOC were followed, and in nine patients retained stones were documented. Thus, the incidence of ductal stones was 1.1% and sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value (NPV), and positive predictive value (PPV) for the detection of ductal stones were 50, 100, 98.6, and 100%, respectively. In the RIOC group, IOC was routinely attempted in 1,330 patients and was successful in 1,133 (success rate, 90.9%; p = 0.015). Bile duct stones were detected in 37 patients (including 14 asymptomatic stones). In two cases, IOC failed to reveal ductal stones (false negative). There was no false-positive IOC. Therefore, with RIOC policy, the incidence of ductal stones, sensitivity, specificity, NPV, and PPV were 3.3, 97.4, 100, 99.8, and 100%, respectively (significantly higher for success rate, incidence, sensitivity, and NPV; p < 0.05). Abnormal IOC findings were also significantly higher in the RIOC group. Common bile duct injury occurred only in the SIOC group [two cases of all 2,130 LCs (0.09%)].RIOC during LC is a safe, accurate, quick, and cost-effective method for the detection of bile duct anatomy and stones. A highly disciplined performance of RIOC can minimize potentially debilitating and hazardous complications of bile duct injury.The role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the laparoscopic era.The optimal approach to patients with suspected common bile duct (CBD) stones remains unsettled. Options include pre- and postoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) or laparoscopic exploration of the CBD. This retrospective study evaluates the role of ERCP in the management of suspected CBD stones, with an emphasis on indications, endoscopic findings, and outcome.We retrospectively reviewed the consecutive medical records of 99 patients (67 females and 32 males) who underwent ERCP for suspected CBD stones between March 1992 and December 1995.In 86 patients, ERCP was performed preoperatively. Indications for ERCP included jaundice, pancreatitis, elevated liver functions tests (LFT), and ultrasound (US) or computed tomography (CT) scan findings. Forty one (48%) of 86 preoperative ERCP had positive findings; 37 (43%) were negative, and in 8 (9%) we failed to demonstrate the CBD. There were seven (8%) major complications: four cases of acute pancreatitis, one case of acute bleeding, and two cases of acute bleeding with perforation. There was no mortality. When pancreatitis was the only indication for ERCP, 0 of 8 patients had positive findings in comparison with 50% when pancreatitis was associated with jaundice and LFT, and 93% when US or CT scan demonstrated stones or dilation of the CBD.We conclude that ERCP is a valuable option for management of CBD stones but should be performed selectively. Neither pancreatitis alone nor LFT alone is an indication for ERCP. The presence of CBD stones is more likely when multiple indications are present.Selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for gallstones.To assess the outcome of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) for symptomatic gallbladder and suspected duct stones.During 3 years, one or more of four criteria led to ERC: jaundice, choledocus >8 mm, cholestasis, and severe biliary pancreatitis. Endoscopic extraction (ESE) of ductal stones was attempted before LC.In all, 990 patients were prospectively included. There were no exclusions. There were no deaths. A multivariate logistic regression analysis identified jaundice (P = 0.001), pancreatitis (P = 0.001), and cholestasis (P = 0.001) as statistically significant predictors of ductal stones. Choledocus >8 mm was not a significant predictor (P = 0.12). A total of 155 (16%) patients underwent ERC for suspected stones: 21 of 155 (13%) patients had no stones; and 6 of 134 (4%) patients had stone impaction cleared at open surgery. ERC clearance rate was 95% (128 of 134). LC was performed in 149 of 155 patients after a median interval of 3 days (range 1 to 7). Morbidity rates were 3% (4 of 134), 2% (3 of 149), and nil (0 of 6) after ESE, LC, or open surgery, respectively. Median hospital stay was 11 days. A total of 835 patients underwent LC with a 1.5% complication rate. Laparoscopic fluoro-cholangiography showed < or =3 mm-sized stones in 10 of 835 (1.2%) patients. No stones were reported at a median follow-up of 4 months including 990 patients.Ninety-five percent of patients with ductal stones can be successfully and safely managed by ERC prior to LC.A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients with jaundice and suspected biliary obstruction.During a 4-year period (1978-1982), 206 patients were examined with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) because of jaundice with suspected biliary obstruction. The total of examinations was 223. Duodenoscopy with ERCP gave a positive primary diagnosis in 160 cases (78%), six (4%) of which later proved to be incorrect. Extrahepatic obstruction could be excluded in 16 patients with normal cholangiogram (8%). Clinically relevant information thus was obtained in 176 cases (85%). The main cause of extrahepatic obstruction was common bile duct stone(s), which were found in 73 patients. Immediate endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed in 64 of them and cleared the duct of stones in 54 (84%). Benign stenosis of the ampulla of Vater was relieved with endoscopic sphincterotomy in six patients. Malignant bile duct obstruction was diagnosed in 56 patients, and in three of them an endoprosthesis for internal drainage of the biliary tract was endoscopically inserted. Immediate complications after ERCP without endoscopic sphincterotomy occurred in 5 of 136 patients (4%), one of whom died. The authors conclude that ERCP is a rapid, reliable and safe diagnostic method in patients with extrahepatic biliary obstruction.Comparison of early endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the management of acute biliary pancreatitis: a prospective randomized study.The role and potential benefits of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the management of acute biliary pancreatitis have not been documented. We report a large prospective randomized study comparing early EUS and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the management of these patients.A prospective randomized study was performed on 140 patients with acute pancreatitis suspected to have a biliary cause. The patients were randomized to have EUS (n = 70) or ERCP (n = 70) within 24 hours from admission. In the EUS group, when EUS detected choledocholithiasis, therapeutic ERCP was performed during the same endoscopy session. In the ERCP group, diagnostic ERCP was performed, followed by therapeutic endoscopy when choledocholithiasis was detected.Examination of the biliary tree by EUS was successful in all patients in the EUS group, whereas cannulation of the common duct during ERCP was unsuccessful in 10 patients (14%) in the ERCP group (P = .001). Combined percutaneous ultrasonography and ERCP missed detection of cholelithiasis in 6 patients in the ERCP group. The overall morbidity rate was 7% in the EUS group, and that in the ERCP group was 14% (P = .172). The hospital stay and mortality rates were comparable in both groups.In selected patients with acute biliary pancreatitis, EUS could safely replace diagnostic ERCP in the management for selecting patients with choledocholithiasis for therapeutic ERCP with a higher successful examination rate, a higher sensitivity in the detection of cholelithiasis, and a comparable morbidity rate.Effect of intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy on outcome after gallstone pancreatitis.Acute gallstone pancreatitis has traditionally been managed by early cholecystectomy with intraoperative cholangiography (IOC). To evaluate the effect of IOC on patient outcome, we analyzed all patients operated on for acute gallstone pancreatitis at our institution over a 3-year period. A total of 200 patients (37 open, 163 laparoscopic) were evaluated. Nineteen of 34 patients who underwent preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were found to have common bile duct (CBD) stones. The 59 patients who underwent cholecystectomy with IOC had significantly longer operative times compared to the 141 patients who underwent cholecystectomy alone (167 vs. 105 minutes for open [P = 0.008] and 89 vs. 68 minutes for laparoscopic [P < 0.0001] operations). Of the 59 patients who underwent IOC, only nine (15%) had abnormal cholangiograms, and CBD exploration in seven revealed stones in four patients, edematous ampullae in two, and no abnormality in one. Six of eight patients (5 IOC, 3 no IOC) who required immediate postoperative ERCP were noted to have CBD stones. Patients who underwent IOC had significantly longer postoperative hospital stays (3.8 vs. 2.0 days [P = 0.007]). The incidence of retained CBD stones following surgery was similar (5.1% IOC, 2.8% no IOC). Although 7 of 122 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy without IOC were readmitted, only one was found on ERCP to have a retained CBD stone. Age, sex, preoperative days, procedure type, and biliary-pancreatic complications after discharge did not differ significantly between patients with and without IOC. We conclude that IOC in patients operated on for acute gallstone pancreatitis results in a longer operative time and a prolonged postoperative course, but has no effect on the incidence of retained CBD stones.Correlation between MRCP and ERCP findings at a tertiary care hospital.It is common clinical practice to obtain Magnetic Resonance Cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) prior to Endoscopic Retrograde Cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) to evaluate the biliary system. With recent improvements of MRCP, it is important to correlate the findings of these two studies.To examine the correlation between MRCP and ERCP findings in patients at a tertiary care hospital.A total of 165 patients were identified who underwent MRCP prior to ERCP at West Virginia University between July 1, 2004 and June 30, 2006 (98 females and 67 males). Patients' demographic information and their laboratory values and diagnostic study outcomes prior to procedure were collected, entered into MS Access, and analyzed using SAS 10.0. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were calculated. Two-tailed p-values of <= 0.05 were considered statistically significant.Baseline demographic characteristics were comparable between male and female patients. Hepatobiliary and pancreatic duct results were grouped together. MRCP was 74.6% sensitive and 83.5% specific for choledocholithiasis, 85.4% sensitive and 87.4% specific for strictures, 85.9% sensitive and 91.2% specific for obstruction, 92.4% sensitive and 93.5% specific for ductal dilatation, and 90.8% sensitive and 92.6% specific for detection of periductal masses. MRCP appeared to have more false negative results for choledocholithiasis and strictures and more false positive results for ductal dilatation and periductal mass detection compared with ERCP.In patients with presentations suggestive of hepatobiliary and pancreatic disease, despite recent improvements in MRCP technique, the sensitivity and specificity of MRCP is still not close enough to that of ERCP for detection of choledocholithiasis, hepatobiliary and pancreatic ductal dilatation, periductal masses, or obstruction to be used as a substitute. Thus, ERCP remains the gold standard for visualization of the hepatobiliary and pancreatic tree.The efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound for the diagnosis of common bile duct stones as compared to CT, MRCP, and ERCP.[Intraoperative cholangiography as a routine method? A prospective, controlled, randomized study].A prospective, controlled, randomized trial was conducted in 275 patients with symptomatic gall stone disease, whose history, laboratory data or sonographical findings did not suggest common bile duct stones. Of these patients, 137 did not undergo intraoperative fluoroscopic cholangiography (IOC), but in the remaining 138 patients IOC was attempted. In 111 cases (80.4%) the biliary system was sufficiently visualized. In 3 patients (2.7%) calculi in the cystic or common bile duct were diagnosed, which would have been overlooked without IOC. IOC was false-positive in one case. One year after the operation the patients were asked to return for a follow-up examination. Three patients in the group without IOC had had symptomatic passage of a stone, and one had a common bile duct stone removed by endoscopic papillotomy. A retained stone was discussed as etiology for a pancreatitis in a fifth patient in this group. No patient sustained long-term sequelae from the retained common bile duct stones. None of the patients in the IOC group had evidence of cholangiolithiasis at follow-up. There was no difference between the study groups concerning the incidence of post-operative complications. The operations with IOC lasted significantly longer (92 +/- 31 min vs 77 +/- 28 min). According to our data and those published earlier, the additional financial and logistic expenditure associated with routine IOC is not justified. Patients with the preoperative suspicion of a common bile duct stone should have endoscopic bile duct clearance (ERCP and EPT) prior to cholecystectomy.A five years review intra-operative cholangiogram.Intra-operative cholangiogram is often performed to detect concurrent common bile duct stones in cholecystectomy patients. Routine cholangiogram add to cost and exposes patients to unnecessary exploration of common bile duct due to frequent false positive results. Thus, there is need of better indicators for cholangiogram in order to minimize unnecessary procedure and its morbidity.A retrospective analysis of patients undergoing intra-operative cholangiogram during open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy was done at Patan Hospital from Oct 1, 2005 to Sep 31, 2009. Indications and outcome of cholangiogram were analyzed together with findings of common bile duct exploration.A total of 68 (2.8%, 68/2400) intra-operative cholangiogram were done in 2400 cholecystectomy patients during five years period. Eight (11.8%, 8/68) patients had abnormal findings. Two (3%, 2/68) patients with abnormal cholangiogram had stones in common bile duct. There was no mortality in this series.Existing indications of intra-operative cholangiogram detects only small percentage of patients with bile duct stones and has high false positive results. This unnecessarily increases bile duct exploration, cost and morbidity. Thus, there is need to redefine indications for intra-operative cholangiogram.Routine preoperative infusion cholangiography at elective cholecystectomy: a prospective study in 694 patients.The role of preoperative infusion cholangiography (PIC) before elective cholecystectomy has yet to be defined. Between 1985 and 1991 PIC was performed routinely in 694 patients with median (range) age of 52 (17-85) years with biliary calculus disease 1 or 4 days before elective cholecystectomy. Satisfactory opacification of the biliary system was achieved in 90.1 per cent and mild to moderate adverse reactions to the infusion of contrast medium occurred in 0.9 per cent of patients. Peroperative cholangiography (POC) in 43 of 499 patients with a normal PIC was normal. The presence of common bile duct stones was confirmed in 34 of 36 patients with prominent stones at bile duct exploration and in 8 of 26 with suspected stones at PIC. Bile duct dilatation (median diameter 10 mm) without concomitant stones was seen at PIC and confirmed at POC in 20 patients. Bile duct anomalies were found or suspected in 35 patients at PIC and were confirmed in six by POC (n = 5), or during the cholecystectomy making the anomaly incidence 0.9 per cent. Information provided by the PIC was not of crucial importance for safe execution of cholecystectomy in any patient, while a single (minor) bile duct lesion (1 of 694; 0.1 per cent) could be ascribed to severe pericholecystitis. The results of this study suggest that routine PIC is not warranted. However, PIC is an alternative to selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography or selective POC. PIC needs to be supported by POC in approximately 20 per cent of patients (in case of absent or poor opacification of the bile ducts or suspicion of stones or anomalies at PIC).Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography following laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the preferred method of treatment for symptomatic choledocholithiasis. Since its introduction there has been an increase in postoperative diagnostic and therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The aim of this study was to assess the indications and results of ERCP following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Sixty-one patients had an ERCP following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Two broad groups were identified: Group 1 (35 patients) had filling defects (consistent with stones) noted on operative cholangiography, which were not successfully flushed or extracted at the time of laparoscopic cholecystectomy; Group 2 consisted of patients who developed problems following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Nine patients had post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain with abnormal liver function tests (LFT), four of whom had common bile duct (CBD) injuries and three had CBD stones. Eleven patients had post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain with a normal diameter common bile duct on ultrasound and normal LFT; only one had a CBD stone. Five patients with a persisting bile leak following laparoscopic cholecystectomy had an ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy. In three the leak ceased, while two required subsequent open surgery to drain bile collections and ligate the cystic duct. One patient presented with an episode of transient jaundice but had a normal ERCP. There were six post-ERCP complications; three patients had mild pancreatitis, two had a minor haemorrhage and one an asymptomatic duodenal perforation. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy was most valuable for the management of retained stones and the diagnosis and management of post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain in association with abnormal LFT. The diagnostic yield was low (9%) when the LFT were normal.Predictive ability of choledocholithiasis indicators.[Upper-abdominal ultrasonography and ERCP? (author's transl)].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as well as upper-abdominal ultrasonography were performed on 134 patients. Organ structure was optimally demonstrated by ultrasonography in 94 patients (70.2%) and partially in 29 (21.6%) Comparing the diagnostic assessment in 62 patients who had undergone 73 tests and had subsequently been operated on (57) or examined post-mortem (5) there was a statistically significant advantage of ERCP in diseases in which the choledochal duct had been involved. The method was successful in 95% of cases of choledocholithiasis (20 cases) compared with 45% by ultrasound and in 85% of cases of gall-bladder carcinoma which also involved the choledochal duct (38% by ultrasound). In clinically manifest carcinoma of the head of the pancreas (9 cases) and cholecystolithiasis (19 cases) ultrasonography provided the correct diagnosis in 89%, while the results for ERCP were 56% and 74%, respectively.[The importance and value of pre-, intra- and postoperative roentgenologic biliary tract diagnosis].Routine intraoperative cholangiogram.The value of a routine intraoperative cholangiogram is controversial. We reviewed 352 consecutive instances of cholecystectomy for nonmalignant disease during a period of three years to assess the diagnostic accuracy and additional cost of the roentgenographic technique. Intraoperative cholangiogram was done in all except 11 patients. Forty-nine of 341 patients underwent exploration of the common bile duct. The diagnosis was determined by the cholangiogram and was correct in 46 patients with three false-positive results. The other 292 patients did well without exploration of the common bile duct. The cholangiocatheter and a special cholangioclamp made the procedure easy and minimized additional operation time (five minutes with no mortality and negligible morbidity). Clinical indications for exploration of the common bile duct correlated poorly with abnormal findings in the bile duct. Unsuspected common duct stones were detected by cholangiogram in 17 (5 per cent) patients. Possible iatrogenic trauma to the common duct was prevented when significant abnormal findings were demonstrated by cholangiogram. The results of this study indicate that routine intraoperative cholangiogram is: accurate for diagnosis of common bile duct stones; useful in identification of bile duct anomalies and, thus, aids in preventing injury to the common bile duct; safe with negligible risk, and neither expensive nor time consuming if done correctly as a routine procedure.Routine intraoperative laparoscopic cholangiography.Whether intraoperative laparoscopic cholangiography should be routine is debatable.We reviewed the cholangiography experience in 669 consecutive laparoscopic cholecystectomies.Mean age of the patients was 39 years, 78% were female, and 29% had acute cholecystitis. Cholecystectomy was completed laparoscopically in 606 (91%). Laparoscopic cholangiography was completed in 562 (93%) and 348 (62%) were routine (no preoperative indication). The mean operating time in 1996 was 61 minutes. Out of the 348 routine cholangiograms, 17 demonstrated evidence of unsuspected choledocholithiasis. Five patients had choledocholithiasis documented by laparoscopic common bile duct exploration and/or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Two patients had normal postoperative cholangiopancreatography. One of 10 patients managed expectantly was readmitted postoperatively with obstructive jaundice. In 4 patients, routine cholangiography revealed unexpected anatomy, and in 2, this prevented misidentification and transection of the common bile duct.Laparoscopic cholangiography is safe, quick, detects unsuspected choledocholithiasis, and can prevent common bile duct transection. It should be routine.[Retrograde pancreaticocholangiography in the diagnosis of residual choledocholithiasis].[Endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography performed during the same anesthesia session].To evaluate the feasibility, results and importance of a diagnostic and therapeutic biliary and pancreatic exploration associating endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography during the same anaesthesia session.From November 1997 to October 1998, 179 patients (83 males, 96 females), mean age 62 years (range 22 to 95 years), were investigated in our gastroenterology unit for biliary or pancreatic disorders. Two hundred and sixty two examinations were performed by a single physician for patients under general anaesthesia. In 87 cases (42%), endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was performed immediately without prior endoscopic ultrasonography; these patients were not included. When endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography followed endoscopic ultrasonography, it was performed during the same anaesthesia session.In 118 cases, endoscopic ultrasonography was performed first, followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography 57 times (48%). The sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography was 96.5% and the success of therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was 100%. Endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was necessary for 83% of patients with angiocholitis, 60% with cholestasis, 45% with acute biliary pancreatitis and only 28% with common bile duct stone migration.To decrease the number of anaesthesia sessions, endoscopic ultrasonography--endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography during same anaesthesia session appears to be particularly interesting for the diagnosis and treatment of biliary and pancreatic disorders, in terms of cost, accuracy, morbidity and patient comfort.Prospective randomized trial of LC+LCBDE vs ERCP/S+LC for common bile duct stone disease.To compare outcome parameters for good-risk patients with classic signs, symptoms, and laboratory and abdominal imaging features of cholecystolithiasis and choledocholithiasis randomized to either laparoscopic cholecystectomy plus laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (LC+LCBDE) or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography sphincterotomy plus laparoscopic cholecystectomy (ERCP/S+LC).Our study was a prospective trial conducted following written informed consent, with randomization by the serially numbered, opaque envelope technique.Our institution is an academic teaching hospital and the central receiving and trauma center for the City and County of San Francisco, California.We randomized 122 patients (American Society of Anesthesiologists grade 1 or 2) meeting entry criteria. Ten of these patients, excluded from outcome analysis, were protocol violators having signed out of the hospital against medical advice before 1 or both procedures were completed.Treatment was preoperative ERCP/S followed by LC, or LC+LCBDE.The primary outcome measure was efficacy of stone clearance from the common bile duct. Secondary end points were length of hospital stay, cost of index hospitalization, professional fees, hospital charges, morbidity and mortality, and patient acceptance and quality of life scores.The baseline characteristics of the 2 randomized groups were similar. Efficacy of stone clearance was likewise equivalent for both groups. The time from first procedure to discharge was significantly shorter for LC+LCBDE (mean [SD], 55 [45] hours vs 98 [83] hours; P < .001). Hospital service and total charges for index hospitalization were likewise lower for LC+LCBDE, but the differences were not statistically significant. The professional fee charges for LC+LCBDE were significantly lower than those for ERCP/S+LC (median [SD], $4820 [1637] vs $6139 [1583]; P < .001). Patient acceptance and quality of life scores were equivalent for both groups.Both ERCP/S+LC and LC+LCBDE were highly effective in detecting and removing common bile duct stones and were equivalent in overall cost and patient acceptance. However, the overall duration of hospitalization was shorter and physician fees lower for LC+LCBDE.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT00807729.Ultrasonic indications to explore the common bile duct.A prospective comparison between operative cholangiography and operative choledochosonography has been made in 100 patients with cholelithiasis and potential choledocholithiasis. Thirty-one common bile ducts were explored, and 25 of them contained stones. Operative cholangiography was attempted in every case, but technical difficulties prevented examination of 12 common bile ducts, two of which contained stones. Both of these stones were detected by operative ultrasonography. Of the remaining 88 ducts, the sensitivity of the operative cholangiogram was 96% and the specificity 96%. Operative ultrasonography was performed for all 100 patients, with a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 93%. The ultrasonic findings of a sonically dense particle, shadowing, dilatation of the duct, and the persistence and meniscus signs are described with their relative incidence in the 100 patients. The time required for choledochosonography (3 to 5 minutes) compared favorably with the time needed for operative cholangiography (10 to 15 minutes). Operative bile duct scanning is a rapid, reliable technique for detecting the presence of choledocholithiasis at the time of routine cholecystectomy.Role of selective intra-operative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The use of routine intra-operative cholangiography (IOC) remains controversial. This prospective study was carried out to determine whether to perform selective or routine IOC in patients undergoing cholecystectomy for gallstones.All consecutive patients undergoing open cholecystectomy over a 16-month period were included in the present study. They were divided into two groups based on the absence (n = 79) or presence (n = 55) of indicators of choledocholithiasis. All patients were subjected to cholangiography. Each indicator, subsets of indicators and all indicators combined were evaluated for their ability to predict choledocholithiasis.There would be only two missed stones (1.5%) if selective cholangiography was to be practised. Intra-operative cholangiography had a positive predictive value of 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of all the indicators combined were 93.5%, 84.6%, 74.5%, 97.5% and 88.0%, respectively. The best indicators in each subset were jaundice, common bile duct diameter as assessed by ultrasonography, and a palpable stone during surgery with NPV of 82.7%, 91.1% and 96.8%, respectively.Routine IOC during cholecystectomy is not essential for the prevention of retained stones. A combination of the various indicators of choledocholithiasis can be used to select patients for cholangiography.Accuracy of direct cholangiography by endoscopic or transhepatic route in jaundice--a prospective study.An exact anatomic diagnosis of bile-duct obstruction is a prerequisite for selecting the appropriate management. In a prospective study on patients with clinically suspected obstructive jaundice, the results of direct cholangiography--by endoscopic retrograde or, alternatively, by transhepatic route--were compared with operative findings or liver biopsy or both. Final diagnoses were based on autopsy, operative biopsy, and clinical course. The study included 105 patients, 90 of whom underwent surgery, and allowed a blind and independent comparison between cholangiography and operative findings. The predictive value of a positive test, i.e., cholangiographic visualization of obstruction, was 0.99 and the predictive value of a corresponding negative test was 0.90, with the final diagnoses as reference. For the operated patients the predictive values were calculated as to obstruction (positive test 0.99, negative test 0.89), malignancy (positive test 0.92, negative test 0.89), and common duct stones (positive test 0.96, negative test 0.98). Thus, laparotomy can be avoided in patients in whom direct cholangiography shows no obstruction or an appropriate nonoperative procedure, like transhepatic insertion of a stent or endoscopic biliary surgery elected.How reliable is intraoperative cholangiography as a method for detecting common bile duct stones? : A prospective population-based study on 1171 patients.Although intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) is a widely used method for detecting common bile duct stones (CBDS), its accuracy has not been fully evaluated in large nonselected patient samples. The purpose of this study was to assess the sensitivity, specificity and predictive value of dynamic IOC regarding its ability to diagnose CBDS in a population-based setting, and to assess the morbidity associated with the investigation.All patients operated on for gallstone disease between 2003 and 2005 in the county of Uppsala in Sweden, a county with a population of 302,000 in December 2004, were registered prospectively. The outcome of cholangiography was validated against the postoperative clinical course.1171 patients were registered, and among these IOC was performed in 1117 patients (95%). Common bile duct stones were found in 134 patients (11%). One perforation of the common bile duct caused by the IOC catheter was recorded. Sensitivity was 97%, specificity 99%, negative predictive value 99%, positive predictive value 95%, and overall accuracy 99%. In 7 of the 134 cases where IOC indicated CBDS, no stones could be verified on exploration. In 4 of the 979 cases where IOC was normal, the clinical course indicated overlooked CBDS.Intraoperative cholangiography is a safe and accurate method for detecting common bile duct stones.Is intravenous cholangiography an alternative to the routine per-operative cholangiogram?Ultrasonography, although an accurate method of detecting stones within the gall bladder, is unreliable for the detection of bile duct stones for which per-operative cholangiography remains the standard investigation. Fifty seven patients undergoing elective cholecystectomy had both a pre-operative intravenous cholangiogram and per-operative cholangiography. The pre-operative investigation is shown to be at least as effective in the detection of common bile duct stones and only missed a duct stone in one patient. The substitution of pre-operative intravenous cholangiography for routine per-operative cholangiography would result in a significant reduction in operating time, may provide advance knowledge on the biliary anatomy and would allow advance planning of the likely procedure. It is suggested that pre-operative intravenous cholangiography, carried out on the day of admission, should be considered as a preferred alternative investigation to per-operative cholangiography.Role of intraoperative cholangiography in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The results of a policy of selective cholangiography were assessed in 400 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was performed in 81 patients (20 per cent) of whom 31 (38 per cent) showed definite or possible evidence of stones in the bile duct. Seventeen of the 400 patients underwent intraoperative cholangiography and the majority of these (12) were normal. After a minimum follow-up of 1 year, 17 patients (4 per cent) have had ERCP for suspected residual duct stones. Eight (2 per cent) of these revealed stones and all were successfully treated with sphincterotomy and duct clearance. Preoperative and postoperative ERCP was not associated with mortality or major morbidity. No major duct injury occurred and none was diagnosed within 2 years of operation. Routine intraoperative cholangiography is not a necessary part of laparoscopic cholecystectomy in the presence of an efficient and safe ERCP service.Follow-up of selective endoscopic ultrasonography and/or endoscopic retrograde cholangiography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective study of 300 patients.This prospective study evaluated the selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the context of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Between 1993 and 1998, LC for symptomatic gallstones was indicated in 300 consecutive patients. In order to diagnose and treat choledocholithiasis preoperatively, we performed, on the basis of preoperative criteria, ERC in "high-risk" patients and EUS in "intermediate-risk" patients. Choledocholithiasis was treated by preoperative biliary endoscopic sphincterotomy (BES). LC was performed either after the endoscopic procedure or directly in "low-risk" patients.A total of 104 patients (35%) had 118 preoperative procedures: a) EUS (n = 68; feasibility 100%): choledocholithiasis was observed in 14/68 patients (21%); b) ERC (n = 50; feasibility 94%): 36 ERC were indicated on on preoperative criteria, and 14 on the basis of EUS results. Choledocholithiasis was found in 41/ 50 patients (82%) (13/14 patients with positive EUS), 19% of "intermediate-risk" patients, and 78% of "high-risk" patients; ERC failed in three patients who had no choledocholithiasis on subsequent intraoperative cholangiography (IOC). Clearance of the common bile duct (CBD) was achieved after BES in 41/41 patients. There was no mortality; complications occurred in 4/ 300 patients (1%). No retained stones were found in patients of any of the three groups, after a mean follow-up of 32 months.Combined endoscopic and laparoscopie management of cholecystolithiasis and choledocholithiasis is a viable option and is optimized by the use of EUS.Predictive value and main determinants of abnormal features of intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The major issue with intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) is whether its diagnostic accuracy for common bile duct (CBD) stones matches that of other diagnostic procedures, and thus, whether it will become a routine diagnostic procedure. The current study aimed to address the main determinants of CBD stone diagnosis in IOC among an Iranian population.In a retrospective review database-based study conducted in Taleghani Hospital in Tehran between 2006 and 2008, baseline data and perioperative information of 2060 patients (male to female ratio 542:1518, mean age 53.7 years) who were candidates for cholecystectomy and underwent concomitant IOC for confirming CBD stones were reviewed. The predictive power of this procedure for diagnosis of abnormal biliary ducts with the focus on biliary stones was determined.Overall mortality and morbidity following cholecystectomy in the study population were 0.6% and 2.6%, respectively. Both early mortality and morbidity due to cholecystectomy were higher in male than female. The prevalence of CBD stones in IOC was 3.4% (5.2% in male and 2.8% in female, P=0.008). Among those without gallstones, 8.7% had CBD stones and only 3.1% had concomitant gallstones and CBD stones. The main predictors of stone appearance as an abnormal feature of IOC during cholecystectomy were: advanced age (OR=1.022, P=0.001), male gender (OR=1.498, P=0.050), history of abdominal surgery (OR=1.543, P=0.040) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (OR=5.400, P<0.001).IOC is a safe and accurate method for the assessment of bile duct anatomy and stones. Therefore, the routine use of IOC within cholecystectomy seems reasonable and is recommended.[Retrograde cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic sphincterotomy for biliary lithiasis. Prospective evaluation in surgical circle].Between January 1982 and 1987, 772 consecutive endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographic examinations (ERCP) were performed in 673 consecutive patients suspected of having biliary tract lithiasis (mean age: 62.1 +/- 18.2 years). Two hundred and thirty-two were emergency procedures (30%). Endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed for common bile duct stones (CBDS) in 257 cases (38.0%), of whom 143 (55.6%) had undergone previous cholecystectomy. In 17.2% of cases, ERCP was either a complete (7.8%) or partial (9.4%) failure. In 124 patients for whom microlithiasis was not identified by sonography and who underwent operation, sensitivity and specificity of ERCP was 70% and 87%, respectively. Of 266 patients in whom ES was attempted, 96.6% were achieved and the common bile duct was cleared of stones in 72% of cases. Nineteen percent of patients required two or more attempts at extraction. After ERCP without ES, mortality and morbidity rates were 0.96 and 3.6% respectively. After ES, complications followed in 12.1% of patients and 3.9% died. Mortality and morbidity directly related to ES were 3.1% and 11.3% respectively. The most common complications after ERCP were acute cholangitis and pancreatitis, whereas after ES, acute cholangitis was the most common complication, followed by hemorrhage and duodenocholechocal perforations. These complications occurred independently of age and previous cholecystectomy but was closely related to stone clearance (P < 0.05). Seventy-one patients (10.5%) required operation. Twenty-nine patients underwent emergency surgery for complications with a mortality rate of 17%. Forty-two patients underwent elective surgery for retained CBDS after ES without any mortality.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Common bile duct stones after laparoscopic cholecystectomy and its treatment. The role of ultrasound and intravenous and intraoperative cholangiography.In the present work we recount our experience in handling common bile duct stones (CBDS) in our first 100 cases of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. In the first 50 cases our diagnostic procedures involved the use of ultrasound exploration and intravenous cholangiotomography 48 h before laparoscopic surgery. We found three cases of residual CBDS. One of the cases was treated by means of ERCP. The other two cases were resolved by carrying out a transparietohepatic cholangiography after the ERCP procedure failed. After this experience, we changed our strategy, introducing the intraoperative cholangiography in the cases with an unclear diagnosis. With this new approach, no residual CBDS occurred in the following 50 cases. These findings demonstrate the following: (1) In our hands, intravenous cholangiography is not more effective than ultrasound exploration in resolving dubious cases. (2) These dubious cases are more effectively diagnosed by means of selective intraoperative cholangiography. (3) When CBDS is treated by transparietohepatic cholangiography it proves to be less uncomfortable for the patient than ERCP and, as we found, even more efficient in removing the stones, although our experience is based on only two cases.[Is it necessary to perform routine intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy?].The intraoperative cholangiography was carried out in 361 patients with gallstone disease. In 293 (81.16%) patients cholangiography was normal, in 68 (18.83%) was abnormal. Thirty-six (9.97%) patients had pre-operative asymptomatic common bile duct calculi and 20 (5.54%) patients had confirmed suspect of common bile duct calculi during cholangiography. Twelve (3.32%) patients were false-positive and one (0.27%) was false-negative. It is discussed the value of routine intraoperative cholangiography in patients with gallstone disease.Laparoscopic ultrasonography is a complement to cholangiography for the detection of choledocholithiasis at laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Intraoperative cholangiography and laparoscopic ultrasonography are both used in the detection of common bile duct stones at laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The aim of this prospective study was to determine whether laparoscopic ultrasonography has an alternative or a complementary role with respect to cholangiography in achieving this end.The biliary trees of 900 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy were examined routinely by the two methods. The diagnostic power of each investigation and of the two techniques in combination was evaluated. The statistical non-random concordance between the two methods was also determined.Laparoscopic ultrasonography was performed in all 900 patients. Cholangiography was performed in 762 (85 per cent). The mean (range) duration was 9.8 (4-21) min for laparoscopic ultrasonography and 17.6 (7-42) min for cholangiography. For the detection of common bile duct stones, with a kappa coefficient of 0.57 (95 per cent confidence interval (c.i.) 0.43 to 0.71), the non-random concordance between the two methods was considered to be fair to good. The sensitivity of laparoscopic ultrasonography was 0.80 (95 per cent c.i. 0.65 to 0.91) and its specificity was 0.99 (95 per cent c.i. 0.98 to 1.00). The respective values for cholangiography were 0.75 (95 per cent c.i. 0.59 to 0.87) and 0.99 (95 per cent c.i. 0.98 to 1.00). The examinations combined had a sensitivity of 0.95 (95 per cent c.i. 0.86 to 0.99) and a specificity of 0.98 (95 per cent c.i. 0.96 to 1.00).Laparoscopic ultrasonography and intraoperative cholangiography are complementary, as the combination of both methods maximizes the intraoperative detection of choledocholithiasis.Choledocholithiasis: failure of routine operative cholangiography to improve results.Intraductal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of bile duct stones: when and whom?Biliary intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS) is highly sensitive in visualizing bile duct stones (BDS). Indications for IDUS, however, in cases of suspected BDS have not yet been established. The aim of the present study was to elucidate adequate indications for IDUS in cases that undergo endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) due to suspected BDS.A total of 213 patients who were suspected of having BDS were included in this retrospective study. The patients were divided into two groups: Group A in which BDS was visualized by ERCP; and Group B in which BDS was demonstrated only by IDUS. Comparison between the groups was carried out.ERCP successfully visualized BDS in 166 patients. Forty-seven patients underwent IDUS, which revealed BDS and biliary sludge in 12 and eight patients, respectively. The diameter of the largest stone was 13  6 mm in Group A and 5  1 mm in Group B (P < 0.001). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of ERCP in the diagnosis of BDS were 93%, 100%, and 94%, respectively. The sensitivity was influenced by the size of BDS: 100% in cases of stones  8 mm in size, but 74% in those with stones < 8 mm. In cases with stones < 8 mm, the sensitivity was significantly affected by the bile duct diameter ( 12 mm vs < 12 mm, P < 0.05). When ERCP fails to visualize stones in patients with suspected BDS, IDUS is recommended, especially in those with a bile duct  12 mm in diameter.Cholecystectomy without operative cholangiography. Implications for common bile duct injury and retained common bile duct stones.This study evaluated the selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the context of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) while minimizing the use of operative cholangiography.There has been a long-standing debate between routine and selective operative cholangiography that has resurfaced with LC.Prospective data were collected on the first 1300 patients undergoing LC at McGill University. Preoperative indications for ERCP were recorded, radiologic findings were standardized, and technical points for a safe LC were emphasized.A total of 106 patients underwent 127 preoperative ERCPs. Fifty patients were found to have choledocholithiasis (3.8%), and clearance of the common bile duct (CBD) with endoscopic sphincterotomy was achieved in 45 patients. The other five patients underwent open cholecystectomy with common duct exploration. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was attempted in only 54 patients (4.2%), 6 of whom demonstrated choledocholithiasis. Forty-nine postoperative ERCPs were performed in 33 patients and stones were detected in 17 (1.3%), with a median follow-up time of 22 months. Endoscopic duct clearance was successful in all of these. The incidence of CBD injury was 0.38%, and a policy of routine operative cholangiography might only have led to earlier recognition of duct injury in one case. The rate of complication for all ERCPs was 9% and the associated median duration of the hospital stay was 4 days. The median duration of the hospital stay after open CBD exploration was 13 days.LC can be performed safely without routine IOC. The selective use of preoperative and postoperative ERCP will clear the CBD of stones in 92.5% of patients.The detection of bile duct stones in suspected biliary pancreatitis: comparison of MRCP, ERCP, and intraductal US.Early ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy for stone extraction can benefit the prognosis in patients with severe biliary pancreatitis, but are associated with complications. The ability to identify choledocholithiasis by noninvasive means in biliary pancreatitis is limited. The aim of this study was evaluation of the ability of MRCP to detect choledocholithiasis in patients with acute biliary pancreatitis. In addition, we investigated whether intraductal US (IDUS) could help manage these patients.Thirty-two patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis were studied prospectively. MRCP was performed immediately before ERCP by separate blinded examiners within 24 h of admission. Wire-guided IDUS was performed during ERCP within 72 h of admission, regardless of the results of MRCP. Using endoscopic extraction of a stone as the reference standard, the diagnostic yield of MRCP was compared with transabdominal US, CT, ERCP, and IDUS.The sensitivity of US, CT, MRCP, ERCP, and IDUS for identifying choledocholithiasis was 20.0%, 40.0%, 80.0%, 90.0%, and 95.0%, respectively. The overall agreement between MRCP and ERCP was 90.6% for choledocholithiasis (kappa= 0.808, p < 0.01). The sensitivity of MRCP for detecting choledocholithiasis decreased with dilated bile ducts (bile duct diameter > 10 mm, 72.7% vs 88.9%). The combination of ERCP and IDUS improved accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.MRCP can be used to select patients with biliary pancreatitis who require ERCP. IDUS may be applied in the management of biliary pancreatitis if ERCP is performed.Operative cholangiography: a perspective.Two hundred and eighty-seven patients having operative cholangiograms were identified from a prospective study of 346 patients undergoing surgery for gallstones. Forty-two patients (14.6%) had filling defects and bile duct (BD) exploration. The false-positive exploration rate was 2.8%. Eight patients (2.8%) had unexpected BD calculi with no abnormality in pre-operative liver function tests or ultrasound. If a policy of selective operative cholangiography is pursued, then failure to detect a small number of duct stones must be expected, although unnecessary duct exploration is likely to be eliminated. The clinical significance of undetected BD calculi remains debatable.Must ERCP Be routinely performed if choledocholithiasis is suspected?To evaluate the results of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the diagnosis and treatment of those patients suspected of harboring bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).A total of 1,235 consecutive LCs performed between 1991 and 1997 were studied prospectively. ERCP was performed to explore the common bile duct (CBD) preoperatively when choledocholithiasis was suspected on the basis of clinical, analytical or echographical data.ERCPs were performed in 268 patients: unsuccessful CBD evaluation in 3%; dilated CBD without lithiasis in 13%, and normal exploration in 37% (99 patients). CBD stones were found in 46% (124 patients), and endoscopic sphincterotomy was then performed and stone extraction attempted. Endoscopic therapy achieved 92.8% successful removal of CBD stones (115 patients). There was no ERCP-related mortality and the morbidity rate was 6%. Retained CBD stones have been observed in 7 cases after ERCP-LC; all of them have been successfully treated by ERCP.A combined approach to bile duct stones with selective use of ERCP followed by LC is a good therapeutical alternative. Nevertheless, the usual selection criteria for ERCP may lead to unnecessary exploration. It appears to be necessary to modify the current diagnostic and therapeutic strategy.EUS versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiography for patients with intermediate probability of bile duct stones: a prospective randomized trial.Factors affecting diagnostic accuracy and comparison of patients in the follow-up period for negative outcomes are not thoroughly investigated in a randomized trial.Our purpose was to compare diagnostic accuracy, complications, and number of interventions.Prospective, unicentric, single-blind, randomized study.Single tertiary referral university hospital.One hundred twenty patients with intermediate risk for common bile duct (CBD) stones were randomized to either an EUS-first, endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC)-second (n = 60) versus an ERC-only (n = 60) procedure.EUS, ERC, sphincterotomy, and balloon sweeping of CBD when needed.Sensitivity of EUS versus ERC, factors affecting diagnostic capability, complications, total number of endoscopic procedures.The sensitivity and specificity of ERC were 75% (95% CI, 42%-93%) and 100% (95% CI, 95%-100%), respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS were 91% (95% CI, 59%-99%) and 100% (95% CI, 95%-100%), respectively. EUS is more sensitive than ERC in detecting stones smaller than 4 mm (90% vs 23%, P < .01). Although not significant, there was a trend for an increased number of endoscopic procedures in the ERC group compared with the EUS group (98 vs 83). The post-ERC pancreatitis rate was 6 in 120 (5%) in all study patients, and the post-ERC pancreatitis rate in patients with an undilated CBD was 5 of 53 (9.43%). The independent factors for post-ERC pancreatitis are undilated CBD (risk ratio [RR] 6.320; 95% CI, 1.703-11.524, P = .009), allocation into the ERC group (RR 2.107; 95% CI, 1.330-3.339, P = .02), female sex (RR 1.803; 95% CI, 1.155-2.813, P = .03), and age less than 40 years (RR 1.888; 95% CI, 1.245-2.863, P = .01). Kaplan-Meier analysis revealed higher rate of negative outcome in the ERC group than in the EUS group (P = .049, log-rank test).The EUS-first approach is not associated with further risk for subsequent endoscopic procedures. Patients with an undilated CBD should be investigated by the EUS-first approach to prevent post-ERC pancreatitis.Intraoperative ultrasonography versus cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective comparative study.The purpose of this study was to compare the functional utility of intraoperative ultrasonography (IOUS) and cholangiography (IOC) during a laparoscopic cholecystectomy for the treatment of gallstone disease.A prospective study comparing IOUS and IOC was carried out in 65 patients. Intraoperative ultrasonography was conducted first using a 7.5-MHz linear array probe. After IOUS, IOC was then conducted in all patients. The respective usefulness of IOUS and IOC in the identification of gallstones, detection of hepatobiliary structures, and demonstration of congenital anomalies was then compared.Intraoperative ultrasonography was successful in all 65 patients, and IOC was successful only in 54. The time required for IOUS was significantly shorter (p < 0.0001) than for IOC. Intraoperative ultrasonography imaged the hepatic ducts and their confluence, the common hepatic duct, the common bile duct, and the ampulla of Vater in 97, 100, 97, and 51% of cases, respectively. Intraoperative cholangiography, on the other hand, depicted these structures in 85, 89, 100, and 94% of cases, respectively. Intraoperative ultrasonography demonstrated the cystic duct and its confluence in 94% of cases. Biliary anomalies were identified by IOUS in 12 patients and by IOC in 13. Intraoperative ultrasonography could detect the hilar vascular structures in most patients and visualized anomalies of the hepatic arteries in 5 patients. In this series, 5 patients had choledocholithiasis. The sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracies in identifying these bile duct stones were 80, 98, 80, 98, and 97% by IOUS, and 80, 97, 67, 98, and 95% by IOC, respectively.Intraoperative ultrasonography is superior to cholangiography with respect to its safety, shorter examination period, and ease of administration in all patients. In addition, IOUS is also better for identifying subtle anatomic detail. Intraoperative ultrasonography compares favorably with IOC in terms of utility in exploring bile ducts for stones. Intraoperative ultrasonography is an effective procedure for biliary exploration during a laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Endoscopic sphincterotomy in 100 patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: ultrasound evaluation.The aim of the study was to determine to what extent ultrasonography may monitor the process of sphincterotomy and its effectiveness. The study also aimed at determining the sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detecting choledocholithiasis, in comparison with the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Between January 1995 and June 2001, endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed on 100 patients with suspected synchronous choledocholithiasis in preparation for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The main parameters evaluated in the ultrasonography image included the breadth of the common bile duct and absence or presence of concrements in bile ducts before and after sphincterotomy.Applied before the endoscopic operation, ultrasonography revealed choledocholithiasis in 58 patients and dilatation of the common bile duct in 95 patients. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography confirmed choledocholithiasis in 74 patients, after sphincterotomy concrements were removed in 63 persons. In 26 patients sphincterotomy was performed for stenosis of Vater's papilla. Patients with the breadth of the duct > 10 mm, were referred to a check-up examination.Compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography correctly specifies the breadth of the bile duct and properly monitors the process of endoscopic sphincterotomy, but is less accurate in determining the occurrence of choledocholithiasis, and sensitivity in the test amounted to 73%, and specificity of the examination--84.5%.Comparison of cholangiography and ultrasonography in the operative screening of the common bile duct.A prospective evaluation of the diagnostic work-up before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prerequisite for successful laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the exclusion of potential risks such as cholangiolithiasis or anatomical malformations. As there is no general agreement regarding the appropriate preoperative diagnostic work-up, a comparative study of different diagnostic methods was carried out.In 180 consecutive patients admitted to a community hospital for cholecystectomy due to symptomatic cholecystolithiasis, a prospective comparison was carried out of the diagnostic accuracy of patient history, physical examination, laboratory tests, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, intravenous cholangiography, ultrasonography, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Measurement of the diameter of the common bile duct was found to be a reliable method as a single noninvasive parameter for diagnosing cholangiolithiasis (sensitivity 100%, specificity 93%), with good predictive power (positive predictive value 0.7, negative predictive value 1.0). The best accuracy achieved noninvasively and without sonography was with a combination of positive patient history and gamma-glutamyl transferase findings (sensitivity 58%, specificity 84%, positive predictive value 0.37, negative predictive value 0.93). ERCP detected additional cholangiolithiasis in 19 of 139 patients (13.7%) and anatomical malformations in three patients. In all 19 patients, the bile ducts were cleared of stones endoscopically within 24 hours, prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Among the 163 patients primarily assigned to laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the protocol diagnostic work-up, including ERCP, allocated three patients (1.8%) to open surgery. Conversion from laparoscopic cholecystectomy to open cholecystectomy occurred in a further two of 158 patients (1.3%).These results show that routine ultrasonography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be recommended in order to determine the diameter of the common bile duct. In patients with a ductal diameter of more than 6 mm, ERCP should be performed. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be carried out within 24 hours after ERCP and papillotomy.Evaluation of perioperative cholangiography in one thousand laparoscopic cholecystectomies.We analyzed a teaching institution's experience with intra-operative cholangiography (IOCG) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and established an algorithm for their timing and use. The records of all patients undergoing LC during a five year period were reviewed. Patients with a history of jaundice or pancreatitis, abnormal bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase, or radiographic evidence suggestive of choledocholithiasis were considered "at risk" for common bile duct stones (CBDS). The remaining patients were considered to be at low "risk." LC was attempted on 1002 patients during the study period and successfully completed on 941 (94% of the time). The major complication rate was 3.1% and the common bile duct injury rate 0.1%. Eighty eight (9.5%) patients underwent ERCP, 67 in the preoperative period and 19 in the postoperative period. IOCG was attempted in 272 (24%) patients and completed in 234 for a success rate of 86%. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOCG) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were equivalent in the detection of CBDSs Twelve of the 21 patients (57%) with IOCG positive for stones underwent successful laparoscopic clearance of the common duct, and did not require postop. ERCP. No patients were converted to an open procedure for common bile duct exploration. Because postoperative ERCP was 100% successful in clearing the common duct, reoperation for retained common bile duct stones was not necessary. IOCG is an alternative procedure to ERCP for patients at risk with biochemical, radiological, or clinical evidence of choledocholithiasis. The incidence of CBDS in low-risk patients is 1.7%, a risk that does not warrant routine cholangiography. Preoperative ERCP is recommended in cases of cholangitis unresponsive to antibiotics, suspicion of carcinoma, and biliary pancreatitis unresponsive to supportive care. Although IOCG leads to a similar percentage of nontherapeutic studies as preoperative ERCP, it often allows for one procedure therapy.Selective per-operative cholangiography and scoring method for selection.A prospective clinical study was undertaken over a period of 3 years on a series of 210 consecutive cases of gall stones to review a selective policy for per-operative cholangiography (PC). All patients had elective cholecystectomy and routine PC. A scoring method (SM) based on pre and per-operative surgical criteria was adopted to determine the necessity of PC before this was attempted. The study revealed that PC was indicated in 64 cases (30.5%) only. Of these 64 patients 20 had abnormal cholangiograms of which 18 proved positive on exploration. There were two false positive results (0.95%) of PC but no false negative result. Of 146 patients (69.5%) not clinically indicated for routine PC, 145 had normal cholangiograms and one had a small (5 mm diameter) silent stone (0.47%) in the Common Bile Duct (CBD). The scoring method failed to predict this case of silent stone. PC was technically unsatisfactory in 4 cases (1.9%). Thus by adopting the selective policy X-rays could have been avoided in 69.5% cases in which only a small silent stone would have been overlooked. However, this stone could have passed into the duodenum spontaneously or else it could have been removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy had it caused any symptoms. It is concluded that routine PC is not always necessary, a selective policy may be preferred and a scoring method may be used as a guide for selection of the cases.[Ultrasonics and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Correlation in biliopancreatic pathology].[Comparison of laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomies. Results of a prospective study].Prospective evaluation of the results of laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography to investigate choledocholithiasis and detect variations in biliary anatomy during laparoscopic cholecystectomies.The biliary trees of 600 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy were routinely explored by laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography.Laparoscopic ultrasound was performed in all 600 cases. Cholangiography was performed in 498 (83%). Laparoscopic ultrasound required less time than cholangiography: 10.2 minutes versus 17.9 minutes (P=0.0001). Common bile duct stones were detected intraoperatively in 40 cases (7%). Both methods were equally effective. The sensitivity of laparoscopic ultrasound was 80% and its specificity 99%. For cholangiography these values were 75% and 98% respectively. For laparoscopic ultrasound, false positives and false negatives were noted in the first 45 cases of individual trainees. Nevertheless, cholangiography showed 30 anatomical anomalies and laparoscopic ultrasound only 15.Laparoscopic ultrasound can be performed rapidly and in all cases. Results are comparable to cholangiography in the detection of common duct stones. Individual training is necessary to optimize efficacy. Anatomical anomalies are often missed.Comparison of CT duodeno-cholangiopancreatography to ERCP for assessing biliary obstruction.The authors have developed a CT protocol, CT duodeno-cholangiopancreatography (CDCP), which is performed during a single contrast-enhanced phase, proceeding cranially, allowing enhancement of the pancreas during its parenchymal phase followed by enhancement of the liver during its portal-venous phase. This retrospective pilot study evaluates CDCP compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as a diagnostic tool for assessing the cause and level of biliary obstruction. Forty-one patients with jaundice underwent CDCP and ERCP between October 2002 and May 2004. Pathologic confirmation was obtained in 31 of the 41 (76%) patients. The sensitivity, specificity, and kappa values of CDCP and ERCP compared with pathology were calculated for tumors and stones. Pathology-proven cases included 7 cases of stones, 23 tumors, and 1 other cause of obstruction. The overall level of agreement of diagnoses between CDCP and pathology was 29 of 31 (93.5%); that between CDCP and ERCP was 36 of 41 (88%). Comparing CDCP to pathology for tumors, the sensitivity was 100%, the specificity was 89%, and the kappa was 0.92 (95% CI 0.76-1.0). For stone detection, CDCP had a sensitivity of 86%, a specificity of 100%, and a kappa value of 0.90 (95% CI 0.72-1.0). For level of obstruction of the common bile duct, comparing CDCP to ERCP, observations agreed in 31 of the 36 (86%) cases; for the pancreatic duct, observations agreed in 24 of the 25 (96%) cases. CDCP is a noninvasive diagnostic tool that can be used to assess the cause and level of obstruction. A blinded prospective study would be valuable to further assess the merits of CDCP.Intraoperative imaging of the biliary tree. Sonography vs. operative cholangiography.The accepted technique for diagnosing choledocholithiasis at the time of cholecystectomy is operative cholangiography. Reports in the surgical literature suggest that intraoperative ultrasound can replace operative cholangiography in the accurate detection of common duct stones. This prospective study was performed jointly by radiologists and surgeons together in the operating room. Twenty-one patients underwent intraoperative ultrasonography and operative cholangiography at the time of cholecystectomy. In the 16 cases in which both studies were adequate, there were 11 in which no stones were seen on either; three in which stones were seen on both; and two in which stones were diagnosed by sonography alone. In one of these latter cases, the stones were confirmed, making the cholangiogram falsely negative. In the other case, no stones were found so we presume that sonography was falsely positive. Although this technique can be accurate and useful, it is technically demanding, even for an experienced sonologist. We feel that this technique is likely to be of benefit only to the surgeon with considerable ultrasound training, expertise, and motivation.Laparoscopic management of common bile duct stones. A multi-institutional SAGES study. Society of American Gastrointestinal Endoscopic Surgeons.Laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (CBDE) was the subject of a multi-institutional study on 226 patients from 19 major hospital centers. Female patients predominated (2.3:1); the average age was 54; 75% of cases were chronic, and the remainder were acute. Although 97% had preoperative ultrasonograms, only 12% showed a stone in the dilated common bile duct. The alkaline phosphatase was elevated in 41% and the serum bilirubin in 28% of cases. Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography with sphincterotomy (ERC-ES) was performed in 8.5%; there was a successful stone extraction in less than half the cases. Cholangiography was performed in 99.5%, and in 94% of those cases, stones were found. In 83% of cases, stones were removed through the transcystic approach, and in 17% removal was throughout the CBD. In the majority of cases, the choledochoscope and wire basket (34%), irrigation (33%), or a combination of both was employed. In the transcystic group, 5% were converted to open procedures due to technical difficulty, as contrasted with the trans-CBD route, where the conversion rate was 19%. There were two ductal injuries. Minor complications occurred in 5.7% within 24 h; there was one death (0.4%). Within 30 days, the morbidity rate was 7% and there were no deaths. Retained stones were discovered in 2.6% of cases. Laparoscopic CBDE is a feasible approach for CBD stones which permits a definitive procedure in one stage, without pre- or postoperative ES. It is a skill which should be mastered by the biliary surgeon. Further improvement in instrumentation and technique should make the laparoscopic approach not only comparable but preferable to the standard open choledocholithotomy.Routine magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and intra-operative cholangiogram in the evaluation of common bile duct stones.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) is a safe and sensitive investigation for the imaging of common bile duct pathology. When used to exclude common bile duct (CBD) stones, MRCP may obviate the need for intra-operative cholangiogram (IOC). In this prospective study, we looked at the single centre results of patients who underwent cholecystectomy with IOC following pre-operative MRCP.Over a period of 18 months, 69 patients (24 male and 45 female; mean age 59 years [range, 19-86 years]) were investigated by MRCP prior to cholecystectomy. All patients underwent IOC. Inclusion criteria for MRCP consisted of derangement of liver function tests and/or history of jaundice in cases of ultrasound-proven cholelithiasis.Sixteen patients had suspected stones or filling defects on MRCP; all but two of these were confirmed to be stones on IOC. In only one patient was a stone visualised on IOC and not seen on MRCP.MRCP may be the only pre-operative investigation needed for exclusion of CBD stones, obviating the necessity for IOC.Diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Relations between historical, laboratory, operative, and peroperative roentgen data.Operative cholangiography: a reappraisal based on a review of 400 cholangiograms.In the period 1957-72, 426 patients were operated upon for calculous disease of the biliary tract. For various reasons pre-exploratory operative cholangiography was not performed in 26 patients, but in the remaining 400 patients this examination was the major determinant as to whether or not the common duct contained calculi, and hence required exploration. Analysis of this series of 400 patients shows that without operative cholangiography (a) ductal stones would have been overlooked in 16 of the 78 patients with stones in the common duct (4 per cent of the whole series; 20-5 per cent of those with stones in the common bile duct); (b) exploration of the common duct would have been required in a further 48 (15 per cent) of the 322 patients without stones in the common duct, giving a positive yield from operative cholangiography in 64 patients (16 per cent) in the whole series. Negative exploration of the common duct was performed in only 31 patients, that is 29 per cent of the patients whose duct was explored but only 7-8 per cent of the whole group. The criteria by which an operative cholangiogram should be assessed were re-evaluated in the light of the findings in these 400 patients. In general the criteria of normality previously described were affirmed, and the following points established: a. In the absence of a filling defect the diameter of the duct is the most important indication of the presence of a stone. b. There is a statistically significant increase in the diameter of the common duct with age, and though not great this could, if neglected, give rise to error in the interpretation of the cholangiogram in younger patients. c. Even within the overall normal range of duct diameter (less than 12 mm) the wider the duct, the greater is the chance of it harbouring a stone. d. Impaired flow of contrast material into the duodenum is significantly related to duct diameter. e. Impaired flow of contrast material into the duodenum and failure to delineate the terminal segment of the duct tend to occur together; they may occur in a duct free of stones and if they are the only abnormality the examination should be repeated after the inhalation of amyl nitrite. This study confirms that operative cholangiography is the most accurate method at present available of determining whether or not the common duct contains a stone (or stones), and hence requires exploration.Selective use of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the management of suspected common bile duct (CBD) stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy is common. The associated morbidity can be significant. The present study determines significant predictors of CBD stones and improves the selection of patients for preoperative ERCP.All preoperative ERCP for suspected CBD stones in the year 1998 were studied retrospectively. Univariate and multivariate analyses of a number of clinical, biochemical and radiological variables were carried out to determine the best predictors of CBD stones.A total of 112 patients had successful preoperative ERCP. Sixty-one per cent of these were negative for stones and the morbidity was 9%. Univariate analysis revealed the following variables as predictors: cholangitis (P = 0.006), abnormal serum bilirubin > or = 3 days (P = 0.002), serum alkaline phosphatase > or = 130 U/L (P = 0.002), deranged liver function tests (P = < 0.001) and CBD diameter > or = 8 mm (P = 0.009) with positive predictive values of 80%, 68%, 49%, 38% and 52%, respectively. Multivariate analysis revealed the model with the best ability to discriminate for CBD stones (P = 0.0005) was cholangitis, abnormal serum bilirubin for > or = 3 days and CBD diameter > or = 8 mm. The best predictors from this study had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 27%.The predictors of CBD stones are imprecise. Until laparoscopic exploration of CBD becomes widely available, ERCP prior to cholecystectomy will remain popular. The use of stricter selection criteria can reduce the number of negative preoperative ERCP.[Retrospective evaluation of 500 endoscopic cholangiopancreatographies performed at the Instituto Nacional de la Nutricin "Salvador Zubiran"].We evaluated 500 endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographies (ERCP) performed on 422 patients during a 5-year period in the Gastrointestinal Endoscopy Department, Instituto Nacional de la Nutricin Salvador Zubirn, Mxico, D.F. ERCP combines endoscopic and radiologic techniques in order to obtain high quality opacification of pancreatic and biliary ducts. The rate of success for cannulation was 90%; desired duct opacification was possible in 89%. The most frequent indication for ERCP was to establish the differential diagnosis for jaundice; biliary stones in the common bile duct was the most frequent diagnosis, followed by normal biliary ducts. Pancreatography was normal in 74% of patients. ERCP complications were detected in 5.6%; fever and transient pain was the most common complaint in 1.6%. Mortality attributable to the procedure was 0.8%. From histological corroboration of cases by surgery or postmortem studies, diagnostic sensitivity was 92%, specificity 76%, positive predictive value 96% and a prevalence of 89%. We conclude that ERCP is highly sensitive and specific in diagnosing bilio-pancreatic-duodenal disease. Our results are comparable to other's experiences published throughout the world.Selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography to facilitate laparoscopic cholecystectomy without cholangiography. A review of 1139 consecutive cases.The aim of this study was to show that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography.We performed a retrospective analysis of 1139 consecutive patients (376 men and 763 women with an average age of 51.4 years) who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy between 1991 and 1999. In all, 227 patients (20%) were selected to undergo preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) on the basis of four criteria for risk of stones.ERCP allowed us to make a diagnosis of biliary stones in 53.3% of the selected patients. Extraction of the stones was successful in 97% of the cases. In 14% of cases, ERCP was normal; in 32.7%, some useful diagnostic information was obtained. There were three complications (pancreatitis) following endoscopy (complication rate, 1.3%). Laparoscopic cholecystectomy was successful in 92% of patients. The postoperative morbidity rate was 3.2% (major complications, 0.5%). There were no deaths. During a follow-up period ranging from 3 to 97 months, six patients (0.6%) were found to have residual biliary stones.This study confirms the hypothesis that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography.Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography: therapeutic impact in a general population of patients needing a cholecystectomy.The place of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) before open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy remains controversial. Most of the reports study highly selected series of patients and therefore do not give a survey of the actual situation in a general population. We describe here the therapeutic impact of preoperative ERCP in a continuous cohort of patients needing a cholecystectomy.Data concerning a 2-year continuous and unselected series of 452 patients undergoing cholecystectomy were evaluated.Two hundred ninety-three patients (65%) presented with a chronic symptomatic biliary lithiasis and 159 patients (35%) with a complicated biliary lithiasis. A preoperative ERCP was performed in 206 patients, all presenting with a suspicion of associated lithiasis of the common bile duct (CBD). An endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed in 106 patients: 44 patients presented with CBD stones (9.7%), all successfully cleared by endoscopy. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy has been attempted in 367 patients (81%) and successfully performed in 333 patients (74%). Laparotomy as a first-choice procedure was performed in 85 patients (19%). Surgical choledochotomy was never performed. Postoperative ERCP was needed in 4 patients (0.88%) and in only 1 of them for a retained CBD stone (0.22%).In a continuous series of patients needing a cholecystectomy, preoperative ERCP was performed on the basis of suspected CBD disorders. It allows CBD stone detection and extraction in almost 10% of the patients and avoids peroperative CBD exploration, with a very low rate of retained stones after surgery. The association of preoperative ERCP with subsequent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (when feasible) offers the patient a quick recovery and a short hospital stay.[Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography--a 4-year retrospective study].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) may lead to serious complications. Recently, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) has been introduced as a diagnostic alternative to ERCP. This study was initiated to document the diagnostic and therapeutic capabilities of ERCP, enabling us to compare the two techniques. Results of 567 ERCP procedures in 371 patients were reviewed. Bile duct stones were the most frequent indication for the procedure (66%). Normal duct systems (37%) and common bile duct stones (35%) were the most frequent findings. Stone extraction was performed in 97 patients. In 18 patients minor stones were left behind and in six patients open choledocholithotomy was performed. Procedure related mortality was 0.3% and 0.8% in the diagnostic and therapeutic group respectively. Five patients developed serious pancreatitis, and duodenal perforation complicated two procedures. 56% of the procedures were diagnostic and could probably have been replaced by MRCP if this technique had been available during the study period.The role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in management of patients recovering from acute biliary pancreatitis in the laparoscopic era.Traditionally an episode of acute biliary pancreatitis (ABP) is an indication for direct imaging of the biliary tree. The optimal approach may vary according to local expertise, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is the most common. The fact that the incidence of choledocholithiasis in patients recovering from ABP varies between 3 and 33% raises a question about the necessity of visualizing the biliary tree in all patients recovering from ABP.In order to evaluate this policy, we reviewed 48 ERCPs performed on patients recovering from ABP who were scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). We checked the correlations between ERCP findings and the severity of pancreatitis, biochemistry values (which were sampled during the acute phase), and ultrasonographic (US) findings.The ERCP demonstrated common bile duct (CBD) stones in 11 (22.9%) patients. US finding of a dilated CBD and maximal aspartate transaminase (AST) values higher than 90 units/l were significantly correlated with CBD stones (a relative risk [RR] of 2.95 with a 95% confidence interval [CI] for a dilated CBD and RR of 3.89 with a 95% CI of 1.18-12.80 for an AST value higher than 90 units/l). No other parameters were significantly correlated with CBD stones.We, therefore, recommend performing a preoperative ERCP only on patients who present with an ultrasonographic finding of CBD dilatation. The correlation to high AST is still to be proven.Proposed criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There has been a dramatic increase in the number of endoscopic retrograde cholangiograms (ERC) performed on patients who are candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The majority of these procedures result in normal findings. This study is an attempt to determine useful clinical criteria and strategy for predicting the presence or absence of common bile duct stones (CBDS) and the need for ERC in patients who are candidates for LC.The observational portion of this study explored laboratory and ultrasound data from 134 consecutive patients who had undergone preoperative ERC, followed by LC, over a 4-year period. The data were then analyzed by multivariate logistic regression to determine the best models for predicting the presence or absence of stones in the common bile duct. Models using gamma glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT), alkaline phophatase (AP), common bile duct diameter (CBDIA), and amylase (AMY) were then evaluated retrospectively in 36 additional patients (validation group).A model based on GGT and common bile duct diameter as positive predictors and amylase as a negative predictor correctly classified 78% of the patients in the validation group. This model resulted in a negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), sensitivity, and specificity of 0.88, 0.68, 0.87, and 0.71, respectively. The model utilizing AP was almost as effective. This model resulted in a NPV, PPV, sensitivity, and specificity of 0.83, 0.67, 0.80, and 0.71, respectively.Although a number of laboratory values and imaging techniques correlate with the presence or absence of CBDS, our study confirms that individually they have poor predictive value. Our data and models suggest that elevated serum amylase is a negative predictor for CBDS. Elevated GGT and/or AP with widened CBDIA and normal AMY strongly suggest the presence of CBDS and the need for preoperative ERC. Elevated GGT, AP, or widened CBDIA with elevated amylase, in the absence of clinical pancreatitis, may suggest that small stones have passed through the ampulla of Vater and that the CBD is generally cleared of stones.[Laparoscopic cholecystectomy and lithiasis of the common bile duct: prospective study on the importance of preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography].Laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the standard treatment of symptomatic gallstones. At present, no consensus has been reached on the diagnostic and therapeutic methods of concomitant common bile duct stones. Systematic preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography followed, if necessary, by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy during the same anesthetic procedure could be a diagnostic and therapeutic alternative for common bile duct stones making possible a laparoscopic cholecystectomy without intraoperative investigation of the common bile duct.One hundred and twenty-five patients underwent a prospective endoscopic ultrasonographic evaluation prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for symptomatic gallstones. Fourty-four patients (35%) had at least one predictive factor for common bile duct stones. Endoscopic ultrasonography and cholecystectomy were performed on the same day. Endoscopic ultrasonography was followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy by the same endoscopist in case of common bile duct stones on endoscopic ultrasonography. Patients were routinely followed up between 3 and 6 months and one year after cholecystectomy.Endoscopic ultrasonography suggested common bile duct stones in 21 patients (17%). Endoscopic ultrasonography identified a stone in 17 of 44 patients (38.6%) with predictor of common bile duct stones and only in 4 of 81 patients (4.9%) without predictor of common bile duct stone. Among these 21 patients, one patient was not investigated with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography because of the high risk of sphincterotomy, 19 patients had a stone removed after sphincterotomy, one patient had no visible stone neither on endoscopic retrograde cholangiography, nor on exploration of the common bile duct after sphincterotomy. Endoscopic ultrasonography was normal in 104 patients (83%). However, two patients in this group were investigated with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography because endoscopic ultrasonography was incomplete in one case and because endoscopic ultrasonography was normal in the second case but a stone in the left hepatic duct was detected by ultrasonography. A stone was removed after endoscopic sphincterotomy in these two patients. In the group of 102 patients without stone, 91 out of 92, continued to be asymptomatic during a median follow-up of 8.5 months. One patient with symptoms one month after cholecystectomy underwent endoscopic sphincterotomy but no stone was found.Systematic preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography followed, if necessary with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy is a diagnostic and therapeutic alternative for common bile duct stones making possible a laparoscopic cholecystectomy without intraoperative investigation of the common bile duct for all patients. This alternative is only justifiable in patients with predictor of common bile duct stones.[Comparative study of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in common duct stones].To compare the diagnostic value study the technique of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in common duct stones.Three hundreds and eighty-four patients suspected common duct stones from August 2005 to October 2007 were undergone abdominal ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP.There was stone in common duct in 370 and no stones in 14 of 384 patients. Ultrasonography indicated stones 268 cases, 8 false positive result was among them. MRCP diagnosed stones in 362 cases and false positive result in 6 cases, ERCP diagnosed stones 370 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP was 70.3% (260/370), 96.2% (356/370) and 100% respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography for common duct stone was little higher, US should be used as a primary checking method. There was higher concordance between MRCP and ERCP for common duct stone. Combination of MRCP and ERCP can improve diagnostic accuracy of common duct stone.Comparison of operative ultrasonography and radiography in screening of the common bile duct for calculi.An analysis of perioperative cholangiography in one thousand laparoscopic cholecystectomies.We undertook this retrospective study to ascertain the proper role of perioperative cholangiography in the management of 1002 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy for symptomatic cholelithiasis.Nine hundred forty-one patients were categorized as being at high or low risk for choledocholithiasis according to the presence or absence of jaundice, pancreatitis, elevated bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase, or radiographic evidence of common bile duct stones (CBDSs).Intraoperative cholangiography (IOCG) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were equivalent in the detection of CBDSs, and laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (CBDE) was successful in 12 of the 21 patients (57%) in whom it was attempted. The ducts of the other 52 patients with CBDSs were successfully cleared by preoperative or postoperative ERCP.Laparoscopic IOCG is successful in detecting CBDS in high-risk patients and half of these ducts can be cleared laparoscopically. The incidence of CBDS in low-risk patients is 1.7%, a risk that does not warrant routine cholangiography. These data suggest ERCP should be reserved for those at-risk individuals in whom IOCG or laparoscopic duct clearance has been unsuccessful.Operative cholangiography: 1,000 cases.[Diagnosis and therapy of biliary calculi. Combined use of ERCP, PTC and endoscopic papillotomy].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and gray-scale abdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of jaundice.Fifty-five patients with suspected obstructive jaundice were studied with both ERCP and abdominal ultrasound. Biliary tract obstruction was documented in 49 patients and parenchymal liver disease in 7. A definite cause of jaundice was demonstrated by ERCP in 45 of 49 patients with biliary tract obstruction but in only 28 of 49 patients by ultrasound. Bile duct dilatation, where present, was detected by ERCP in only 33 of 42 patients. ERCP was particularly effective in patients with common duct stones; common duct calculi and a dilated common duct were detected in 15 of 16 such patients. Dilated bile ducts where present were detected by ultrasound in 22 of 42 patients. Ultrasound was particularly helpful in patients with pancreatic cancer in whom a dilated common duct could not be opacified during ERCP. ERCP and abdominal ultrasound together provide a rapid and safe method of diagnosis in the jaundiced patient with suspected bile duct obstruction.Utility of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the evaluation of idiopathic abdominal pain.We investigated the role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in 86 consecutive patients with idiopathic chronic or recurrent abdominal pain. There were 18 males and 68 females with a mean age of 48 yr. Forty patients (47%) had previous cholecystectomy. Patients were divided into two groups: group I (normal serum alkaline phosphatase and total bilirubin) (n = 52), and group II (elevated serum alkaline phosphatase and/or total bilirubin) (n = 34). Pancreatograms were normal in all patients, including five with pancreas divisum. Cholangiograms were abnormal in 10 of the 34 patients in group II (30%), and in only three of the 52 patients in group I (6%) (p = 0.003). Bile duct stones were present in 18% of the patients in group II, and in none of the patients in group I (p = 0.003). Of the 40 post-cholecystectomy patients, four patients had bile duct stones and five had common bile duct dilation without stones. However, no stones were found in any post-cholecystectomy patients with normal liver tests. Of the 46 patients with gallbladder in situ, two patients with abnormal liver tests had common bile duct stones and two patients had common bile duct dilation without stones. These results indicate that, among patients with idiopathic abdominal pain, cholangiography should be performed primarily in those with abnormal liver tests; however, further investigation with pancreatography is unnecessary.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) has become established as the gold standard in imaging of the biliary tree. Recently, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) has been introduced as a new, non-invasive imaging modality for the detection of bile-duct stones and other pathology related to the biliary tract and pancreas. The aim of this study was to determine how MRCP compared with ERCP in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.A prospective study of 133 patients referred for either ERCP or MRCP was carried out to compare the results of both these methods in determining the presence of choledocholithiasis.18 patients were excluded from the analysis: ERCP was unsuccessful in eight of these patients and MRCP was not possible in the remaining 10 patients. There were six false negative results with MRCP; in five of these the calculi were less than 5 mm in diameter. MRCP showed a sensitivity of 84%, specificity of 96%, positive predictive value of 91%, negative predictive value of 93% and diagnostic accuracy of 92% when compared to ERCP as the gold standard.MRCP has high sensitivity and high specificity for stones greater than 5 mm in diameter and should be performed in preference to ERCP as the first-line investigation in patients with gallstones and abnormal liver function tests in the elective setting. Adoption of this guideline at our institution would result in a 9% reduction in the number of ERCPs performed.Selective endoscopic cholangiography for the detection of common bile duct stones in patients with cholelithiasis.The detection and management of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy continues to be controversial. Several diagnostic and therapeutic strategies have been suggested. These include intraoperative cholangiography, selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography. The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of selective ERCP in detecting CBD stones in patients with cholelithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In a prospective study, patients with cholelithiasis who presented during a 6-year period were assessed on a selective basis with ERCP for suspected CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. ERCP was carried out if the patient had any of the following criteria: a dilated CBD on ultrasound, gallstone pancreatitis, or abnormal liver function tests. Intraoperative cholangiography was not performed in any of the patients. Long-term follow-up was undertaken.The study included 427 patients. On the basis of selective criteria, ERCP was carried out in 41 patients (9.6 %), with confirmed CBD stones in 22 cases (53.7 %). The most useful predictor of CBD stones on ERCP was the presence of a dilated CBD in association with abnormal liver function tests. In this situation, CBD stones were identified in 14 of 17 cases (82 %). Abnormal liver function tests alone had a sensitivity of 50 % (four of eight). All other parameters used in isolation had a lower detection rate. During a median follow-up period of 6 years (range 1-10 years), six of 386 patients (1.6 %) with initially normal imaging and biochemical tests presented again with retained stones. All were successfully managed by ERCP and sphincterotomy. There were no major complications.Preoperative selective ERCP is effective in detecting clinically significant CBD stones. However, there is a high false-negative rate when a single criterion is used to guide therapy. Multivariate analysis of preoperative parameters for risk stratification, in conjunction with other imaging modalities, may make it possible to minimize unnecessary ERCPs.Prospective controlled study of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in patients with suspected common-bileduct lithiasis.Endoscopic sphincterotomy is sometimes done unnecessarily in patients with suspected choledocholithiasis. Our aims were to assess the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and to find out whether endoscopic ultrasonography may help to prevent unnecessary sphincterotomy or surgical explorations.We recruited 119 patients aged 70.4 (SD 16.1) years with strongly suspected choledocholithiasis who presented to our endoscopy unit between January, 1994, and January, 1995. During the same spell of sedation or within 2 h of each other, endoscopic ultrasonography and ERC were carried out by investigators unaware of the patient's history. Endoscopic sphincterotomy with instrumental exploration was then done as the gold standard for the presence or the absence of stones.78 (66%) patients had choledocholithiasis; 17 (14%) had other bileduct diseases; 24 (20%) had a clear bileduct or did not require an invasive endoscopic procedure. The sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography was 93%, specificity 97%, positive predictive value 98%, and negative predictive value 88%. The corresponding values for ERC were 89%, 100%, 100%, and 83%. There were five false-negative cases by endoscopic ultrasonography (of which three were also negative with ERC) and one false-positive. The morbidity rate was 4.1%.We conclude that endoscopic ultrasonography is at least as sensitive as ERC. Endoscopic ultrasonography may prevent inappropriate invasive explorations of the common bileduct.Intraoperative cholangiography in combination with laparoscopic ultrasonography for the detection of occult choledocholithiasis.There is still a debate about the utility of intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) or laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) for detection of occult choledocholithiasis during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The aim of this study was to assess the value of IOC combined with LUS for detection of occult common bile duct (CBD) stones at LC.From Dec 2002 to Aug 2006, 103 patients with moderate risk of CBD stones underwent IOC and LUS simultaneously during LC. The physician teams for the two different procedures were blinded by each other. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, positive likelihood ratio, and negative likelihood ratio were calculated by several contingency tables that cross-tabulated the results of each technique with those of the gold standard.The success rate of IOC and LUS were 91.3% and 100% respectively and the time required for LUS was significantly shorter (P<0.01). The visualization of intrapancreatic part of CBD by IOC (97.3%) was significantly higher than LUS (73.8%). The sensitivities, specificities, accuracies, positive and negative predictive values, positive and negative likelihood rations identifying occult CBD stones were 75.0%, 98.7%, 92.2%, 95.5%, 91.4%, 57.7 and 0.253 by IOC, and 82.1%, 98.7%, 94.2%, 95.8%, 93.7%, 63.2 and 0.181 by IUS respectively. The McNemar test showed no significant difference between two methods. The sensitivity of IOC combined with LUS was 92.9%, which was greater than that of IOC and LUS taken separately.LUS is usually performed in case where IOC has failed or is contraindicated. The combination of both methods maximizes intraoperative detection of occult CBD stones and should at least be recommended as two complementary methods.Comparative evaluation of preoperative and operative radiology in biliary-tract disease.[Diagnostic value of routine cholangiography during surgical treatment of the biliary ducts].Diagnostic and therapeutic value of ERCP and prediction of outcome: a retrospective analysis.The objective is to analyze the experience of using diagnostic and therapeutic ERCP and to attempt identifying the independent factors that predict positive and useful procedures. The medical records of 198 patients seen during the period 1991-1993 were retrospectively reviewed. There were 102 males and 96 females with a mean age of 45.2 SD + 16.7 years. The main indications for performing the procedure were jaundice, abdominal pain, nausea and/or fever. Laboratory tests showed elevated direct bilirubin in 50% of patients, deranged liver enzymes in 43%, and ESR was raised in 51% and fever was documented in 52% of patients. The cannulation of both ducts was successful in 93% of all procedures. The commonest finding was gallbladder and common bile duct stones (CBD). In 54 patients out of 64 with CBD stones, stones were removed endoscopically. Stepwise regressive analyzis has identified age above 40 years, presence of jaundice (total bilirubin > 2.5 mg/ml) and raised ESR (> 25 mm in the 1st hour) as significant factors that independently predict a positive ERCP that revealed findings previously unknown (useful procedure). Diagnostic and therapeutic ERCP is an integral part in management of biliary and pancreatic ducts disorders. The validity of clinical prediction role should be tested prospectively.Selective intraoperative cholangiography and single-stage management of common bile duct stone in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There are still debates and controversies in the detection and the management of common bile duct (CBD) stones in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). This prospective study was performed to evaluate a single-stage management of CBD stone during LC.Between May 1998 and January 2000, 249 consecutive patients with gallstone and cholecystitis were enrolled in this study. The mean age was 52.5 +/- 12.4 years. Male to female ratio was 106:143. All patients underwent abdominal sonography and the determination of the serum biochemical profile preoperatively. Patients presented with sepsis or with total bilirubin > or = 6 ng/dL were excluded from the study.244 (98%) patients underwent LC and 5 (2%) patients were converted to open cholecystectomy. Intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC) was only performed in patients who fulfilled our predetermined criteria. Among 90 patients who had IOC, only 23 patients had CBD stones that were removed either by transcystic duct stone extraction (61%) or CBD exploration (39%). The additional procedures to remove CBD stone did not prolong the hospitalization. There were four wound infections and one cystic stump leakage. One patient developed CBD stone during the follow-up period up to 37 months.Our study indicates that routine use of IOC during LC is not necessary. In addition, single-stage approach for the management of CBD stone during LC is feasible and should be considered by laparoscopic surgeons.Evaluation of operative cholangiography in 2043 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a case for the selective operative cholangiogram.There is still some controversy over whether to use laparoscopic operative cholangiograms routinely (RLOC) or selectively (SLOC). Due to their high cost as well as other issues, in March 1997 we converted from RLOC to SLOC. The purpose of this study was to validate that decision.The results of 2043 laparoscopic cholecystectomies (LC) were compiled and analyzed. The results of RLOC in 1556 patients undergoing LC from March 1990 through February 1997 were compared to the results of SLOC in 16 patients undergoing LC from March 1989 through February 1990 and 471 patients undergoing LC from March 1997 through December 1998. The literature was reviewed and data were compiled. Reasons that are typically given for operative cholangiograms (OC) were collected and scrutinized. Finally, cost surveys for RLOC and related procedures were obtained.Overall, laparoscopic operative cholangiogram (LOC) was attempted in 1661 patients and was successful in 1656 cases (99.7%). Bile duct stones (BDS) were evident in 166 patients. Laparoscopic bile duct exploration (LBDE) was attempted in all cases. None were referred for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). In the RLOC group, evidence of BDS was observed in 136 patients (9%). Forty-two were unsuspected (2.8%) and five were false positive (0.3%). In a collection of other RLOC studies, the average rate of unsuspected BDS was 2.9%, while the average rate of false positive cholangiograms was 1.6%. In the SLOC group, LOC was indicated in 139 of 487 patients (28.6%). None of the patients who did not have a LOC developed symptomatic residual BDS in < or = 11 years of follow-up. In a large collection of other SLOC studies, the rate of symptomatic residual BDS was 0.3%. A cost survey in February 1997 revealed that the average minimum global charge (MGC) for an OC was $1283.21; for a transcystic duct LBDE it was $1055.10, and for a transcholedochal LBDE it was $3263.61 [corrected]. The MGC for an ERCP with papillotomy was $4303.00. Thus, to avoid one patient with symptomatic residual BDS, 354 unnecessary procedures (333 RLOC, 18 LBDE, and three postoperative ERCP) costing $473,927.52 would be performed. There were no false negatives, bile duct injuries, or other complications attributable to RLOC or SLOC.The increased morbidity and cost of RLOC to avoid symptomatic residual BDS is not justified. All other reasons given for RLOC are either flawed or indicate that the procedure can be safely employed selectively. SLOC is an effective method of verifying suspected BDS and is safer and less expensive than RLOC.[Peroperative investigation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Laparoscopic ultrasonography versus cholangiography. A prospective study of 150 cases].From November 1994 to March 1996, 150 patients treated by laparoscopic cholecystectomy were included in a prospective study, in order to compare intraoperative cholangiography and laparoscopic ultrasound. The biliary tree was successively explored by the two methods in the systematic detection of common bile duct stones. The feasibility of laparoscopic ultrasound was 100 per cent. Cholangiography was performed in only 125 cases (83 per cent). The duration of the laparoscopic ultrasound exam was significantly shorter (11.6 vs 17.6 minutes, p = 0.0001). In this study, common bile duct stones were found in 14 cases (9 per cent). The detection rates with laparoscopic ultrasound and intraoperative cholangiography were similar. For laparoscopic ultrasound, sensitivity was 80 per cent and specificity was 99 per cent, versus 78 per cent and 97 per cent for cholangiography, respectively. The combination of the 2 examinations had a 100 per cent sensitivity and specificity. Laparoscopic ultrasound failed to recognize the intrapancreatic part of the bile duct (25 cases: 17 per cent), did not show anatomical abnormalities detected by cholangiography, but detected unsuspected digestive lesions. Laparoscopic ultrasound is safe repeatable, and non invasive, but a learning curve is necessary to increase this efficacy. Comparison of cost must be evaluated.[Use of endoscopic retrograde pancreatocholangiography in diagnosing and treating choledocholithiasis].Selective operative cholangiography. Appropriate management for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To evaluate the results of selective intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Retrospective study.Mayo Clinic, Rochester, Minn, from 1990 to 1991.Five hundred forty-two patients underwent attempted laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Excluding 28 (5.2%) who underwent conversion to laparotomy and 19 (3.5%) who did not respond to a follow-up questionnaire, there were 495 respondents (mean follow-up, 25 months).Incidence and management of choledocholithiasis, extrahepatic bile duct injuries, and other findings potentially affected by IOC.Twenty patients underwent preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for suspected common bile duct abnormalities, and 10 had common bile duct stones removed. Nearly a third (n = 161 [32.5%]) of the patients underwent IOC for laboratory, historical, or operative findings or for training purposes. Common bile duct stones were discovered on IOC in five patients (3.1%), three of whom were treated successfully with postoperative endoscopic therapy; the two others had normal findings on endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (false-positive results of IOC). In three other patients in whom IOC was unsuccessful or incomplete, symptomatic common bile duct stones developed. Two patients were treated with endoscopic techniques, and one required open common bile duct exploration. Among the 334 patients who did not undergo IOC, symptoms suggestive of retained stones developed in eight (2.4%) (all within 2 months of surgery; mean, 18 days), but stones were found at endoscopy retrograde cholangiopancreatography in only four patients. Two had preoperative criteria for performing IOC. In only three patients (0.6%) from the study population would symptomatic retained common bile duct stones have developed with selective IOC and routinely successful IOC. No common bile duct injuries occurred.Selective IOC during laparoscopic cholecystectomy is a safe practice when the ductal anatomy is clearly defined and there is no laboratory or clinical evidence of common bile duct abnormalities. Symptomatic retained common bile duct stones will be infrequent, and bile duct injuries will be rare when IOC is performed for the appropriate indications. These data do not support the need for routine IOC, although this procedure is an essential tool for the laparoscopic surgeon.Operative cholangiography.Retrospective analysis of 174 operative cholangiograms done over a 3-year period confirms its substantial benefit when used selectively in patients with clinical criteria for common bile duct exploration. A low incidental ductal stone rate of 1.6%, together with a 3.3% false positive cholangiogram rate and a case of bile duct injury resulting from the procedure makes its routine application appear superfluous.Prevalence of common bile duct stones according to the increasing number of risk factors present. A prospective study employing routinely intraoperative cholangiography in 477 cases.To determine if the use of Intraoperative choliangiography (IOC) should be routinely performed and, if not, which criteria should be used to select patients requiring IOC during open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy.495 Patients with 1 or more gallstones were included in a two-year study. Twelve clinical, laboratory, ultrasonographic and intraoperative factors were chosen and evaluated in all cases. Prior to cholecystectomy, IOC was performed after having identified the common bile duct (CBD) and cystic duct. The majority of the patients were operated on by the same surgeon to avoid differences in criteria and techniques. Statistical evaluation made use of the exact Fisher test and chi square test and, a p-value less than 0.05 was considered as significant.IOC could be performed in 479 out of the 495 cases. IOC resulted in a normal CBD in 76.0%, had a false positive in 2.7%, a false negative in 0.48%, and a presence of 1 or more stones in the CBD in 20.9%. The study revealed that when none of the 12 risk factors were present, there were no cases with CBD stones. As the number of risk factors increased, so did the number of cases presenting with CBD stones.Not all 12 risk factors show the same index of predictability; only 5 in particular (jaundice, ultrasound diameter CBD 7 mm, bilirubin over 26 umol/it, cystic duct > 4 mm and CBI, diameter over 9 mm) showed a high rate of predictability. However, when careful measurement and evaluation of risk factors for CBD stones are undertaken, it is possible to avoid the routine use of IOC.The clinical impact and cost implication of endoscopic ultrasound on use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in a Canadian university hospital.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is a safe alternative to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) for diagnostic biliary imaging in choledocholithiasis. Evidence linking a decline in diagnostic ERCP with the introduction of EUS in clinical practice is limited.To assess the clinical impact and cost implications of a new EUS program on diagnostic ERCP at a tertiary referral centre.A retrospective review was performed of data collected during the first year of EUS at the University of Alberta Hospital (Edmonton, Alberta). Patients were referred for ERCP because of suspicion of choledocholithiasis based on clinical, biochemical and/or radiological parameters. If they were assessed to have an intermediate probability of choledocholithiasis, EUS was performed first. ERCP was performed if EUS suggested choledocholithiasis, whereas patients were clinically followed for six months if their EUS was normal. Cost data were assessed from a third-party payer perspective, and cost savings were expressed in terms of ERCP procedures avoided.Over 12 months, 90 patients (63 female, mean age 58 years) underwent EUS for suspected biliary tract abnormalities. EUS suggested choledocholithiasis in 20 patients (22%), and this was confirmed by ERCP in 17 of the 20 patients. EUS was normal in 69 patients, and none underwent a subsequent ERCP during a six-month follow-up period. One patient had pancreatic cancer and did not undergo ERCP. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS for choledocholithiasis were 100% and 96%, respectively. A total of 440 ERCP procedures were performed over the same 12-month period, suggesting that EUS resulted in a 14% reduction in ERCP procedures (70 of 510). There were no complications of EUS. The cost of 90 EUS procedures was $42,840, compared with $108,854 for 70 ERCP procedures. The cost savings for the first year were $66,014.EUS appears to be accurate, safe and cost effective in diagnostic biliary imaging for suspected choledocholithiasis. The impact of EUS is the avoidance of ERCP in selected cases, thereby preventing the risk of complications. Diagnostic ERCP should not be performed in centres and regions with physicians trained in EUS.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the elderly: a single unit audit.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) has an established role in the management of pancreato-biliary disease, but its role in elderly patients has not been evaluated. A prospective study was carried out in 50 elderly patients, aged between 65 and 94 years, to compare the sensitivity and specificity of ERCP in this age group with ultrasound and liver blood tests, and to examine its safety and therapeutic effectiveness. ERCP was successful in 46 of 50 (92%) procedures. Thirty-four patients had abnormal findings, and 18 sphincterotomies were performed. No complications were recorded. There was a poor correlation between ultrasound and ERCP with agreement in only 45% of cases; sensitivity 35% and specificity 75%. Liver blood tests, alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyl transferase were elevated in all 30 cases with obstructed ducts on ERCP. Ultrasound revealed obstruction in only 10 (33%) of these. Thus, liver biochemistry proved a more reliable indicator of biliary obstruction than ultrasound. In 22 cases endoscopic stone clearance or demonstration of inoperable lesions obviated surgery while in 9 cases surgery was indicated, because of multiple large stones not cleared at ERCP, or for bypass of a malignant stricture. ERCP is therefore safe and effective with a high diagnostic and therapeutic yield even in the poor risk elderly.Choledocholithiasis: failure of routine operative cholangiography to improve results.Prospective evaluation of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in patients with biliary disease: comparative study with conventional ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography diagnostic algorithm.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is an accurate technique that can replace invasive diagnostic methods of the biliary and pancreatic duct.Our aim was to assess sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasonography using the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography as reference, and to establish a diagnostic algorithm under which circumstances magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography can replace endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Eighty-three patients with suspicion of biliary disease based on clinical, biochemical and ultrasonography findings were studied.Ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were performed, comparing the results of the techniques for the determination of their sensitivity and specificity.Sensitivity and specificity results obtained by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography were: 100 and 92.8% when dilated ducts were detected (n=61); 97.4 and 97.2% in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis (n=38); 100 and 96.7% in malignant lesions (n=14) and 81.8 and 98.4% when biliary ducts were normal. The percentage of images of diagnostic quality was 97.6%. Sensitivity and specificity achieved by ultrasonography was: 100 and 57.1% in detection of dilatation, 71 and 97.2% in choledocholithiasis, 92.8 and 96.7% in malignancy and 66.6 and 96.8% in normal ducts.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is a technique with high sensitivity and specificity in the evaluation of biliary ducts. Thus, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography may replace diagnostic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for purely diagnostic purposes, following an initial clinical and ultrasonographic exam.Diagnosis of asymptomatic common bile duct stones: preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography versus intraoperative cholangiography--a multicenter, prospective controlled study. French Associations for Surgical Research.In patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis, preoperative diagnosis of common bile duct (CBD) stones can modify the therapeutic strategy. The aims of this prospective, controlled multicenter study were to assess the feasibility, concordance, discordance, and indexes such as sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography compared with those of intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) in the diagnosis of asymptomatic CBD stones (i.e., patients undergoing cholecystectomy with no clinical or biologic evidence of CBD stones).From October 1993 to October 1995, 240 consecutive patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis, scheduled for cholecystectomy in 14 surgical centers, were enrolled in this study. All patients were selected for this study according to a preoperative high-risk CBD stone predictive score. Each patient underwent both endoscopic ultrasonography and IOC, as well as surgical exploration of the CBD when stones were detected during one or both preoperative investigations. All patients were seen 1 months and 1 year after operation to check for residual stones.The feasibility of endoscopic ultrasonography was significantly higher overall than that of IOC (99% vs 90%; p < 0.001), except when IOC was through a laparotomy (97% vs 93%; p = 0.16). The number of patients available for study was 215. In 198 cases (92%), results of both investigations were in concordance (161 negative and 37 positive values). Seventeen cases (8%) were discordant. There was overall concordance between the two investigations (kappa coefficient 0.764; 95% confidence interval 0.66 to 0.87), but the percentage of discordance was in favor of IOC. Sensitivity and specificity of IOC were significantly higher than those of endoscopic ultrasonography (1.00 and 0.98 vs 0.85 and 0.93, respectively). With a prevalence of CBD stones of 19%, positive and negative predictive values of IOC were significantly higher than those of endoscopic ultrasonography (0.93 and 1.00 vs 0.75 and 0.96, respectively).Although endoscopic ultrasonography is feasible more often than IOC, IOC is associated with a slightly lower degree of discordance and better information indexes and remains an efficient method of investigation for CBD stones. Endoscopic ultrasonography can be suggested in preference to endoscopic retrograde cholangiography when postoperative residual stones are suspected but need not be performed routinely before cholecystectomy.Preoperative selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and laparoscopic cholecystectomy without cholangiography.The aim of this study was to show that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography. We performed a retrospective analysis of 1750 consecutive patients (1170 females and 580 males with a mean age of 51 years) who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy between January 1991 and January 2000. In all, 193 patients (11%) were selected to undergo preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) on the basis of several criteria for risk of stones. No patients underwent intraoperative cholangiography. ERCP allowed us to make a diagnosis of biliary stones in 62.7% (121 cases). Extraction of the stones was successful in 96% of the cases. In 12% of cases ERCP findings were normal; in the remaining 26.3%, useful diagnostic information was obtained. There were three complications (bleeding and pancreatitis) after endoscopy (complication rate: 1.5%). Laparoscopic cholecystectomy was successful in 92.7% of patients, with a postoperative morbidity rate of 3% (0.5% of major complications). There were no deaths in this series. During a mean follow-up of 60 months (range, 12-120), 7 patients (0.43%) were found to have residual biliary stones (5 had not had preoperative ERCP). The study confirms the hypothesis that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be safely performed without routine intraoperative cholangiography, with selective use of preoperative ERCP.The operative cholangiogram: its interpretation, accuracy and value in association with cholecystectomy.The value and errors of one method of operative cholangiography were assessed prospectively with the aim of reducing further the incidence of unnecessary explorations of the common bile duct and the occurrence of residual stones. Operative cholangiograms were obtained using a cystic duct cannula in 174 cases, the technical failure rate being 2%. All cases were followed up using intravenous cholangiography where necessary. Of 129 judged normal by the operator, 2 were found to have common bile duct stones-false negative rate 1%. Of 45 judged abnormal by the operator, 10 had negative explorations- false positive rate 6%. Anomalies were discovered in 12% of patients. It is concluded that meticulous technique and accurate interpretation are essential for the best results. The high incidence of anatomical variations present is of interest and this alone emphasises the necessity of carrying out the investigation and the need of experienced interpretation.MR cholangiopancreaticography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography in patients with suspected common bile duct stones.To prospectively compare MR cholangiopancreaticography (MRCP) vs. endoscopic retrograde pancreaticography (ERCP) in patients with suspected common bile duct (CBD) stone disease.Fifty consecutive patients with suspected CBD disease underwent MRCP and then ERCP within 12 h of each other. The result of the MRCP was blinded to the reader of the ERCP. The MRCP was done using a superconducting 1.0 T unit with a heavily T2-weighted breath-hold technique. The ERCP was done in the fluoroscopy suite by one of the clinicians and was evaluated by one of the radiologists who had not read the MRCP examinations.There were 28 true-positives, 17 true-negatives, 1 false-positive, and 4 false-negatives. The sensitivity was 87.5% and the specificity 94.4%, respectively. The positive predictive value was 96.6% and the negative predictive value was 81.1%.MRCP was shown to be good enough to replace ERCP as a diagnostic method in patients with suspected CBD disease. MRCP is now our modality of choice after ultrasound in the diagnostic evaluation of these patients.Diagnosing extrahepatic bile duct stones using intraductal ultrasonography: a case series.Intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS), a new ultrasonographic diagnostic procedure, was used to assess the presence of extrahepatic bile duct stones.The IDUS apparatus consisted of a 6-French high-frequency (20 MHz) probe. Prior to clinical application, in-vitro studies were conducted in a water tank. Clinically, IDUS was successful in 31 patients after endoscopic retrograde cholangiography. Interpretations of IDUS images were evaluated in comparison with cholangiographic and fluoroscopic findings.Experimental testing demonstrated that stones or fragments were typically visualized as strong, high-echo images with acoustic shadowing; air bubbles were seen as fan-shaped high-echo areas or comet-shaped high-echo areas; and sludge was visualized as soft, easily changing, high-echo structures. Extrahepatic bile duct stones were visualized by IDUS in 30 of 31 patients (96.8%), while fluoroscopy and cholangiography identified 19 (61.3%) and 25 (80.6%), respectively. Accurate differentiation between stones and air bubbles was also possible.IDUS could be a useful modality in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones.Laparoscopic cholangiography. Results and indications.One hundred sixty-five operative cholangiograms were attempted in 364 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (45%). Laparoscopic cholangiography was successful in 150 of 165 attempts (91%). Eighty-nine per cent of studies were normal (134/150) and 11% were abnormal (16/150). All 134 patients with normal cholangiograms remained asymptomatic (false-negative rate, 0%). False-positive studies occurred in 3 of 150 (2%) total cholangiograms and 3 of 12 (25%) abnormal cholangiograms consistent with choledocholithiasis. A total of 16 of 364 patients had proven common bile duct stones (4.4%). Eight of the sixteen stones were removed by preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography/sphincterotomy. Five of sixteen stones were found at cholangiography, four of which were unsuspected (4/150, 2.6%). Retained common duct stones were found in 3 of 214 patients not undergoing cholangiography (1.4%). No complications or deaths occurred that were due to cholangiography. One biliary injury occurred (1/364, 0.3%), in a patient with aberrant anatomy who did not undergo cholangiography. Laparoscopic cholangiography is a safe technique with a success rate greater than 90%. Routine cholangiography is presently recommended for prevention of biliary injury, detection of stones in the cystic and common ducts, and for training purposes, especially during the learning phase of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the urgent diagnosis of common bile duct stones in acute pancreatitis.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria in predicting common bile duct (CBD) stones was analyzed in 76 patients with acute pancreatitis undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) during the same hospital admission. Forty patients had ERCP within 72 hours; cholangiography was successful in 92%. Fifty patients had biliary pancreatitis; 25 patients had CBD stones and all were successfully removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES). Twenty-six patients had nonbiliary pancreatitis. Two patients had complications from ERCP and/or ES; two patients died (no CBD stones) but ERCP was noncontributory. Significant differences were found between the biliary and nonbiliary disease groups with respect to age, and bilirubin. gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, alkaline phosphatase, alanine transaminase, and amylase levels. The first four factors also discriminated between those patients with and without CBD stones. Logistic discriminant functions were estimated providing probabilities for the presence of CBD stones for each patient but were too cumbersome for clinical use. A simple scoring system was devised on the basis of cut-off levels: bilirubin greater than or equal to 40 mumol/L, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase greater than or equal to 250 IU/L, alkaline phosphatase greater than or equal to 225 IU/L, and age greater than or equal to 70 years, indicating CBD stones. Bilirubin alone had a sensitivity and specificity of 80%; the specificity increased to 93% with all four factors. These results suggest that clinical and biochemical criteria and ERCP and/or ES may have important roles in the management of patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis.[Retrograde cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic sphincterotomy for biliary lithiasis. Prospective evaluation in surgical circle].Between January 1982 and 1987, 772 consecutive endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographic examinations (ERCP) were performed in 673 consecutive patients suspected of having biliary tract lithiasis (mean age: 62.1 +/- 18.2 years). Two hundred and thirty-two were emergency procedures (30%). Endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed for common bile duct stones (CBDS) in 257 cases (38.0%), of whom 143 (55.6%) had undergone previous cholecystectomy. In 17.2% of cases, ERCP was either a complete (7.8%) or partial (9.4%) failure. In 124 patients for whom microlithiasis was not identified by sonography and who underwent operation, sensitivity and specificity of ERCP was 70% and 87%, respectively. Of 266 patients in whom ES was attempted, 96.6% were achieved and the common bile duct was cleared of stones in 72% of cases. Nineteen percent of patients required two or more attempts at extraction. After ERCP without ES, mortality and morbidity rates were 0.96 and 3.6% respectively. After ES, complications followed in 12.1% of patients and 3.9% died. Mortality and morbidity directly related to ES were 3.1% and 11.3% respectively. The most common complications after ERCP were acute cholangitis and pancreatitis, whereas after ES, acute cholangitis was the most common complication, followed by hemorrhage and duodenocholechocal perforations. These complications occurred independently of age and previous cholecystectomy but was closely related to stone clearance (P < 0.05). Seventy-one patients (10.5%) required operation. Twenty-nine patients underwent emergency surgery for complications with a mortality rate of 17%. Forty-two patients underwent elective surgery for retained CBDS after ES without any mortality.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Laparoscopic sonography: a real alternative to cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy?The routine use of intraoperative cholangiography (CGP) during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is still under debate. Previous reports suggest that intraoperative sonography can replace CGP in the evaluation of common duct lithiasis during open cholecystectomy. The present study was performed to evaluate the possible role of sonography during LC.45 patients were submitted to laparoscopic sonography of biliary tree during LC. In all cases, CGP was performed.In 37 cases, sonography did not show the presence of stones; in 7 cases, common bile duct stones were identified by sonography; one false negative was observed. A sensitivity of 87.5%, a specificity of 100% and an overall accuracy of 97.8% were obtained. A false positive was obtained with CGP with a sensitivity of 100%, a specificity 97.3%, and an overall accuracy of 97.8%.Laparoscopic sonography can represent an adequate substitute for CGP as a screening procedure during LC.Intraductal ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones: a comparative study.Intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS) is highly accurate in detection of extrahepatic bile duct stones. This study was to compare the accuracy of IDUS and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones.Thirty patients suspected of extrahepatic bile duct stones on B ultrasonography, CT, or MRI were enrolled for study. ERC was performed using a Fujinon duodenoscope (ED-410XT, ED-410Xu), then IDUS was done by inserting a Fujinon microprobe (PL2220-15) through the endoscopic biopsy channel to detect the extrahepatic bile duct. Finally stones in the extrahepatic bile duct were detected and extracted by endoscopic sphincterotomy (EST).Among the 30 patients, 26 were diagnosed as having cholelithiasis accurately through ERC. In one patient the stone detected by ERC was really floccule. Misdiagnosis happened in 2 patients with extrahepatic bile duct stones. So the overall accuracy and sensitivity of ERC in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones were 86.7% (26/30) and 92.9% (26/28) respectively. In contrast, IDUS showed the results of diagnosis were in consistent with those of EST stone extraction. Its accuracy and sensitivity in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones were 100% (30/30) and 100% (28/28) respectively.IDUS which is superior to ERC in diagnosing extrahepatic bile duct stones can avoid the visual error of ERC.Comparison of endoscopic retrograde and intravenous cholangiography in diagnosis of biliary calculi.The results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (E.R.C.) and intravenous cholangiography (I.V.C.) were compared in patients undergoing surgery for biliary calculi. E.R.C. gave a significantly higher rate of correct diagnosis of gallbladder calculi (p = 0.026) and common bileduct calculi (p = 0.002) than I.V.C. Biliary stones may thus frequently be present in patients with a normal I.V.C. and E.R.C. may reduce the rate of diagnostic errors in patients with symptoms of biliary disease.Peroperative cholangiogram--routine or selective results of a prospective study.Peroperative cholangiography (POC) performed as a routine during cholecystectomy for cholelithiasis was evaluated in 102 patients. POC was normal 93 patients. Nine patients had abnormal POCs: 5 were true positive--CBD stones (4) and sphincteric fibrosis (1): 4 were false positive--air bubbles (2) and sphincteric spasm (2). Preoperative indication of CBD stones were present in 12 patients-5 of these had abnormal POC (4 true positive and 1 false positive). CBD exploration was avoided in 7 patients with normal POC. Ninety patients did not have any preoperative indication of CBD stones-4 of these had abnormal POC (1 true positive and 3 false positive). None of the patients with a normal POC had any clinical evidence of residual stones on follow up for one year. POC did not help in any case to delineate biliary ductal anatomy. Routine POC during cholecystectomy should be abandoned and should be performed selectively in patients suspected to have CBD stones only to avoid a negative CBD exploration.Routine versus selective intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a survey of 2,130 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Routine use of intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is a matter of debate.Data from 2,130 consecutive LCs and patients' follow-up during 9 years were collected and analyzed. During the first 4 years of the study, 800 patients underwent LC, and IOC was performed selectively (SIOC). Thereafter, 1,330 patients underwent LC, and IOC was routinely attempted (RIOC) for all.In the IOC group, 159 patients met the criteria for SIOC, which was completed successfully in 141 cases (success rate, 88.6%). Bile duct calculi were found in nine patients. All other patients with no criteria or failed SIOC were followed, and in nine patients retained stones were documented. Thus, the incidence of ductal stones was 1.1% and sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value (NPV), and positive predictive value (PPV) for the detection of ductal stones were 50, 100, 98.6, and 100%, respectively. In the RIOC group, IOC was routinely attempted in 1,330 patients and was successful in 1,133 (success rate, 90.9%; p = 0.015). Bile duct stones were detected in 37 patients (including 14 asymptomatic stones). In two cases, IOC failed to reveal ductal stones (false negative). There was no false-positive IOC. Therefore, with RIOC policy, the incidence of ductal stones, sensitivity, specificity, NPV, and PPV were 3.3, 97.4, 100, 99.8, and 100%, respectively (significantly higher for success rate, incidence, sensitivity, and NPV; p < 0.05). Abnormal IOC findings were also significantly higher in the RIOC group. Common bile duct injury occurred only in the SIOC group [two cases of all 2,130 LCs (0.09%)].RIOC during LC is a safe, accurate, quick, and cost-effective method for the detection of bile duct anatomy and stones. A highly disciplined performance of RIOC can minimize potentially debilitating and hazardous complications of bile duct injury.Identification of bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To identify patients with common bile duct stones, all patients considered for laparoscopic cholecystectomy in this unit undergo intravenous cholangiography (IVC) with tomography and, more recently, operative cholangiography. To date 100 consecutive patients with symptomatic gallstones have undergone laparoscopic cholecystectomy with no specific exclusion criteria. Eight patients of 100 were found to have duct stones on IVC with one false-positive. These IVC data were compared with data from 52 patients who also had operative cholangiograms performed. One stone was detected on operative cholangiography that was not identified on IVC. No additional information was gained from operative cholangiography. These data suggest that preoperative IVC is adequate for the detection of duct stones in patients considered for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Detection of choledocholithiasis: comparison of unenhanced helical CT and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.To compare unenhanced helical computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the detection of common bile duct calculi.Within 13 months, 51 patients (aged 18-94 years) with clinically suspected choledocholithiasis underwent unenhanced helical CT immediately before undergoing ERCP. CT scans were evaluated for the presence of bile duct stones, ampullary stones, the gallbladder and gallbladder stones, intrahepatic biliary dilatation, and the size of the bile duct at the porta hepatis and in the pancreatic head. ERCP images were evaluated for the presence of bile duct or ampullary stones, as well as for biliary dilatation.Unenhanced helical CT depicted common bile duct stones in 15 of 17 patients found to have stones at ERCP. Three patients had stones impacted at the ampulla, all of which were detected with CT. In addition, there was one false-positive finding at CT. CT had a sensitivity of 88%, a specificity of 97%, and an accuracy of 94% in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones.Unenhanced helical CT is useful for evaluating suspected choledocholithiasis.Preoperative ERCP approach to common bile duct stones: results of a selective policy.In a previous study, we made a plea for more selective indications for preoperative ERCP in patients with gallstones based on the results obtained from a liberal policy. Following 3.5 years of implementing this selective policy, a report on the results are presented here. This study was performed in a referral academic hospital.Between June 1994 and December 1997, 328 patients underwent cholecystectomy because of symptomatic cholelithiasis. Absolute indications for preoperative ERCP were: acute cholangitis (4 patients); obstructive jaundice (22 patients); gallstone pancreatitis (within the first 24 h in 14 patients), and wide common bile duct (CBD, >8 mm) with suspicion of stones in the biliary tree (2 patients).In 42 patients (12.8%) a preoperative ERCP was performed for these indications. Stones were found in the CBD in 30 patients and edema in the papilla in 2 patients (total 76.2%). The stones could be extracted by endoscopic sphincterotomy in 24 of the 30 patients (80%). Complications were seen in 7 patients (16.7%). All these complications (bleeding of the papilla in 4 and mild pancreatitis in 3 patients) could be treated conservatively. During a mean follow-up of 2.5 years, CBD stones could be demonstrated postoperatively in 3 patients (0.3%). No mortality was observed in this series.The results of this selective policy included the expected outcome of a significant reduction in the number of ERCPs performed from 29 to 12.8% (p < 0.001, chi(2) test) and a better yield of stones, from 29 to 76.2% of the patients. The mortality of the procedure decreased from 2 to 0% whereas morbidity remained the same. This selective policy seems adequate for the preoperative assessment of CBD stones.One hundred consecutive laparoscopic cholangiograms. Results and conclusions.In 100 consecutive patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the feasibility, reliability, and cost of routine laparoscopic cholangiography were prospectively studied.Fluoroscopic cholangiograms with multiple exposures were successfully completed in all patients in an average time of 6.9 min.Twenty-one percent were abnormal, and 15 common duct stones and 6 significant anatomic anomalies detected. Thirteen out of 15 patients with common duct stones had preoperative suspicion of common duct stones. Two out of 15 were completely unsuspected. The average cost of cholangiography was $768, and there were no complications related to the procedure. There were no false interpretations.When compared with selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), routine laparoscopic cholangiography is safer, more accurate, and less costly, and may have the added benefit of potentially reducing iatrogenic injuries in patients with anatomic variations. Routine laparoscopic cholangiography should be considered by all surgeons.Endosonography- vs. endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography-based strategies in the evaluation of suspected common bile duct stones in patients with normal transabdominal imaging.Endosonography (EUS) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) are highly accurate techniques for evaluating common bile duct stones.To compare the clinical impact and costs of EUS- and ERCP-based strategies for evaluating patients with suspected common bile duct stones but normal transabdominal imaging.The costs of EUS- vs. ERCP-based strategies were compared in patients with suspected acute biliary obstruction from common bile duct stones but normal transabdominal imaging.Over a 15-month period, 110 patients were recruited. EUS detected a common bile duct lesion in 73% (common bile duct stones: 68%; pancreatic cancer: 2%; ampulla tumour: 2%; cholangiocarcinoma: 1%). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of EUS were 98%, 100%, 100% and 93%, respectively. EUS prevented 30% unnecessary ERCP. The mean difference in cost per patient between EUS- and ERCP-based strategies was US$166. When stratified according to clinical indications, an EUS-based strategy was costlier only in suspected biliary sepsis. Costs were similar when the indications were cholestatic jaundice, acute pancreatitis and cholestasis.EUS prior to biliary interventions in patients with suspected common bile duct stones prevented unnecessary ERCP. It allowed a definitive diagnosis to be made prior to more invasive procedures.A prospective experience with selective cholangiography.A prospective study of patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis was undertaken to determine the effectiveness of identifying clinically significant choledocholithiasis with selective cholangiography. Between 1991 and 1995, 262 patients presented to the senior author (K.W.M.) with acute or chronic cholecystitis. Sixteen patients had a preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) for an elevated alkaline phosphatase or total bilirubin greater than twice the normal value or an ultrasound finding suspecting choledocholithiasis. Ten of the ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis, with eight patients having successful clearance by ERCP. Ninety other patients had intraoperative cholangiography for abnormal serum liver biochemistries, a history of jaundice or pancreatitis, or a dilated common bile duct (CBD) (>6 mm) on ultrasound. Fourteen of the intraoperative cholangiography patients and the two remaining ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis requiring CBD exploration for clearance of their stones. There were no false-positive cholangiograms, and there were no bile duct injuries in this series. With 100 per cent follow-up of at least 2 years, only one patient required ERCP clearance of a retained CBD stone 13 months after cholecystectomy. The positive predictive value and the negative predictive value for the selective cholangiography criteria are 23 per cent and 99 per cent, respectively. In conclusion, clinically significant choledocholithiasis can be found effectively with selective cholangiography. Also, utilizing selective cholangiography reduces the number of routine cholangiograms by 60 per cent.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in elderly patients.the presentation of common bile duct disease, value of investigations and treatment outcome in elderly patients undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were assessed.the clinical presentation, liver function tests, full blood counts, abdominal ultrasound and ERCP results were assessed retrospectively in 101 patients (59 women, 42 men; mean age 83 years, range 75-100) sequentially investigated for possible common bile duct disease.59 patients had common bile duct gallstones, 35 had malignant biliary obstruction (13 with co-existing common bile duct stones) and seven had other outcomes. In the malignant-alone group 68% of those who had jaundice presented painlessly compared with 24% in the gallstones-alone group; 49% of the gallstones-alone group had pain compared with 28% of the malignant group. In the gallstones-alone group 43% had atypical presentations (non-specific symptoms or painless jaundice). Non-specific symptoms were found in 19% of the gallstones-alone group but in only 5% of the malignant group. Of the patients who had common bile duct stones, 18% had pancreatic or biliary malignancy. The co-existence of gallstones and malignancy was emphasized by eight patients in whom the clinical and ultrasound diagnosis was of common bile duct stones but malignancy was detected by ERCP. The sensitivity of ultrasound was 86% for detecting dilated common bile ducts was 86%, but only 69% for diagnosing gallstones within the common bile duct and 67% for diagnosing pancreatic masses. Ultrasound and ERCP were in agreement in 60 patients (60%). Endoscopic clearance of common bile duct gallstones was successful in 53 of 54 attempts (98%). Palliative ERCP treatment was performed in 30 patients who had malignant biliary obstruction and was successful in 22 (73%); in a further four patients (13%) an endoprothesis was successfully inserted percutaneously. The commonest complication of ERCP was cholangitis (four patients); pancreatitis and biliary perforation occurred in one patient each. Twenty-two patients (63%) who had malignancy died during follow-up, the mean survival being 11.3 weeks (range 3 days-2 years). Carcinoma of the ampulla was associated with a relatively good prognosis (three patients survived 18 months or more).in elderly patients, common bile duct stones often present atypically and co-existence with malignancy is not unusual; ampullary carcinoma has a relatively good prognosis and ERCP is a safe and effective procedure in the management of biliary obstruction.Laparoscopic ultrasonography versus operative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: review of the literature and a comparison with open intraoperative ultrasonography.Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) has been used increasingly over the last several years as a new imaging modality. To define the role of LUS during laparoscopic cholecystectomy, we evaluated LUS by prospectively comparing it with operative cholangiography (OC), by reviewing the literature on LUS, and by retrospectively comparing it with intraoperative ultrasonography performed during open cholecystectomy.LUS and OC were compared prospectively in 100 consecutive patients during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The success rate of examination, the time required, the accuracy in diagnosing bile duct calculi, and the delineation of biliary anatomy were evaluated.The success rate of examination was 95% for LUS and 92% for OC. The main reason for unsatisfactory LUS was incomplete visualization of the distal common bile duct. The time required was 8.2 minutes for LUS and 15.9 minutes for OC (p<0.0001). Nine patients had bile duct calculi. LUS had one false-negative result and OC had two false-positives and one false-negative. The accuracies of LUS and OC were comparable except for a slightly better positive predictive value of LUS (100% versus 77.8%; p>0.1). In a literature review, 12 recent prospective studies comparing LUS and OC and three studies on open intraoperative ultrasonography were reviewed. Twelve studies of LUS with a total of 2,059 patients demonstrated results similar to the present study. The success rate was 88% to 100% for both tests. The time for LUS was approximately 7 minutes, about half of the time needed for OC. Overall, LUS was associated with fewer false-positive results than OC; the positive predictive value and specificity of LUS were better, while the sensitivity and negative predictive value of LUS and OC were comparable. OC detected ductal variations or anomalies more distinctly than LUS. Compared with open intraoperative ultrasonography, LUS had a slightly lower success rate and required a slightly longer time because it was technically more demanding, but the two procedures had a similar accuracy for diagnosing bile duct calculi.Because of their different advantages and disadvantages, LUS and OC can be used in a complementary manner. There is a learning curve for LUS because of its technical difficulty. Once learned, however, LUS can be used as the primary screening procedure for bile duct calculi because of its safety, speed, and cost-effectiveness. OC can be used selectively, particularly when ductal anatomic variations or anomalies or bile duct injuries are suspected.A comparison of intraoperative ultrasound versus cholangiography in the evaluation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Indications for intraoperative evaluation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy are controversial, as is the goal of either anatomic definition or assessing for choledocholithiasis. One hundred twenty-five consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy underwent both intraoperative ultrasound and intraoperative cholangiography. Cholangiography required slightly more time to perform; it was more sensitive (92.8% vs 71.4%) but less specific (76.2% vs 100%) for choledocholithiasis than was ultrasound. Ultrasound was somewhat more difficult to perform, and, particularly in the setting of intraabdominal obesity, was often inadequate at providing clear visualization of the intrapancreatic common bile duct. It did not provide the same anatomic definition as an adequate cholangiogram. The overall incidence of choledocholithiasis was 11.2%.[Selective intraoperative cholangiography].300 consecutive cholecystectomies performed from 1984 through 1986 were studied retrospectively to answer the following questions: which are suitable preoperative indicators for selective operative cholangiography, and which is the failure rate to detect biliary concrements by selective cholangiography? Patients with a history of jaundice, suspected concrements from preoperative intravenous cholangiography or ultrasound examination, a common bile duct wider than 8 mm, and elevated serum levels of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, ALAT (GPT) or ASAT (GOT) all had significantly higher rates of biliary concrements. Of these indicators, preoperative radiologic studies, serum levels of ALAT (GPT) and serum levels of alkaline phosphatase showed the best sensitivity, specificity as well as positive and negative predictive value. If two criteria, preoperative radiology and serum levels of ALAT (GPT), had been used, intraoperative cholangiography would have been performed in 34% of the cases. 82% of all biliary concrements would have been detected; in 3% of all cholecystectomies, the diagnosis of concrements would have been missed. We conclude that prospective studies should be performed to better define necessity and benefit of routine operative cholangiography still widely performed today.Ultrasound detection of choledocholithiasis: prospective comparison with ERCP in the postcholecystectomy patient.The role of ultrasound as a screening test for choledocholithiasis was prospectively assessed by comparing the results of upper abdominal ultrasound with direct cholangiography in 59 unselected symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 13 of 29 patients (sensitivity, 45%) and their absence in 29 of 30 (specificity, 97%). A positive ultrasound diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was correct 13 times out of 14 (predictive value, 93%) whereas a negative diagnosis was correct on only 29 of 45 occasions (predictive value, 64%). No significant learning effect was seen. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones. Duct stones were present in 25 of 35 patients shown to have a dilated common duct on ultrasound, and in 4 of 24 with nondilated ducts; the predictive value of duct dilatation at ultrasound for duct stones was therefore 71% and that of nondilatation in excluding stones was 83%. Dilated intrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated at ultrasound in only 17% of patients with choledocholithiasis. We conclude that ultrasound cannot reliably diagnose or exclude bile duct stones and is an inadequate screening test for the symptomatic postcholecystectomy patient.The importance of intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) using an electrosurgery energy source was successfully performed in 59 (95%) out of 62 selected patients. The procedures were performed by different surgical teams at Trakya University, Medical Fakulty, in the department of General Surgery and the Karl-Franzens-University School of Medicine, in the department of General Surgery. Cholangiography was routine at Karl Franzens University and selective at Trakya University. Laparoscopic intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was performed in 48 (81.3%) patients, and open IOC was performed in 3 patients. Two patients had common duct stones; one of which was unsuspected preoperatively. These cases underwent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and endoscopic papillotomy (EP). One patient had a choledocal tumor, unsuspected preoperatively. Anatomical anomalies were not identified. Cholangiography could not be performed in one case in which there was no suspected pathology. ERCP was performed on one patient 30 days after being discharged because of acute cholangitis. In this case, residual stones were identified in the choledocus. Four patients underwent open cholecystectomy because of tumor, unidentified cystic duct or common bile duct pathology that could not be visualized on the cholangiogram. Our study suggests that cholangiography performed via the cystic duct before any structures are divided can prevent the most serious complication of laparoscopic cholecystectomy--common duct injury. We recommend that cholangiography be attempted on all patients undergoing LC.The role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the laparoscopic era.The optimal approach to patients with suspected common bile duct (CBD) stones remains unsettled. Options include pre- and postoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) or laparoscopic exploration of the CBD. This retrospective study evaluates the role of ERCP in the management of suspected CBD stones, with an emphasis on indications, endoscopic findings, and outcome.We retrospectively reviewed the consecutive medical records of 99 patients (67 females and 32 males) who underwent ERCP for suspected CBD stones between March 1992 and December 1995.In 86 patients, ERCP was performed preoperatively. Indications for ERCP included jaundice, pancreatitis, elevated liver functions tests (LFT), and ultrasound (US) or computed tomography (CT) scan findings. Forty one (48%) of 86 preoperative ERCP had positive findings; 37 (43%) were negative, and in 8 (9%) we failed to demonstrate the CBD. There were seven (8%) major complications: four cases of acute pancreatitis, one case of acute bleeding, and two cases of acute bleeding with perforation. There was no mortality. When pancreatitis was the only indication for ERCP, 0 of 8 patients had positive findings in comparison with 50% when pancreatitis was associated with jaundice and LFT, and 93% when US or CT scan demonstrated stones or dilation of the CBD.We conclude that ERCP is a valuable option for management of CBD stones but should be performed selectively. Neither pancreatitis alone nor LFT alone is an indication for ERCP. The presence of CBD stones is more likely when multiple indications are present.The utility of intraoperative cholangiography with acute cholecystitis.An increasingly important subset of patients with biliary tract disease are those with acute cholecystitis. The indications for both routine or selective intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) during elective cholecystectomy may not be appropriate for this group. The utility of IOC in the presence of acute cholecystitis was examined. The medical records of 223 patients with histologically confirmed acute cholecystitis were reviewed. Clinical and laboratory criteria included age, sex, white blood cell count (WBC), serum bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels. In 52 (23%) patients, IOC was not attempted and was technically unsuccessful in 15 (7%) patients. IOC was successful in 156 (70%) patients and, of these, six (4%) had a false-positive examination. The remainder are divided into two groups. Group 1 (131 patients) had true-negative IOC, whereas Group 2 (19 patients) had true-positive IOC as evidenced by stone recovery upon surgical exploration. When comparing Group 2 with Group 1, the mean preoperative laboratory values are higher; these differences do not reach statistical significance. Further, within Group 2, five (26%) patients did not demonstrate any clinical or laboratory elevations suggestive of common duct pathology. Thus, in acute cholecystitis, laboratory criteria do not appear to discriminate between the presence or absence of choledocholithiasis. IOC is advocated as an integral component of the operative procedure.Selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for gallstones.To assess the outcome of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) for symptomatic gallbladder and suspected duct stones.During 3 years, one or more of four criteria led to ERC: jaundice, choledocus >8 mm, cholestasis, and severe biliary pancreatitis. Endoscopic extraction (ESE) of ductal stones was attempted before LC.In all, 990 patients were prospectively included. There were no exclusions. There were no deaths. A multivariate logistic regression analysis identified jaundice (P = 0.001), pancreatitis (P = 0.001), and cholestasis (P = 0.001) as statistically significant predictors of ductal stones. Choledocus >8 mm was not a significant predictor (P = 0.12). A total of 155 (16%) patients underwent ERC for suspected stones: 21 of 155 (13%) patients had no stones; and 6 of 134 (4%) patients had stone impaction cleared at open surgery. ERC clearance rate was 95% (128 of 134). LC was performed in 149 of 155 patients after a median interval of 3 days (range 1 to 7). Morbidity rates were 3% (4 of 134), 2% (3 of 149), and nil (0 of 6) after ESE, LC, or open surgery, respectively. Median hospital stay was 11 days. A total of 835 patients underwent LC with a 1.5% complication rate. Laparoscopic fluoro-cholangiography showed < or =3 mm-sized stones in 10 of 835 (1.2%) patients. No stones were reported at a median follow-up of 4 months including 990 patients.Ninety-five percent of patients with ductal stones can be successfully and safely managed by ERC prior to LC.Prospective comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the detection of bile duct stones.Conventional ultrasonography is used widely in the investigation of gallstone disease but is limited in the detection of bile duct stones due to poor visualization of the distal bile duct. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is currently the investigation of choice for suspected choledocholithiasis, but is not without morbidity. Endoscopic ultrasonography clearly visualizes the entire extrahepatic biliary tree and avoids the need for ERCP in many patients.Some 50 patients with suspected duct stones underwent endoscopic ultrasonography followed by ERCP. All cholangiograms were performed or interpreted by a second doctor blinded to the results of endoscopic ultrasonography.Both tests were successful in 46 patients; both tests failed in two patients and ERCP alone failed in a further two. Duct stones were confirmed in 24 patients. Sensitivity (95 per cent confidence interval (c.i.)) of ERCP and endoscopic ultrasonography in identifying these stones was 79 (58-93) per cent and 88 (68-97) per cent respectively; specificity (95 per cent c.i.) was 92 (75-99) per cent and 96 (80-100) per cent.Endoscopic ultrasonography accurately identifies bile duct stones. It is recommended in all patients with a risk of duct stones but especially in those with a history of ERCP-induced pancreatitis, when other pathology is suspected, when ERCP has failed, when bile duct abnormalities are suspected during pregnancy and in patients with acute pancreatitis.A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients with jaundice and suspected biliary obstruction.During a 4-year period (1978-1982), 206 patients were examined with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) because of jaundice with suspected biliary obstruction. The total of examinations was 223. Duodenoscopy with ERCP gave a positive primary diagnosis in 160 cases (78%), six (4%) of which later proved to be incorrect. Extrahepatic obstruction could be excluded in 16 patients with normal cholangiogram (8%). Clinically relevant information thus was obtained in 176 cases (85%). The main cause of extrahepatic obstruction was common bile duct stone(s), which were found in 73 patients. Immediate endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed in 64 of them and cleared the duct of stones in 54 (84%). Benign stenosis of the ampulla of Vater was relieved with endoscopic sphincterotomy in six patients. Malignant bile duct obstruction was diagnosed in 56 patients, and in three of them an endoprosthesis for internal drainage of the biliary tract was endoscopically inserted. Immediate complications after ERCP without endoscopic sphincterotomy occurred in 5 of 136 patients (4%), one of whom died. The authors conclude that ERCP is a rapid, reliable and safe diagnostic method in patients with extrahepatic biliary obstruction.Comparison of early endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the management of acute biliary pancreatitis: a prospective randomized study.The role and potential benefits of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the management of acute biliary pancreatitis have not been documented. We report a large prospective randomized study comparing early EUS and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the management of these patients.A prospective randomized study was performed on 140 patients with acute pancreatitis suspected to have a biliary cause. The patients were randomized to have EUS (n = 70) or ERCP (n = 70) within 24 hours from admission. In the EUS group, when EUS detected choledocholithiasis, therapeutic ERCP was performed during the same endoscopy session. In the ERCP group, diagnostic ERCP was performed, followed by therapeutic endoscopy when choledocholithiasis was detected.Examination of the biliary tree by EUS was successful in all patients in the EUS group, whereas cannulation of the common duct during ERCP was unsuccessful in 10 patients (14%) in the ERCP group (P = .001). Combined percutaneous ultrasonography and ERCP missed detection of cholelithiasis in 6 patients in the ERCP group. The overall morbidity rate was 7% in the EUS group, and that in the ERCP group was 14% (P = .172). The hospital stay and mortality rates were comparable in both groups.In selected patients with acute biliary pancreatitis, EUS could safely replace diagnostic ERCP in the management for selecting patients with choledocholithiasis for therapeutic ERCP with a higher successful examination rate, a higher sensitivity in the detection of cholelithiasis, and a comparable morbidity rate.Effect of intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy on outcome after gallstone pancreatitis.Acute gallstone pancreatitis has traditionally been managed by early cholecystectomy with intraoperative cholangiography (IOC). To evaluate the effect of IOC on patient outcome, we analyzed all patients operated on for acute gallstone pancreatitis at our institution over a 3-year period. A total of 200 patients (37 open, 163 laparoscopic) were evaluated. Nineteen of 34 patients who underwent preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were found to have common bile duct (CBD) stones. The 59 patients who underwent cholecystectomy with IOC had significantly longer operative times compared to the 141 patients who underwent cholecystectomy alone (167 vs. 105 minutes for open [P = 0.008] and 89 vs. 68 minutes for laparoscopic [P < 0.0001] operations). Of the 59 patients who underwent IOC, only nine (15%) had abnormal cholangiograms, and CBD exploration in seven revealed stones in four patients, edematous ampullae in two, and no abnormality in one. Six of eight patients (5 IOC, 3 no IOC) who required immediate postoperative ERCP were noted to have CBD stones. Patients who underwent IOC had significantly longer postoperative hospital stays (3.8 vs. 2.0 days [P = 0.007]). The incidence of retained CBD stones following surgery was similar (5.1% IOC, 2.8% no IOC). Although 7 of 122 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy without IOC were readmitted, only one was found on ERCP to have a retained CBD stone. Age, sex, preoperative days, procedure type, and biliary-pancreatic complications after discharge did not differ significantly between patients with and without IOC. We conclude that IOC in patients operated on for acute gallstone pancreatitis results in a longer operative time and a prolonged postoperative course, but has no effect on the incidence of retained CBD stones.Correlation between MRCP and ERCP findings at a tertiary care hospital.It is common clinical practice to obtain Magnetic Resonance Cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) prior to Endoscopic Retrograde Cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) to evaluate the biliary system. With recent improvements of MRCP, it is important to correlate the findings of these two studies.To examine the correlation between MRCP and ERCP findings in patients at a tertiary care hospital.A total of 165 patients were identified who underwent MRCP prior to ERCP at West Virginia University between July 1, 2004 and June 30, 2006 (98 females and 67 males). Patients' demographic information and their laboratory values and diagnostic study outcomes prior to procedure were collected, entered into MS Access, and analyzed using SAS 10.0. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were calculated. Two-tailed p-values of <= 0.05 were considered statistically significant.Baseline demographic characteristics were comparable between male and female patients. Hepatobiliary and pancreatic duct results were grouped together. MRCP was 74.6% sensitive and 83.5% specific for choledocholithiasis, 85.4% sensitive and 87.4% specific for strictures, 85.9% sensitive and 91.2% specific for obstruction, 92.4% sensitive and 93.5% specific for ductal dilatation, and 90.8% sensitive and 92.6% specific for detection of periductal masses. MRCP appeared to have more false negative results for choledocholithiasis and strictures and more false positive results for ductal dilatation and periductal mass detection compared with ERCP.In patients with presentations suggestive of hepatobiliary and pancreatic disease, despite recent improvements in MRCP technique, the sensitivity and specificity of MRCP is still not close enough to that of ERCP for detection of choledocholithiasis, hepatobiliary and pancreatic ductal dilatation, periductal masses, or obstruction to be used as a substitute. Thus, ERCP remains the gold standard for visualization of the hepatobiliary and pancreatic tree.The efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound for the diagnosis of common bile duct stones as compared to CT, MRCP, and ERCP.[Intraoperative cholangiography as a routine method? A prospective, controlled, randomized study].A prospective, controlled, randomized trial was conducted in 275 patients with symptomatic gall stone disease, whose history, laboratory data or sonographical findings did not suggest common bile duct stones. Of these patients, 137 did not undergo intraoperative fluoroscopic cholangiography (IOC), but in the remaining 138 patients IOC was attempted. In 111 cases (80.4%) the biliary system was sufficiently visualized. In 3 patients (2.7%) calculi in the cystic or common bile duct were diagnosed, which would have been overlooked without IOC. IOC was false-positive in one case. One year after the operation the patients were asked to return for a follow-up examination. Three patients in the group without IOC had had symptomatic passage of a stone, and one had a common bile duct stone removed by endoscopic papillotomy. A retained stone was discussed as etiology for a pancreatitis in a fifth patient in this group. No patient sustained long-term sequelae from the retained common bile duct stones. None of the patients in the IOC group had evidence of cholangiolithiasis at follow-up. There was no difference between the study groups concerning the incidence of post-operative complications. The operations with IOC lasted significantly longer (92 +/- 31 min vs 77 +/- 28 min). According to our data and those published earlier, the additional financial and logistic expenditure associated with routine IOC is not justified. Patients with the preoperative suspicion of a common bile duct stone should have endoscopic bile duct clearance (ERCP and EPT) prior to cholecystectomy.A five years review intra-operative cholangiogram.Intra-operative cholangiogram is often performed to detect concurrent common bile duct stones in cholecystectomy patients. Routine cholangiogram add to cost and exposes patients to unnecessary exploration of common bile duct due to frequent false positive results. Thus, there is need of better indicators for cholangiogram in order to minimize unnecessary procedure and its morbidity.A retrospective analysis of patients undergoing intra-operative cholangiogram during open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy was done at Patan Hospital from Oct 1, 2005 to Sep 31, 2009. Indications and outcome of cholangiogram were analyzed together with findings of common bile duct exploration.A total of 68 (2.8%, 68/2400) intra-operative cholangiogram were done in 2400 cholecystectomy patients during five years period. Eight (11.8%, 8/68) patients had abnormal findings. Two (3%, 2/68) patients with abnormal cholangiogram had stones in common bile duct. There was no mortality in this series.Existing indications of intra-operative cholangiogram detects only small percentage of patients with bile duct stones and has high false positive results. This unnecessarily increases bile duct exploration, cost and morbidity. Thus, there is need to redefine indications for intra-operative cholangiogram.Per-operative endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography for common bile duct stones.Routine preoperative infusion cholangiography at elective cholecystectomy: a prospective study in 694 patients.The role of preoperative infusion cholangiography (PIC) before elective cholecystectomy has yet to be defined. Between 1985 and 1991 PIC was performed routinely in 694 patients with median (range) age of 52 (17-85) years with biliary calculus disease 1 or 4 days before elective cholecystectomy. Satisfactory opacification of the biliary system was achieved in 90.1 per cent and mild to moderate adverse reactions to the infusion of contrast medium occurred in 0.9 per cent of patients. Peroperative cholangiography (POC) in 43 of 499 patients with a normal PIC was normal. The presence of common bile duct stones was confirmed in 34 of 36 patients with prominent stones at bile duct exploration and in 8 of 26 with suspected stones at PIC. Bile duct dilatation (median diameter 10 mm) without concomitant stones was seen at PIC and confirmed at POC in 20 patients. Bile duct anomalies were found or suspected in 35 patients at PIC and were confirmed in six by POC (n = 5), or during the cholecystectomy making the anomaly incidence 0.9 per cent. Information provided by the PIC was not of crucial importance for safe execution of cholecystectomy in any patient, while a single (minor) bile duct lesion (1 of 694; 0.1 per cent) could be ascribed to severe pericholecystitis. The results of this study suggest that routine PIC is not warranted. However, PIC is an alternative to selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography or selective POC. PIC needs to be supported by POC in approximately 20 per cent of patients (in case of absent or poor opacification of the bile ducts or suspicion of stones or anomalies at PIC).Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography following laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the preferred method of treatment for symptomatic choledocholithiasis. Since its introduction there has been an increase in postoperative diagnostic and therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The aim of this study was to assess the indications and results of ERCP following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Sixty-one patients had an ERCP following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Two broad groups were identified: Group 1 (35 patients) had filling defects (consistent with stones) noted on operative cholangiography, which were not successfully flushed or extracted at the time of laparoscopic cholecystectomy; Group 2 consisted of patients who developed problems following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Nine patients had post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain with abnormal liver function tests (LFT), four of whom had common bile duct (CBD) injuries and three had CBD stones. Eleven patients had post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain with a normal diameter common bile duct on ultrasound and normal LFT; only one had a CBD stone. Five patients with a persisting bile leak following laparoscopic cholecystectomy had an ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy. In three the leak ceased, while two required subsequent open surgery to drain bile collections and ligate the cystic duct. One patient presented with an episode of transient jaundice but had a normal ERCP. There were six post-ERCP complications; three patients had mild pancreatitis, two had a minor haemorrhage and one an asymptomatic duodenal perforation. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy was most valuable for the management of retained stones and the diagnosis and management of post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain in association with abnormal LFT. The diagnostic yield was low (9%) when the LFT were normal.Predictive ability of choledocholithiasis indicators.[Upper-abdominal ultrasonography and ERCP? (author's transl)].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as well as upper-abdominal ultrasonography were performed on 134 patients. Organ structure was optimally demonstrated by ultrasonography in 94 patients (70.2%) and partially in 29 (21.6%) Comparing the diagnostic assessment in 62 patients who had undergone 73 tests and had subsequently been operated on (57) or examined post-mortem (5) there was a statistically significant advantage of ERCP in diseases in which the choledochal duct had been involved. The method was successful in 95% of cases of choledocholithiasis (20 cases) compared with 45% by ultrasound and in 85% of cases of gall-bladder carcinoma which also involved the choledochal duct (38% by ultrasound). In clinically manifest carcinoma of the head of the pancreas (9 cases) and cholecystolithiasis (19 cases) ultrasonography provided the correct diagnosis in 89%, while the results for ERCP were 56% and 74%, respectively.[The importance and value of pre-, intra- and postoperative roentgenologic biliary tract diagnosis].Routine intraoperative cholangiogram.The value of a routine intraoperative cholangiogram is controversial. We reviewed 352 consecutive instances of cholecystectomy for nonmalignant disease during a period of three years to assess the diagnostic accuracy and additional cost of the roentgenographic technique. Intraoperative cholangiogram was done in all except 11 patients. Forty-nine of 341 patients underwent exploration of the common bile duct. The diagnosis was determined by the cholangiogram and was correct in 46 patients with three false-positive results. The other 292 patients did well without exploration of the common bile duct. The cholangiocatheter and a special cholangioclamp made the procedure easy and minimized additional operation time (five minutes with no mortality and negligible morbidity). Clinical indications for exploration of the common bile duct correlated poorly with abnormal findings in the bile duct. Unsuspected common duct stones were detected by cholangiogram in 17 (5 per cent) patients. Possible iatrogenic trauma to the common duct was prevented when significant abnormal findings were demonstrated by cholangiogram. The results of this study indicate that routine intraoperative cholangiogram is: accurate for diagnosis of common bile duct stones; useful in identification of bile duct anomalies and, thus, aids in preventing injury to the common bile duct; safe with negligible risk, and neither expensive nor time consuming if done correctly as a routine procedure.Routine intraoperative laparoscopic cholangiography.Whether intraoperative laparoscopic cholangiography should be routine is debatable.We reviewed the cholangiography experience in 669 consecutive laparoscopic cholecystectomies.Mean age of the patients was 39 years, 78% were female, and 29% had acute cholecystitis. Cholecystectomy was completed laparoscopically in 606 (91%). Laparoscopic cholangiography was completed in 562 (93%) and 348 (62%) were routine (no preoperative indication). The mean operating time in 1996 was 61 minutes. Out of the 348 routine cholangiograms, 17 demonstrated evidence of unsuspected choledocholithiasis. Five patients had choledocholithiasis documented by laparoscopic common bile duct exploration and/or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Two patients had normal postoperative cholangiopancreatography. One of 10 patients managed expectantly was readmitted postoperatively with obstructive jaundice. In 4 patients, routine cholangiography revealed unexpected anatomy, and in 2, this prevented misidentification and transection of the common bile duct.Laparoscopic cholangiography is safe, quick, detects unsuspected choledocholithiasis, and can prevent common bile duct transection. It should be routine.Proposed criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There has been a dramatic increase in the number of endoscopic retrograde cholangiograms (ERC) performed on patients who are candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The majority of these procedures result in normal findings. This study is an attempt to determine useful clinical criteria and strategy for predicting the presence or absence of common bile duct stones (CBDS) and the need for ERC in patients who are candidates for LC.The observational portion of this study explored laboratory and ultrasound data from 134 consecutive patients who had undergone preoperative ERC, followed by LC, over a 4-year period. The data were then analyzed by multivariate logistic regression to determine the best models for predicting the presence or absence of stones in the common bile duct. Models using gamma glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT), alkaline phophatase (AP), common bile duct diameter (CBDIA), and amylase (AMY) were then evaluated retrospectively in 36 additional patients (validation group).A model based on GGT and common bile duct diameter as positive predictors and amylase as a negative predictor correctly classified 78% of the patients in the validation group. This model resulted in a negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), sensitivity, and specificity of 0.88, 0.68, 0.87, and 0.71, respectively. The model utilizing AP was almost as effective. This model resulted in a NPV, PPV, sensitivity, and specificity of 0.83, 0.67, 0.80, and 0.71, respectively.Although a number of laboratory values and imaging techniques correlate with the presence or absence of CBDS, our study confirms that individually they have poor predictive value. Our data and models suggest that elevated serum amylase is a negative predictor for CBDS. Elevated GGT and/or AP with widened CBDIA and normal AMY strongly suggest the presence of CBDS and the need for preoperative ERC. Elevated GGT, AP, or widened CBDIA with elevated amylase, in the absence of clinical pancreatitis, may suggest that small stones have passed through the ampulla of Vater and that the CBD is generally cleared of stones.Cholangiography during cholecystectomy: a plea for selective use.Routine peroperative cholangiography was retrospectively studied in 376 patients who underwent elective cholecystectomy. Adequate cholangiograms were obtained in 325 patients using a C-arm image intensifier. Pre- and peroperative indications for common bile duct stones were correlated to the outcome of peroperative cholangiography. The sensitivity and specificity of the cholangiographic technique were 96 and 95 per cent respectively. A false-positive rate of 4.6% and a false-negative rate of 0.6% were found. No serious complications due to the method were observed. Peroperative cholangiography prevented unnecessary exploration of the common bile duct in 70 per cent of the patients with clinical indications for exploration. Abnormal cholangiograms were rare (0.8%) in the absence of clinical signs of stones in the bile ducts. These results demonstrate that selective rather than routine peroperative cholangiography should be performed.[Retrograde pancreaticocholangiography in the diagnosis of residual choledocholithiasis].[Endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography performed during the same anesthesia session].To evaluate the feasibility, results and importance of a diagnostic and therapeutic biliary and pancreatic exploration associating endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography during the same anaesthesia session.From November 1997 to October 1998, 179 patients (83 males, 96 females), mean age 62 years (range 22 to 95 years), were investigated in our gastroenterology unit for biliary or pancreatic disorders. Two hundred and sixty two examinations were performed by a single physician for patients under general anaesthesia. In 87 cases (42%), endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was performed immediately without prior endoscopic ultrasonography; these patients were not included. When endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography followed endoscopic ultrasonography, it was performed during the same anaesthesia session.In 118 cases, endoscopic ultrasonography was performed first, followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography 57 times (48%). The sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography was 96.5% and the success of therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was 100%. Endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was necessary for 83% of patients with angiocholitis, 60% with cholestasis, 45% with acute biliary pancreatitis and only 28% with common bile duct stone migration.To decrease the number of anaesthesia sessions, endoscopic ultrasonography--endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography during same anaesthesia session appears to be particularly interesting for the diagnosis and treatment of biliary and pancreatic disorders, in terms of cost, accuracy, morbidity and patient comfort.Prospective randomized trial of LC+LCBDE vs ERCP/S+LC for common bile duct stone disease.To compare outcome parameters for good-risk patients with classic signs, symptoms, and laboratory and abdominal imaging features of cholecystolithiasis and choledocholithiasis randomized to either laparoscopic cholecystectomy plus laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (LC+LCBDE) or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography sphincterotomy plus laparoscopic cholecystectomy (ERCP/S+LC).Our study was a prospective trial conducted following written informed consent, with randomization by the serially numbered, opaque envelope technique.Our institution is an academic teaching hospital and the central receiving and trauma center for the City and County of San Francisco, California.We randomized 122 patients (American Society of Anesthesiologists grade 1 or 2) meeting entry criteria. Ten of these patients, excluded from outcome analysis, were protocol violators having signed out of the hospital against medical advice before 1 or both procedures were completed.Treatment was preoperative ERCP/S followed by LC, or LC+LCBDE.The primary outcome measure was efficacy of stone clearance from the common bile duct. Secondary end points were length of hospital stay, cost of index hospitalization, professional fees, hospital charges, morbidity and mortality, and patient acceptance and quality of life scores.The baseline characteristics of the 2 randomized groups were similar. Efficacy of stone clearance was likewise equivalent for both groups. The time from first procedure to discharge was significantly shorter for LC+LCBDE (mean [SD], 55 [45] hours vs 98 [83] hours; P < .001). Hospital service and total charges for index hospitalization were likewise lower for LC+LCBDE, but the differences were not statistically significant. The professional fee charges for LC+LCBDE were significantly lower than those for ERCP/S+LC (median [SD], $4820 [1637] vs $6139 [1583]; P < .001). Patient acceptance and quality of life scores were equivalent for both groups.Both ERCP/S+LC and LC+LCBDE were highly effective in detecting and removing common bile duct stones and were equivalent in overall cost and patient acceptance. However, the overall duration of hospitalization was shorter and physician fees lower for LC+LCBDE.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT00807729.Ultrasonic indications to explore the common bile duct.A prospective comparison between operative cholangiography and operative choledochosonography has been made in 100 patients with cholelithiasis and potential choledocholithiasis. Thirty-one common bile ducts were explored, and 25 of them contained stones. Operative cholangiography was attempted in every case, but technical difficulties prevented examination of 12 common bile ducts, two of which contained stones. Both of these stones were detected by operative ultrasonography. Of the remaining 88 ducts, the sensitivity of the operative cholangiogram was 96% and the specificity 96%. Operative ultrasonography was performed for all 100 patients, with a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 93%. The ultrasonic findings of a sonically dense particle, shadowing, dilatation of the duct, and the persistence and meniscus signs are described with their relative incidence in the 100 patients. The time required for choledochosonography (3 to 5 minutes) compared favorably with the time needed for operative cholangiography (10 to 15 minutes). Operative bile duct scanning is a rapid, reliable technique for detecting the presence of choledocholithiasis at the time of routine cholecystectomy.Role of selective intra-operative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The use of routine intra-operative cholangiography (IOC) remains controversial. This prospective study was carried out to determine whether to perform selective or routine IOC in patients undergoing cholecystectomy for gallstones.All consecutive patients undergoing open cholecystectomy over a 16-month period were included in the present study. They were divided into two groups based on the absence (n = 79) or presence (n = 55) of indicators of choledocholithiasis. All patients were subjected to cholangiography. Each indicator, subsets of indicators and all indicators combined were evaluated for their ability to predict choledocholithiasis.There would be only two missed stones (1.5%) if selective cholangiography was to be practised. Intra-operative cholangiography had a positive predictive value of 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of all the indicators combined were 93.5%, 84.6%, 74.5%, 97.5% and 88.0%, respectively. The best indicators in each subset were jaundice, common bile duct diameter as assessed by ultrasonography, and a palpable stone during surgery with NPV of 82.7%, 91.1% and 96.8%, respectively.Routine IOC during cholecystectomy is not essential for the prevention of retained stones. A combination of the various indicators of choledocholithiasis can be used to select patients for cholangiography.Accuracy of direct cholangiography by endoscopic or transhepatic route in jaundice--a prospective study.An exact anatomic diagnosis of bile-duct obstruction is a prerequisite for selecting the appropriate management. In a prospective study on patients with clinically suspected obstructive jaundice, the results of direct cholangiography--by endoscopic retrograde or, alternatively, by transhepatic route--were compared with operative findings or liver biopsy or both. Final diagnoses were based on autopsy, operative biopsy, and clinical course. The study included 105 patients, 90 of whom underwent surgery, and allowed a blind and independent comparison between cholangiography and operative findings. The predictive value of a positive test, i.e., cholangiographic visualization of obstruction, was 0.99 and the predictive value of a corresponding negative test was 0.90, with the final diagnoses as reference. For the operated patients the predictive values were calculated as to obstruction (positive test 0.99, negative test 0.89), malignancy (positive test 0.92, negative test 0.89), and common duct stones (positive test 0.96, negative test 0.98). Thus, laparotomy can be avoided in patients in whom direct cholangiography shows no obstruction or an appropriate nonoperative procedure, like transhepatic insertion of a stent or endoscopic biliary surgery elected.How reliable is intraoperative cholangiography as a method for detecting common bile duct stones? : A prospective population-based study on 1171 patients.Although intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) is a widely used method for detecting common bile duct stones (CBDS), its accuracy has not been fully evaluated in large nonselected patient samples. The purpose of this study was to assess the sensitivity, specificity and predictive value of dynamic IOC regarding its ability to diagnose CBDS in a population-based setting, and to assess the morbidity associated with the investigation.All patients operated on for gallstone disease between 2003 and 2005 in the county of Uppsala in Sweden, a county with a population of 302,000 in December 2004, were registered prospectively. The outcome of cholangiography was validated against the postoperative clinical course.1171 patients were registered, and among these IOC was performed in 1117 patients (95%). Common bile duct stones were found in 134 patients (11%). One perforation of the common bile duct caused by the IOC catheter was recorded. Sensitivity was 97%, specificity 99%, negative predictive value 99%, positive predictive value 95%, and overall accuracy 99%. In 7 of the 134 cases where IOC indicated CBDS, no stones could be verified on exploration. In 4 of the 979 cases where IOC was normal, the clinical course indicated overlooked CBDS.Intraoperative cholangiography is a safe and accurate method for detecting common bile duct stones.Is intravenous cholangiography an alternative to the routine per-operative cholangiogram?Ultrasonography, although an accurate method of detecting stones within the gall bladder, is unreliable for the detection of bile duct stones for which per-operative cholangiography remains the standard investigation. Fifty seven patients undergoing elective cholecystectomy had both a pre-operative intravenous cholangiogram and per-operative cholangiography. The pre-operative investigation is shown to be at least as effective in the detection of common bile duct stones and only missed a duct stone in one patient. The substitution of pre-operative intravenous cholangiography for routine per-operative cholangiography would result in a significant reduction in operating time, may provide advance knowledge on the biliary anatomy and would allow advance planning of the likely procedure. It is suggested that pre-operative intravenous cholangiography, carried out on the day of admission, should be considered as a preferred alternative investigation to per-operative cholangiography.Role of intraoperative cholangiography in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The results of a policy of selective cholangiography were assessed in 400 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was performed in 81 patients (20 per cent) of whom 31 (38 per cent) showed definite or possible evidence of stones in the bile duct. Seventeen of the 400 patients underwent intraoperative cholangiography and the majority of these (12) were normal. After a minimum follow-up of 1 year, 17 patients (4 per cent) have had ERCP for suspected residual duct stones. Eight (2 per cent) of these revealed stones and all were successfully treated with sphincterotomy and duct clearance. Preoperative and postoperative ERCP was not associated with mortality or major morbidity. No major duct injury occurred and none was diagnosed within 2 years of operation. Routine intraoperative cholangiography is not a necessary part of laparoscopic cholecystectomy in the presence of an efficient and safe ERCP service.Follow-up of selective endoscopic ultrasonography and/or endoscopic retrograde cholangiography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective study of 300 patients.This prospective study evaluated the selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the context of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Between 1993 and 1998, LC for symptomatic gallstones was indicated in 300 consecutive patients. In order to diagnose and treat choledocholithiasis preoperatively, we performed, on the basis of preoperative criteria, ERC in "high-risk" patients and EUS in "intermediate-risk" patients. Choledocholithiasis was treated by preoperative biliary endoscopic sphincterotomy (BES). LC was performed either after the endoscopic procedure or directly in "low-risk" patients.A total of 104 patients (35%) had 118 preoperative procedures: a) EUS (n = 68; feasibility 100%): choledocholithiasis was observed in 14/68 patients (21%); b) ERC (n = 50; feasibility 94%): 36 ERC were indicated on on preoperative criteria, and 14 on the basis of EUS results. Choledocholithiasis was found in 41/ 50 patients (82%) (13/14 patients with positive EUS), 19% of "intermediate-risk" patients, and 78% of "high-risk" patients; ERC failed in three patients who had no choledocholithiasis on subsequent intraoperative cholangiography (IOC). Clearance of the common bile duct (CBD) was achieved after BES in 41/41 patients. There was no mortality; complications occurred in 4/ 300 patients (1%). No retained stones were found in patients of any of the three groups, after a mean follow-up of 32 months.Combined endoscopic and laparoscopie management of cholecystolithiasis and choledocholithiasis is a viable option and is optimized by the use of EUS.Predictive value and main determinants of abnormal features of intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The major issue with intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) is whether its diagnostic accuracy for common bile duct (CBD) stones matches that of other diagnostic procedures, and thus, whether it will become a routine diagnostic procedure. The current study aimed to address the main determinants of CBD stone diagnosis in IOC among an Iranian population.In a retrospective review database-based study conducted in Taleghani Hospital in Tehran between 2006 and 2008, baseline data and perioperative information of 2060 patients (male to female ratio 542:1518, mean age 53.7 years) who were candidates for cholecystectomy and underwent concomitant IOC for confirming CBD stones were reviewed. The predictive power of this procedure for diagnosis of abnormal biliary ducts with the focus on biliary stones was determined.Overall mortality and morbidity following cholecystectomy in the study population were 0.6% and 2.6%, respectively. Both early mortality and morbidity due to cholecystectomy were higher in male than female. The prevalence of CBD stones in IOC was 3.4% (5.2% in male and 2.8% in female, P=0.008). Among those without gallstones, 8.7% had CBD stones and only 3.1% had concomitant gallstones and CBD stones. The main predictors of stone appearance as an abnormal feature of IOC during cholecystectomy were: advanced age (OR=1.022, P=0.001), male gender (OR=1.498, P=0.050), history of abdominal surgery (OR=1.543, P=0.040) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (OR=5.400, P<0.001).IOC is a safe and accurate method for the assessment of bile duct anatomy and stones. Therefore, the routine use of IOC within cholecystectomy seems reasonable and is recommended.Common bile duct stones after laparoscopic cholecystectomy and its treatment. The role of ultrasound and intravenous and intraoperative cholangiography.In the present work we recount our experience in handling common bile duct stones (CBDS) in our first 100 cases of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. In the first 50 cases our diagnostic procedures involved the use of ultrasound exploration and intravenous cholangiotomography 48 h before laparoscopic surgery. We found three cases of residual CBDS. One of the cases was treated by means of ERCP. The other two cases were resolved by carrying out a transparietohepatic cholangiography after the ERCP procedure failed. After this experience, we changed our strategy, introducing the intraoperative cholangiography in the cases with an unclear diagnosis. With this new approach, no residual CBDS occurred in the following 50 cases. These findings demonstrate the following: (1) In our hands, intravenous cholangiography is not more effective than ultrasound exploration in resolving dubious cases. (2) These dubious cases are more effectively diagnosed by means of selective intraoperative cholangiography. (3) When CBDS is treated by transparietohepatic cholangiography it proves to be less uncomfortable for the patient than ERCP and, as we found, even more efficient in removing the stones, although our experience is based on only two cases.[Is it necessary to perform routine intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy?].The intraoperative cholangiography was carried out in 361 patients with gallstone disease. In 293 (81.16%) patients cholangiography was normal, in 68 (18.83%) was abnormal. Thirty-six (9.97%) patients had pre-operative asymptomatic common bile duct calculi and 20 (5.54%) patients had confirmed suspect of common bile duct calculi during cholangiography. Twelve (3.32%) patients were false-positive and one (0.27%) was false-negative. It is discussed the value of routine intraoperative cholangiography in patients with gallstone disease.Laparoscopic ultrasonography is a complement to cholangiography for the detection of choledocholithiasis at laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Intraoperative cholangiography and laparoscopic ultrasonography are both used in the detection of common bile duct stones at laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The aim of this prospective study was to determine whether laparoscopic ultrasonography has an alternative or a complementary role with respect to cholangiography in achieving this end.The biliary trees of 900 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy were examined routinely by the two methods. The diagnostic power of each investigation and of the two techniques in combination was evaluated. The statistical non-random concordance between the two methods was also determined.Laparoscopic ultrasonography was performed in all 900 patients. Cholangiography was performed in 762 (85 per cent). The mean (range) duration was 9.8 (4-21) min for laparoscopic ultrasonography and 17.6 (7-42) min for cholangiography. For the detection of common bile duct stones, with a kappa coefficient of 0.57 (95 per cent confidence interval (c.i.) 0.43 to 0.71), the non-random concordance between the two methods was considered to be fair to good. The sensitivity of laparoscopic ultrasonography was 0.80 (95 per cent c.i. 0.65 to 0.91) and its specificity was 0.99 (95 per cent c.i. 0.98 to 1.00). The respective values for cholangiography were 0.75 (95 per cent c.i. 0.59 to 0.87) and 0.99 (95 per cent c.i. 0.98 to 1.00). The examinations combined had a sensitivity of 0.95 (95 per cent c.i. 0.86 to 0.99) and a specificity of 0.98 (95 per cent c.i. 0.96 to 1.00).Laparoscopic ultrasonography and intraoperative cholangiography are complementary, as the combination of both methods maximizes the intraoperative detection of choledocholithiasis.Intraductal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of bile duct stones: when and whom?Biliary intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS) is highly sensitive in visualizing bile duct stones (BDS). Indications for IDUS, however, in cases of suspected BDS have not yet been established. The aim of the present study was to elucidate adequate indications for IDUS in cases that undergo endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) due to suspected BDS.A total of 213 patients who were suspected of having BDS were included in this retrospective study. The patients were divided into two groups: Group A in which BDS was visualized by ERCP; and Group B in which BDS was demonstrated only by IDUS. Comparison between the groups was carried out.ERCP successfully visualized BDS in 166 patients. Forty-seven patients underwent IDUS, which revealed BDS and biliary sludge in 12 and eight patients, respectively. The diameter of the largest stone was 13  6 mm in Group A and 5  1 mm in Group B (P < 0.001). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of ERCP in the diagnosis of BDS were 93%, 100%, and 94%, respectively. The sensitivity was influenced by the size of BDS: 100% in cases of stones  8 mm in size, but 74% in those with stones < 8 mm. In cases with stones < 8 mm, the sensitivity was significantly affected by the bile duct diameter ( 12 mm vs < 12 mm, P < 0.05). When ERCP fails to visualize stones in patients with suspected BDS, IDUS is recommended, especially in those with a bile duct  12 mm in diameter.Echo-endoscopy versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiography for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis: the influence of the size of the stone and diameter of the common bile duct.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiography is highly accurate in diagnosing choledocholithiasis, but it is the most invasive of the available methods. Endoscopic ultrasonography is a very accurate test for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis with a risk of complications similar to that of upper gastrointestinal endoscopy.To compare the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy and to analyze endoscopic ultrasound results according to stone size and common bile duct diameter.Two hundred and fifteen patients with symptomatic gallstones were admitted for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Sixty-eight of them (31.7%) had a dilated common bile duct and/or hepatic biochemical parameter abnormalities. They were submitted to endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography. Sphincterotomy and sweeping of the common bile duct were performed if endoscopic ultrasonography or endoscopic retrograde cholangiography were considered positive for choledocholithiasis. After sphincterotomy and common bile duct clearance the largest stone was retrieved for measurement. Endoscopic or surgical explorations of the common bile duct were considered the gold-standard methods for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.All 68 patients were submitted to laparoscopic cholecystectomy with intraoperative cholangiography with confirmation of the presence of gallstones. Endoscopic ultrasonography was a more sensitivity test than endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (97% vs. 67%) for the detection of choledocholithiasis. When stones >4.0 mm were analyzed, endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography presented similar results (96% vs. 90%). Neither the size of the stone nor the common bile duct diameter had influence on endoscopic ultrasonographic performance.For a group of patients with an intermediate or moderate risk with respect to the likelihood of having common bile duct stones, endoscopic ultrasonography is a better test for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis when compared to endoscopic retrograde cholangiography mainly for small-sized calculi.Cholecystectomy without operative cholangiography. Implications for common bile duct injury and retained common bile duct stones.This study evaluated the selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the context of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) while minimizing the use of operative cholangiography.There has been a long-standing debate between routine and selective operative cholangiography that has resurfaced with LC.Prospective data were collected on the first 1300 patients undergoing LC at McGill University. Preoperative indications for ERCP were recorded, radiologic findings were standardized, and technical points for a safe LC were emphasized.A total of 106 patients underwent 127 preoperative ERCPs. Fifty patients were found to have choledocholithiasis (3.8%), and clearance of the common bile duct (CBD) with endoscopic sphincterotomy was achieved in 45 patients. The other five patients underwent open cholecystectomy with common duct exploration. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was attempted in only 54 patients (4.2%), 6 of whom demonstrated choledocholithiasis. Forty-nine postoperative ERCPs were performed in 33 patients and stones were detected in 17 (1.3%), with a median follow-up time of 22 months. Endoscopic duct clearance was successful in all of these. The incidence of CBD injury was 0.38%, and a policy of routine operative cholangiography might only have led to earlier recognition of duct injury in one case. The rate of complication for all ERCPs was 9% and the associated median duration of the hospital stay was 4 days. The median duration of the hospital stay after open CBD exploration was 13 days.LC can be performed safely without routine IOC. The selective use of preoperative and postoperative ERCP will clear the CBD of stones in 92.5% of patients.The detection of bile duct stones in suspected biliary pancreatitis: comparison of MRCP, ERCP, and intraductal US.Early ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy for stone extraction can benefit the prognosis in patients with severe biliary pancreatitis, but are associated with complications. The ability to identify choledocholithiasis by noninvasive means in biliary pancreatitis is limited. The aim of this study was evaluation of the ability of MRCP to detect choledocholithiasis in patients with acute biliary pancreatitis. In addition, we investigated whether intraductal US (IDUS) could help manage these patients.Thirty-two patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis were studied prospectively. MRCP was performed immediately before ERCP by separate blinded examiners within 24 h of admission. Wire-guided IDUS was performed during ERCP within 72 h of admission, regardless of the results of MRCP. Using endoscopic extraction of a stone as the reference standard, the diagnostic yield of MRCP was compared with transabdominal US, CT, ERCP, and IDUS.The sensitivity of US, CT, MRCP, ERCP, and IDUS for identifying choledocholithiasis was 20.0%, 40.0%, 80.0%, 90.0%, and 95.0%, respectively. The overall agreement between MRCP and ERCP was 90.6% for choledocholithiasis (kappa= 0.808, p < 0.01). The sensitivity of MRCP for detecting choledocholithiasis decreased with dilated bile ducts (bile duct diameter > 10 mm, 72.7% vs 88.9%). The combination of ERCP and IDUS improved accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.MRCP can be used to select patients with biliary pancreatitis who require ERCP. IDUS may be applied in the management of biliary pancreatitis if ERCP is performed.Operative cholangiography: a perspective.Two hundred and eighty-seven patients having operative cholangiograms were identified from a prospective study of 346 patients undergoing surgery for gallstones. Forty-two patients (14.6%) had filling defects and bile duct (BD) exploration. The false-positive exploration rate was 2.8%. Eight patients (2.8%) had unexpected BD calculi with no abnormality in pre-operative liver function tests or ultrasound. If a policy of selective operative cholangiography is pursued, then failure to detect a small number of duct stones must be expected, although unnecessary duct exploration is likely to be eliminated. The clinical significance of undetected BD calculi remains debatable.Must ERCP Be routinely performed if choledocholithiasis is suspected?To evaluate the results of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the diagnosis and treatment of those patients suspected of harboring bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).A total of 1,235 consecutive LCs performed between 1991 and 1997 were studied prospectively. ERCP was performed to explore the common bile duct (CBD) preoperatively when choledocholithiasis was suspected on the basis of clinical, analytical or echographical data.ERCPs were performed in 268 patients: unsuccessful CBD evaluation in 3%; dilated CBD without lithiasis in 13%, and normal exploration in 37% (99 patients). CBD stones were found in 46% (124 patients), and endoscopic sphincterotomy was then performed and stone extraction attempted. Endoscopic therapy achieved 92.8% successful removal of CBD stones (115 patients). There was no ERCP-related mortality and the morbidity rate was 6%. Retained CBD stones have been observed in 7 cases after ERCP-LC; all of them have been successfully treated by ERCP.A combined approach to bile duct stones with selective use of ERCP followed by LC is a good therapeutical alternative. Nevertheless, the usual selection criteria for ERCP may lead to unnecessary exploration. It appears to be necessary to modify the current diagnostic and therapeutic strategy.EUS versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiography for patients with intermediate probability of bile duct stones: a prospective randomized trial.Factors affecting diagnostic accuracy and comparison of patients in the follow-up period for negative outcomes are not thoroughly investigated in a randomized trial.Our purpose was to compare diagnostic accuracy, complications, and number of interventions.Prospective, unicentric, single-blind, randomized study.Single tertiary referral university hospital.One hundred twenty patients with intermediate risk for common bile duct (CBD) stones were randomized to either an EUS-first, endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC)-second (n = 60) versus an ERC-only (n = 60) procedure.EUS, ERC, sphincterotomy, and balloon sweeping of CBD when needed.Sensitivity of EUS versus ERC, factors affecting diagnostic capability, complications, total number of endoscopic procedures.The sensitivity and specificity of ERC were 75% (95% CI, 42%-93%) and 100% (95% CI, 95%-100%), respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS were 91% (95% CI, 59%-99%) and 100% (95% CI, 95%-100%), respectively. EUS is more sensitive than ERC in detecting stones smaller than 4 mm (90% vs 23%, P < .01). Although not significant, there was a trend for an increased number of endoscopic procedures in the ERC group compared with the EUS group (98 vs 83). The post-ERC pancreatitis rate was 6 in 120 (5%) in all study patients, and the post-ERC pancreatitis rate in patients with an undilated CBD was 5 of 53 (9.43%). The independent factors for post-ERC pancreatitis are undilated CBD (risk ratio [RR] 6.320; 95% CI, 1.703-11.524, P = .009), allocation into the ERC group (RR 2.107; 95% CI, 1.330-3.339, P = .02), female sex (RR 1.803; 95% CI, 1.155-2.813, P = .03), and age less than 40 years (RR 1.888; 95% CI, 1.245-2.863, P = .01). Kaplan-Meier analysis revealed higher rate of negative outcome in the ERC group than in the EUS group (P = .049, log-rank test).The EUS-first approach is not associated with further risk for subsequent endoscopic procedures. Patients with an undilated CBD should be investigated by the EUS-first approach to prevent post-ERC pancreatitis.Intraoperative ultrasonography versus cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective comparative study.The purpose of this study was to compare the functional utility of intraoperative ultrasonography (IOUS) and cholangiography (IOC) during a laparoscopic cholecystectomy for the treatment of gallstone disease.A prospective study comparing IOUS and IOC was carried out in 65 patients. Intraoperative ultrasonography was conducted first using a 7.5-MHz linear array probe. After IOUS, IOC was then conducted in all patients. The respective usefulness of IOUS and IOC in the identification of gallstones, detection of hepatobiliary structures, and demonstration of congenital anomalies was then compared.Intraoperative ultrasonography was successful in all 65 patients, and IOC was successful only in 54. The time required for IOUS was significantly shorter (p < 0.0001) than for IOC. Intraoperative ultrasonography imaged the hepatic ducts and their confluence, the common hepatic duct, the common bile duct, and the ampulla of Vater in 97, 100, 97, and 51% of cases, respectively. Intraoperative cholangiography, on the other hand, depicted these structures in 85, 89, 100, and 94% of cases, respectively. Intraoperative ultrasonography demonstrated the cystic duct and its confluence in 94% of cases. Biliary anomalies were identified by IOUS in 12 patients and by IOC in 13. Intraoperative ultrasonography could detect the hilar vascular structures in most patients and visualized anomalies of the hepatic arteries in 5 patients. In this series, 5 patients had choledocholithiasis. The sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracies in identifying these bile duct stones were 80, 98, 80, 98, and 97% by IOUS, and 80, 97, 67, 98, and 95% by IOC, respectively.Intraoperative ultrasonography is superior to cholangiography with respect to its safety, shorter examination period, and ease of administration in all patients. In addition, IOUS is also better for identifying subtle anatomic detail. Intraoperative ultrasonography compares favorably with IOC in terms of utility in exploring bile ducts for stones. Intraoperative ultrasonography is an effective procedure for biliary exploration during a laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Endoscopic sphincterotomy in 100 patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: ultrasound evaluation.The aim of the study was to determine to what extent ultrasonography may monitor the process of sphincterotomy and its effectiveness. The study also aimed at determining the sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detecting choledocholithiasis, in comparison with the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Between January 1995 and June 2001, endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed on 100 patients with suspected synchronous choledocholithiasis in preparation for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The main parameters evaluated in the ultrasonography image included the breadth of the common bile duct and absence or presence of concrements in bile ducts before and after sphincterotomy.Applied before the endoscopic operation, ultrasonography revealed choledocholithiasis in 58 patients and dilatation of the common bile duct in 95 patients. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography confirmed choledocholithiasis in 74 patients, after sphincterotomy concrements were removed in 63 persons. In 26 patients sphincterotomy was performed for stenosis of Vater's papilla. Patients with the breadth of the duct > 10 mm, were referred to a check-up examination.Compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography correctly specifies the breadth of the bile duct and properly monitors the process of endoscopic sphincterotomy, but is less accurate in determining the occurrence of choledocholithiasis, and sensitivity in the test amounted to 73%, and specificity of the examination--84.5%.Comparison of cholangiography and ultrasonography in the operative screening of the common bile duct.A prospective evaluation of the diagnostic work-up before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prerequisite for successful laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the exclusion of potential risks such as cholangiolithiasis or anatomical malformations. As there is no general agreement regarding the appropriate preoperative diagnostic work-up, a comparative study of different diagnostic methods was carried out.In 180 consecutive patients admitted to a community hospital for cholecystectomy due to symptomatic cholecystolithiasis, a prospective comparison was carried out of the diagnostic accuracy of patient history, physical examination, laboratory tests, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, intravenous cholangiography, ultrasonography, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Measurement of the diameter of the common bile duct was found to be a reliable method as a single noninvasive parameter for diagnosing cholangiolithiasis (sensitivity 100%, specificity 93%), with good predictive power (positive predictive value 0.7, negative predictive value 1.0). The best accuracy achieved noninvasively and without sonography was with a combination of positive patient history and gamma-glutamyl transferase findings (sensitivity 58%, specificity 84%, positive predictive value 0.37, negative predictive value 0.93). ERCP detected additional cholangiolithiasis in 19 of 139 patients (13.7%) and anatomical malformations in three patients. In all 19 patients, the bile ducts were cleared of stones endoscopically within 24 hours, prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Among the 163 patients primarily assigned to laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the protocol diagnostic work-up, including ERCP, allocated three patients (1.8%) to open surgery. Conversion from laparoscopic cholecystectomy to open cholecystectomy occurred in a further two of 158 patients (1.3%).These results show that routine ultrasonography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be recommended in order to determine the diameter of the common bile duct. In patients with a ductal diameter of more than 6 mm, ERCP should be performed. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be carried out within 24 hours after ERCP and papillotomy.Evaluation of perioperative cholangiography in one thousand laparoscopic cholecystectomies.We analyzed a teaching institution's experience with intra-operative cholangiography (IOCG) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and established an algorithm for their timing and use. The records of all patients undergoing LC during a five year period were reviewed. Patients with a history of jaundice or pancreatitis, abnormal bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase, or radiographic evidence suggestive of choledocholithiasis were considered "at risk" for common bile duct stones (CBDS). The remaining patients were considered to be at low "risk." LC was attempted on 1002 patients during the study period and successfully completed on 941 (94% of the time). The major complication rate was 3.1% and the common bile duct injury rate 0.1%. Eighty eight (9.5%) patients underwent ERCP, 67 in the preoperative period and 19 in the postoperative period. IOCG was attempted in 272 (24%) patients and completed in 234 for a success rate of 86%. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOCG) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were equivalent in the detection of CBDSs Twelve of the 21 patients (57%) with IOCG positive for stones underwent successful laparoscopic clearance of the common duct, and did not require postop. ERCP. No patients were converted to an open procedure for common bile duct exploration. Because postoperative ERCP was 100% successful in clearing the common duct, reoperation for retained common bile duct stones was not necessary. IOCG is an alternative procedure to ERCP for patients at risk with biochemical, radiological, or clinical evidence of choledocholithiasis. The incidence of CBDS in low-risk patients is 1.7%, a risk that does not warrant routine cholangiography. Preoperative ERCP is recommended in cases of cholangitis unresponsive to antibiotics, suspicion of carcinoma, and biliary pancreatitis unresponsive to supportive care. Although IOCG leads to a similar percentage of nontherapeutic studies as preoperative ERCP, it often allows for one procedure therapy.Selective per-operative cholangiography and scoring method for selection.A prospective clinical study was undertaken over a period of 3 years on a series of 210 consecutive cases of gall stones to review a selective policy for per-operative cholangiography (PC). All patients had elective cholecystectomy and routine PC. A scoring method (SM) based on pre and per-operative surgical criteria was adopted to determine the necessity of PC before this was attempted. The study revealed that PC was indicated in 64 cases (30.5%) only. Of these 64 patients 20 had abnormal cholangiograms of which 18 proved positive on exploration. There were two false positive results (0.95%) of PC but no false negative result. Of 146 patients (69.5%) not clinically indicated for routine PC, 145 had normal cholangiograms and one had a small (5 mm diameter) silent stone (0.47%) in the Common Bile Duct (CBD). The scoring method failed to predict this case of silent stone. PC was technically unsatisfactory in 4 cases (1.9%). Thus by adopting the selective policy X-rays could have been avoided in 69.5% cases in which only a small silent stone would have been overlooked. However, this stone could have passed into the duodenum spontaneously or else it could have been removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy had it caused any symptoms. It is concluded that routine PC is not always necessary, a selective policy may be preferred and a scoring method may be used as a guide for selection of the cases.[Ultrasonics and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Correlation in biliopancreatic pathology].[Comparison of laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomies. Results of a prospective study].Prospective evaluation of the results of laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography to investigate choledocholithiasis and detect variations in biliary anatomy during laparoscopic cholecystectomies.The biliary trees of 600 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy were routinely explored by laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography.Laparoscopic ultrasound was performed in all 600 cases. Cholangiography was performed in 498 (83%). Laparoscopic ultrasound required less time than cholangiography: 10.2 minutes versus 17.9 minutes (P=0.0001). Common bile duct stones were detected intraoperatively in 40 cases (7%). Both methods were equally effective. The sensitivity of laparoscopic ultrasound was 80% and its specificity 99%. For cholangiography these values were 75% and 98% respectively. For laparoscopic ultrasound, false positives and false negatives were noted in the first 45 cases of individual trainees. Nevertheless, cholangiography showed 30 anatomical anomalies and laparoscopic ultrasound only 15.Laparoscopic ultrasound can be performed rapidly and in all cases. Results are comparable to cholangiography in the detection of common duct stones. Individual training is necessary to optimize efficacy. Anatomical anomalies are often missed.Comparison of CT duodeno-cholangiopancreatography to ERCP for assessing biliary obstruction.The authors have developed a CT protocol, CT duodeno-cholangiopancreatography (CDCP), which is performed during a single contrast-enhanced phase, proceeding cranially, allowing enhancement of the pancreas during its parenchymal phase followed by enhancement of the liver during its portal-venous phase. This retrospective pilot study evaluates CDCP compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as a diagnostic tool for assessing the cause and level of biliary obstruction. Forty-one patients with jaundice underwent CDCP and ERCP between October 2002 and May 2004. Pathologic confirmation was obtained in 31 of the 41 (76%) patients. The sensitivity, specificity, and kappa values of CDCP and ERCP compared with pathology were calculated for tumors and stones. Pathology-proven cases included 7 cases of stones, 23 tumors, and 1 other cause of obstruction. The overall level of agreement of diagnoses between CDCP and pathology was 29 of 31 (93.5%); that between CDCP and ERCP was 36 of 41 (88%). Comparing CDCP to pathology for tumors, the sensitivity was 100%, the specificity was 89%, and the kappa was 0.92 (95% CI 0.76-1.0). For stone detection, CDCP had a sensitivity of 86%, a specificity of 100%, and a kappa value of 0.90 (95% CI 0.72-1.0). For level of obstruction of the common bile duct, comparing CDCP to ERCP, observations agreed in 31 of the 36 (86%) cases; for the pancreatic duct, observations agreed in 24 of the 25 (96%) cases. CDCP is a noninvasive diagnostic tool that can be used to assess the cause and level of obstruction. A blinded prospective study would be valuable to further assess the merits of CDCP.Intraoperative imaging of the biliary tree. Sonography vs. operative cholangiography.The accepted technique for diagnosing choledocholithiasis at the time of cholecystectomy is operative cholangiography. Reports in the surgical literature suggest that intraoperative ultrasound can replace operative cholangiography in the accurate detection of common duct stones. This prospective study was performed jointly by radiologists and surgeons together in the operating room. Twenty-one patients underwent intraoperative ultrasonography and operative cholangiography at the time of cholecystectomy. In the 16 cases in which both studies were adequate, there were 11 in which no stones were seen on either; three in which stones were seen on both; and two in which stones were diagnosed by sonography alone. In one of these latter cases, the stones were confirmed, making the cholangiogram falsely negative. In the other case, no stones were found so we presume that sonography was falsely positive. Although this technique can be accurate and useful, it is technically demanding, even for an experienced sonologist. We feel that this technique is likely to be of benefit only to the surgeon with considerable ultrasound training, expertise, and motivation.Laparoscopic management of common bile duct stones. A multi-institutional SAGES study. Society of American Gastrointestinal Endoscopic Surgeons.Laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (CBDE) was the subject of a multi-institutional study on 226 patients from 19 major hospital centers. Female patients predominated (2.3:1); the average age was 54; 75% of cases were chronic, and the remainder were acute. Although 97% had preoperative ultrasonograms, only 12% showed a stone in the dilated common bile duct. The alkaline phosphatase was elevated in 41% and the serum bilirubin in 28% of cases. Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography with sphincterotomy (ERC-ES) was performed in 8.5%; there was a successful stone extraction in less than half the cases. Cholangiography was performed in 99.5%, and in 94% of those cases, stones were found. In 83% of cases, stones were removed through the transcystic approach, and in 17% removal was throughout the CBD. In the majority of cases, the choledochoscope and wire basket (34%), irrigation (33%), or a combination of both was employed. In the transcystic group, 5% were converted to open procedures due to technical difficulty, as contrasted with the trans-CBD route, where the conversion rate was 19%. There were two ductal injuries. Minor complications occurred in 5.7% within 24 h; there was one death (0.4%). Within 30 days, the morbidity rate was 7% and there were no deaths. Retained stones were discovered in 2.6% of cases. Laparoscopic CBDE is a feasible approach for CBD stones which permits a definitive procedure in one stage, without pre- or postoperative ES. It is a skill which should be mastered by the biliary surgeon. Further improvement in instrumentation and technique should make the laparoscopic approach not only comparable but preferable to the standard open choledocholithotomy.Routine magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and intra-operative cholangiogram in the evaluation of common bile duct stones.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) is a safe and sensitive investigation for the imaging of common bile duct pathology. When used to exclude common bile duct (CBD) stones, MRCP may obviate the need for intra-operative cholangiogram (IOC). In this prospective study, we looked at the single centre results of patients who underwent cholecystectomy with IOC following pre-operative MRCP.Over a period of 18 months, 69 patients (24 male and 45 female; mean age 59 years [range, 19-86 years]) were investigated by MRCP prior to cholecystectomy. All patients underwent IOC. Inclusion criteria for MRCP consisted of derangement of liver function tests and/or history of jaundice in cases of ultrasound-proven cholelithiasis.Sixteen patients had suspected stones or filling defects on MRCP; all but two of these were confirmed to be stones on IOC. In only one patient was a stone visualised on IOC and not seen on MRCP.MRCP may be the only pre-operative investigation needed for exclusion of CBD stones, obviating the necessity for IOC.Diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Relations between historical, laboratory, operative, and peroperative roentgen data.Operative cholangiography: a reappraisal based on a review of 400 cholangiograms.In the period 1957-72, 426 patients were operated upon for calculous disease of the biliary tract. For various reasons pre-exploratory operative cholangiography was not performed in 26 patients, but in the remaining 400 patients this examination was the major determinant as to whether or not the common duct contained calculi, and hence required exploration. Analysis of this series of 400 patients shows that without operative cholangiography (a) ductal stones would have been overlooked in 16 of the 78 patients with stones in the common duct (4 per cent of the whole series; 20-5 per cent of those with stones in the common bile duct); (b) exploration of the common duct would have been required in a further 48 (15 per cent) of the 322 patients without stones in the common duct, giving a positive yield from operative cholangiography in 64 patients (16 per cent) in the whole series. Negative exploration of the common duct was performed in only 31 patients, that is 29 per cent of the patients whose duct was explored but only 7-8 per cent of the whole group. The criteria by which an operative cholangiogram should be assessed were re-evaluated in the light of the findings in these 400 patients. In general the criteria of normality previously described were affirmed, and the following points established: a. In the absence of a filling defect the diameter of the duct is the most important indication of the presence of a stone. b. There is a statistically significant increase in the diameter of the common duct with age, and though not great this could, if neglected, give rise to error in the interpretation of the cholangiogram in younger patients. c. Even within the overall normal range of duct diameter (less than 12 mm) the wider the duct, the greater is the chance of it harbouring a stone. d. Impaired flow of contrast material into the duodenum is significantly related to duct diameter. e. Impaired flow of contrast material into the duodenum and failure to delineate the terminal segment of the duct tend to occur together; they may occur in a duct free of stones and if they are the only abnormality the examination should be repeated after the inhalation of amyl nitrite. This study confirms that operative cholangiography is the most accurate method at present available of determining whether or not the common duct contains a stone (or stones), and hence requires exploration.Selective use of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the management of suspected common bile duct (CBD) stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy is common. The associated morbidity can be significant. The present study determines significant predictors of CBD stones and improves the selection of patients for preoperative ERCP.All preoperative ERCP for suspected CBD stones in the year 1998 were studied retrospectively. Univariate and multivariate analyses of a number of clinical, biochemical and radiological variables were carried out to determine the best predictors of CBD stones.A total of 112 patients had successful preoperative ERCP. Sixty-one per cent of these were negative for stones and the morbidity was 9%. Univariate analysis revealed the following variables as predictors: cholangitis (P = 0.006), abnormal serum bilirubin > or = 3 days (P = 0.002), serum alkaline phosphatase > or = 130 U/L (P = 0.002), deranged liver function tests (P = < 0.001) and CBD diameter > or = 8 mm (P = 0.009) with positive predictive values of 80%, 68%, 49%, 38% and 52%, respectively. Multivariate analysis revealed the model with the best ability to discriminate for CBD stones (P = 0.0005) was cholangitis, abnormal serum bilirubin for > or = 3 days and CBD diameter > or = 8 mm. The best predictors from this study had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 27%.The predictors of CBD stones are imprecise. Until laparoscopic exploration of CBD becomes widely available, ERCP prior to cholecystectomy will remain popular. The use of stricter selection criteria can reduce the number of negative preoperative ERCP.[Retrospective evaluation of 500 endoscopic cholangiopancreatographies performed at the Instituto Nacional de la Nutricin "Salvador Zubiran"].We evaluated 500 endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographies (ERCP) performed on 422 patients during a 5-year period in the Gastrointestinal Endoscopy Department, Instituto Nacional de la Nutricin Salvador Zubirn, Mxico, D.F. ERCP combines endoscopic and radiologic techniques in order to obtain high quality opacification of pancreatic and biliary ducts. The rate of success for cannulation was 90%; desired duct opacification was possible in 89%. The most frequent indication for ERCP was to establish the differential diagnosis for jaundice; biliary stones in the common bile duct was the most frequent diagnosis, followed by normal biliary ducts. Pancreatography was normal in 74% of patients. ERCP complications were detected in 5.6%; fever and transient pain was the most common complaint in 1.6%. Mortality attributable to the procedure was 0.8%. From histological corroboration of cases by surgery or postmortem studies, diagnostic sensitivity was 92%, specificity 76%, positive predictive value 96% and a prevalence of 89%. We conclude that ERCP is highly sensitive and specific in diagnosing bilio-pancreatic-duodenal disease. Our results are comparable to other's experiences published throughout the world.Selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography to facilitate laparoscopic cholecystectomy without cholangiography. A review of 1139 consecutive cases.The aim of this study was to show that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography.We performed a retrospective analysis of 1139 consecutive patients (376 men and 763 women with an average age of 51.4 years) who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy between 1991 and 1999. In all, 227 patients (20%) were selected to undergo preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) on the basis of four criteria for risk of stones.ERCP allowed us to make a diagnosis of biliary stones in 53.3% of the selected patients. Extraction of the stones was successful in 97% of the cases. In 14% of cases, ERCP was normal; in 32.7%, some useful diagnostic information was obtained. There were three complications (pancreatitis) following endoscopy (complication rate, 1.3%). Laparoscopic cholecystectomy was successful in 92% of patients. The postoperative morbidity rate was 3.2% (major complications, 0.5%). There were no deaths. During a follow-up period ranging from 3 to 97 months, six patients (0.6%) were found to have residual biliary stones.This study confirms the hypothesis that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography.Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography: therapeutic impact in a general population of patients needing a cholecystectomy.The place of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) before open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy remains controversial. Most of the reports study highly selected series of patients and therefore do not give a survey of the actual situation in a general population. We describe here the therapeutic impact of preoperative ERCP in a continuous cohort of patients needing a cholecystectomy.Data concerning a 2-year continuous and unselected series of 452 patients undergoing cholecystectomy were evaluated.Two hundred ninety-three patients (65%) presented with a chronic symptomatic biliary lithiasis and 159 patients (35%) with a complicated biliary lithiasis. A preoperative ERCP was performed in 206 patients, all presenting with a suspicion of associated lithiasis of the common bile duct (CBD). An endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed in 106 patients: 44 patients presented with CBD stones (9.7%), all successfully cleared by endoscopy. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy has been attempted in 367 patients (81%) and successfully performed in 333 patients (74%). Laparotomy as a first-choice procedure was performed in 85 patients (19%). Surgical choledochotomy was never performed. Postoperative ERCP was needed in 4 patients (0.88%) and in only 1 of them for a retained CBD stone (0.22%).In a continuous series of patients needing a cholecystectomy, preoperative ERCP was performed on the basis of suspected CBD disorders. It allows CBD stone detection and extraction in almost 10% of the patients and avoids peroperative CBD exploration, with a very low rate of retained stones after surgery. The association of preoperative ERCP with subsequent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (when feasible) offers the patient a quick recovery and a short hospital stay.[Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography--a 4-year retrospective study].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) may lead to serious complications. Recently, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) has been introduced as a diagnostic alternative to ERCP. This study was initiated to document the diagnostic and therapeutic capabilities of ERCP, enabling us to compare the two techniques. Results of 567 ERCP procedures in 371 patients were reviewed. Bile duct stones were the most frequent indication for the procedure (66%). Normal duct systems (37%) and common bile duct stones (35%) were the most frequent findings. Stone extraction was performed in 97 patients. In 18 patients minor stones were left behind and in six patients open choledocholithotomy was performed. Procedure related mortality was 0.3% and 0.8% in the diagnostic and therapeutic group respectively. Five patients developed serious pancreatitis, and duodenal perforation complicated two procedures. 56% of the procedures were diagnostic and could probably have been replaced by MRCP if this technique had been available during the study period.The role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in management of patients recovering from acute biliary pancreatitis in the laparoscopic era.Traditionally an episode of acute biliary pancreatitis (ABP) is an indication for direct imaging of the biliary tree. The optimal approach may vary according to local expertise, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is the most common. The fact that the incidence of choledocholithiasis in patients recovering from ABP varies between 3 and 33% raises a question about the necessity of visualizing the biliary tree in all patients recovering from ABP.In order to evaluate this policy, we reviewed 48 ERCPs performed on patients recovering from ABP who were scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). We checked the correlations between ERCP findings and the severity of pancreatitis, biochemistry values (which were sampled during the acute phase), and ultrasonographic (US) findings.The ERCP demonstrated common bile duct (CBD) stones in 11 (22.9%) patients. US finding of a dilated CBD and maximal aspartate transaminase (AST) values higher than 90 units/l were significantly correlated with CBD stones (a relative risk [RR] of 2.95 with a 95% confidence interval [CI] for a dilated CBD and RR of 3.89 with a 95% CI of 1.18-12.80 for an AST value higher than 90 units/l). No other parameters were significantly correlated with CBD stones.We, therefore, recommend performing a preoperative ERCP only on patients who present with an ultrasonographic finding of CBD dilatation. The correlation to high AST is still to be proven.[Laparoscopic cholecystectomy and lithiasis of the common bile duct: prospective study on the importance of preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography].Laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the standard treatment of symptomatic gallstones. At present, no consensus has been reached on the diagnostic and therapeutic methods of concomitant common bile duct stones. Systematic preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography followed, if necessary, by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy during the same anesthetic procedure could be a diagnostic and therapeutic alternative for common bile duct stones making possible a laparoscopic cholecystectomy without intraoperative investigation of the common bile duct.One hundred and twenty-five patients underwent a prospective endoscopic ultrasonographic evaluation prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for symptomatic gallstones. Fourty-four patients (35%) had at least one predictive factor for common bile duct stones. Endoscopic ultrasonography and cholecystectomy were performed on the same day. Endoscopic ultrasonography was followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy by the same endoscopist in case of common bile duct stones on endoscopic ultrasonography. Patients were routinely followed up between 3 and 6 months and one year after cholecystectomy.Endoscopic ultrasonography suggested common bile duct stones in 21 patients (17%). Endoscopic ultrasonography identified a stone in 17 of 44 patients (38.6%) with predictor of common bile duct stones and only in 4 of 81 patients (4.9%) without predictor of common bile duct stone. Among these 21 patients, one patient was not investigated with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography because of the high risk of sphincterotomy, 19 patients had a stone removed after sphincterotomy, one patient had no visible stone neither on endoscopic retrograde cholangiography, nor on exploration of the common bile duct after sphincterotomy. Endoscopic ultrasonography was normal in 104 patients (83%). However, two patients in this group were investigated with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography because endoscopic ultrasonography was incomplete in one case and because endoscopic ultrasonography was normal in the second case but a stone in the left hepatic duct was detected by ultrasonography. A stone was removed after endoscopic sphincterotomy in these two patients. In the group of 102 patients without stone, 91 out of 92, continued to be asymptomatic during a median follow-up of 8.5 months. One patient with symptoms one month after cholecystectomy underwent endoscopic sphincterotomy but no stone was found.Systematic preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography followed, if necessary with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy is a diagnostic and therapeutic alternative for common bile duct stones making possible a laparoscopic cholecystectomy without intraoperative investigation of the common bile duct for all patients. This alternative is only justifiable in patients with predictor of common bile duct stones.[Comparative study of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in common duct stones].To compare the diagnostic value study the technique of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in common duct stones.Three hundreds and eighty-four patients suspected common duct stones from August 2005 to October 2007 were undergone abdominal ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP.There was stone in common duct in 370 and no stones in 14 of 384 patients. Ultrasonography indicated stones 268 cases, 8 false positive result was among them. MRCP diagnosed stones in 362 cases and false positive result in 6 cases, ERCP diagnosed stones 370 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP was 70.3% (260/370), 96.2% (356/370) and 100% respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography for common duct stone was little higher, US should be used as a primary checking method. There was higher concordance between MRCP and ERCP for common duct stone. Combination of MRCP and ERCP can improve diagnostic accuracy of common duct stone.Comparison of operative ultrasonography and radiography in screening of the common bile duct for calculi.An analysis of perioperative cholangiography in one thousand laparoscopic cholecystectomies.We undertook this retrospective study to ascertain the proper role of perioperative cholangiography in the management of 1002 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy for symptomatic cholelithiasis.Nine hundred forty-one patients were categorized as being at high or low risk for choledocholithiasis according to the presence or absence of jaundice, pancreatitis, elevated bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase, or radiographic evidence of common bile duct stones (CBDSs).Intraoperative cholangiography (IOCG) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were equivalent in the detection of CBDSs, and laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (CBDE) was successful in 12 of the 21 patients (57%) in whom it was attempted. The ducts of the other 52 patients with CBDSs were successfully cleared by preoperative or postoperative ERCP.Laparoscopic IOCG is successful in detecting CBDS in high-risk patients and half of these ducts can be cleared laparoscopically. The incidence of CBDS in low-risk patients is 1.7%, a risk that does not warrant routine cholangiography. These data suggest ERCP should be reserved for those at-risk individuals in whom IOCG or laparoscopic duct clearance has been unsuccessful.Operative cholangiography: 1,000 cases.[Diagnosis and therapy of biliary calculi. Combined use of ERCP, PTC and endoscopic papillotomy].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and gray-scale abdominal ultrasound in the diagnosis of jaundice.Fifty-five patients with suspected obstructive jaundice were studied with both ERCP and abdominal ultrasound. Biliary tract obstruction was documented in 49 patients and parenchymal liver disease in 7. A definite cause of jaundice was demonstrated by ERCP in 45 of 49 patients with biliary tract obstruction but in only 28 of 49 patients by ultrasound. Bile duct dilatation, where present, was detected by ERCP in only 33 of 42 patients. ERCP was particularly effective in patients with common duct stones; common duct calculi and a dilated common duct were detected in 15 of 16 such patients. Dilated bile ducts where present were detected by ultrasound in 22 of 42 patients. Ultrasound was particularly helpful in patients with pancreatic cancer in whom a dilated common duct could not be opacified during ERCP. ERCP and abdominal ultrasound together provide a rapid and safe method of diagnosis in the jaundiced patient with suspected bile duct obstruction.Utility of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the evaluation of idiopathic abdominal pain.We investigated the role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in 86 consecutive patients with idiopathic chronic or recurrent abdominal pain. There were 18 males and 68 females with a mean age of 48 yr. Forty patients (47%) had previous cholecystectomy. Patients were divided into two groups: group I (normal serum alkaline phosphatase and total bilirubin) (n = 52), and group II (elevated serum alkaline phosphatase and/or total bilirubin) (n = 34). Pancreatograms were normal in all patients, including five with pancreas divisum. Cholangiograms were abnormal in 10 of the 34 patients in group II (30%), and in only three of the 52 patients in group I (6%) (p = 0.003). Bile duct stones were present in 18% of the patients in group II, and in none of the patients in group I (p = 0.003). Of the 40 post-cholecystectomy patients, four patients had bile duct stones and five had common bile duct dilation without stones. However, no stones were found in any post-cholecystectomy patients with normal liver tests. Of the 46 patients with gallbladder in situ, two patients with abnormal liver tests had common bile duct stones and two patients had common bile duct dilation without stones. These results indicate that, among patients with idiopathic abdominal pain, cholangiography should be performed primarily in those with abnormal liver tests; however, further investigation with pancreatography is unnecessary.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) has become established as the gold standard in imaging of the biliary tree. Recently, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) has been introduced as a new, non-invasive imaging modality for the detection of bile-duct stones and other pathology related to the biliary tract and pancreas. The aim of this study was to determine how MRCP compared with ERCP in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.A prospective study of 133 patients referred for either ERCP or MRCP was carried out to compare the results of both these methods in determining the presence of choledocholithiasis.18 patients were excluded from the analysis: ERCP was unsuccessful in eight of these patients and MRCP was not possible in the remaining 10 patients. There were six false negative results with MRCP; in five of these the calculi were less than 5 mm in diameter. MRCP showed a sensitivity of 84%, specificity of 96%, positive predictive value of 91%, negative predictive value of 93% and diagnostic accuracy of 92% when compared to ERCP as the gold standard.MRCP has high sensitivity and high specificity for stones greater than 5 mm in diameter and should be performed in preference to ERCP as the first-line investigation in patients with gallstones and abnormal liver function tests in the elective setting. Adoption of this guideline at our institution would result in a 9% reduction in the number of ERCPs performed.Selective endoscopic cholangiography for the detection of common bile duct stones in patients with cholelithiasis.The detection and management of common bile duct (CBD) stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy continues to be controversial. Several diagnostic and therapeutic strategies have been suggested. These include intraoperative cholangiography, selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography, and endoscopic ultrasonography. The aim of this study was to evaluate the efficacy of selective ERCP in detecting CBD stones in patients with cholelithiasis before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.In a prospective study, patients with cholelithiasis who presented during a 6-year period were assessed on a selective basis with ERCP for suspected CBD stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy. ERCP was carried out if the patient had any of the following criteria: a dilated CBD on ultrasound, gallstone pancreatitis, or abnormal liver function tests. Intraoperative cholangiography was not performed in any of the patients. Long-term follow-up was undertaken.The study included 427 patients. On the basis of selective criteria, ERCP was carried out in 41 patients (9.6 %), with confirmed CBD stones in 22 cases (53.7 %). The most useful predictor of CBD stones on ERCP was the presence of a dilated CBD in association with abnormal liver function tests. In this situation, CBD stones were identified in 14 of 17 cases (82 %). Abnormal liver function tests alone had a sensitivity of 50 % (four of eight). All other parameters used in isolation had a lower detection rate. During a median follow-up period of 6 years (range 1-10 years), six of 386 patients (1.6 %) with initially normal imaging and biochemical tests presented again with retained stones. All were successfully managed by ERCP and sphincterotomy. There were no major complications.Preoperative selective ERCP is effective in detecting clinically significant CBD stones. However, there is a high false-negative rate when a single criterion is used to guide therapy. Multivariate analysis of preoperative parameters for risk stratification, in conjunction with other imaging modalities, may make it possible to minimize unnecessary ERCPs.Prospective controlled study of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in patients with suspected common-bileduct lithiasis.Endoscopic sphincterotomy is sometimes done unnecessarily in patients with suspected choledocholithiasis. Our aims were to assess the diagnostic accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and to find out whether endoscopic ultrasonography may help to prevent unnecessary sphincterotomy or surgical explorations.We recruited 119 patients aged 70.4 (SD 16.1) years with strongly suspected choledocholithiasis who presented to our endoscopy unit between January, 1994, and January, 1995. During the same spell of sedation or within 2 h of each other, endoscopic ultrasonography and ERC were carried out by investigators unaware of the patient's history. Endoscopic sphincterotomy with instrumental exploration was then done as the gold standard for the presence or the absence of stones.78 (66%) patients had choledocholithiasis; 17 (14%) had other bileduct diseases; 24 (20%) had a clear bileduct or did not require an invasive endoscopic procedure. The sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography was 93%, specificity 97%, positive predictive value 98%, and negative predictive value 88%. The corresponding values for ERC were 89%, 100%, 100%, and 83%. There were five false-negative cases by endoscopic ultrasonography (of which three were also negative with ERC) and one false-positive. The morbidity rate was 4.1%.We conclude that endoscopic ultrasonography is at least as sensitive as ERC. Endoscopic ultrasonography may prevent inappropriate invasive explorations of the common bileduct.Intraoperative cholangiography in combination with laparoscopic ultrasonography for the detection of occult choledocholithiasis.There is still a debate about the utility of intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) or laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) for detection of occult choledocholithiasis during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The aim of this study was to assess the value of IOC combined with LUS for detection of occult common bile duct (CBD) stones at LC.From Dec 2002 to Aug 2006, 103 patients with moderate risk of CBD stones underwent IOC and LUS simultaneously during LC. The physician teams for the two different procedures were blinded by each other. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, positive likelihood ratio, and negative likelihood ratio were calculated by several contingency tables that cross-tabulated the results of each technique with those of the gold standard.The success rate of IOC and LUS were 91.3% and 100% respectively and the time required for LUS was significantly shorter (P<0.01). The visualization of intrapancreatic part of CBD by IOC (97.3%) was significantly higher than LUS (73.8%). The sensitivities, specificities, accuracies, positive and negative predictive values, positive and negative likelihood rations identifying occult CBD stones were 75.0%, 98.7%, 92.2%, 95.5%, 91.4%, 57.7 and 0.253 by IOC, and 82.1%, 98.7%, 94.2%, 95.8%, 93.7%, 63.2 and 0.181 by IUS respectively. The McNemar test showed no significant difference between two methods. The sensitivity of IOC combined with LUS was 92.9%, which was greater than that of IOC and LUS taken separately.LUS is usually performed in case where IOC has failed or is contraindicated. The combination of both methods maximizes intraoperative detection of occult CBD stones and should at least be recommended as two complementary methods.Comparative evaluation of preoperative and operative radiology in biliary-tract disease.[Diagnostic value of routine cholangiography during surgical treatment of the biliary ducts].Diagnostic and therapeutic value of ERCP and prediction of outcome: a retrospective analysis.The objective is to analyze the experience of using diagnostic and therapeutic ERCP and to attempt identifying the independent factors that predict positive and useful procedures. The medical records of 198 patients seen during the period 1991-1993 were retrospectively reviewed. There were 102 males and 96 females with a mean age of 45.2 SD + 16.7 years. The main indications for performing the procedure were jaundice, abdominal pain, nausea and/or fever. Laboratory tests showed elevated direct bilirubin in 50% of patients, deranged liver enzymes in 43%, and ESR was raised in 51% and fever was documented in 52% of patients. The cannulation of both ducts was successful in 93% of all procedures. The commonest finding was gallbladder and common bile duct stones (CBD). In 54 patients out of 64 with CBD stones, stones were removed endoscopically. Stepwise regressive analyzis has identified age above 40 years, presence of jaundice (total bilirubin > 2.5 mg/ml) and raised ESR (> 25 mm in the 1st hour) as significant factors that independently predict a positive ERCP that revealed findings previously unknown (useful procedure). Diagnostic and therapeutic ERCP is an integral part in management of biliary and pancreatic ducts disorders. The validity of clinical prediction role should be tested prospectively.Selective intraoperative cholangiography and single-stage management of common bile duct stone in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There are still debates and controversies in the detection and the management of common bile duct (CBD) stones in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). This prospective study was performed to evaluate a single-stage management of CBD stone during LC.Between May 1998 and January 2000, 249 consecutive patients with gallstone and cholecystitis were enrolled in this study. The mean age was 52.5 +/- 12.4 years. Male to female ratio was 106:143. All patients underwent abdominal sonography and the determination of the serum biochemical profile preoperatively. Patients presented with sepsis or with total bilirubin > or = 6 ng/dL were excluded from the study.244 (98%) patients underwent LC and 5 (2%) patients were converted to open cholecystectomy. Intraoperative cholangiogram (IOC) was only performed in patients who fulfilled our predetermined criteria. Among 90 patients who had IOC, only 23 patients had CBD stones that were removed either by transcystic duct stone extraction (61%) or CBD exploration (39%). The additional procedures to remove CBD stone did not prolong the hospitalization. There were four wound infections and one cystic stump leakage. One patient developed CBD stone during the follow-up period up to 37 months.Our study indicates that routine use of IOC during LC is not necessary. In addition, single-stage approach for the management of CBD stone during LC is feasible and should be considered by laparoscopic surgeons.Evaluation of operative cholangiography in 2043 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a case for the selective operative cholangiogram.There is still some controversy over whether to use laparoscopic operative cholangiograms routinely (RLOC) or selectively (SLOC). Due to their high cost as well as other issues, in March 1997 we converted from RLOC to SLOC. The purpose of this study was to validate that decision.The results of 2043 laparoscopic cholecystectomies (LC) were compiled and analyzed. The results of RLOC in 1556 patients undergoing LC from March 1990 through February 1997 were compared to the results of SLOC in 16 patients undergoing LC from March 1989 through February 1990 and 471 patients undergoing LC from March 1997 through December 1998. The literature was reviewed and data were compiled. Reasons that are typically given for operative cholangiograms (OC) were collected and scrutinized. Finally, cost surveys for RLOC and related procedures were obtained.Overall, laparoscopic operative cholangiogram (LOC) was attempted in 1661 patients and was successful in 1656 cases (99.7%). Bile duct stones (BDS) were evident in 166 patients. Laparoscopic bile duct exploration (LBDE) was attempted in all cases. None were referred for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). In the RLOC group, evidence of BDS was observed in 136 patients (9%). Forty-two were unsuspected (2.8%) and five were false positive (0.3%). In a collection of other RLOC studies, the average rate of unsuspected BDS was 2.9%, while the average rate of false positive cholangiograms was 1.6%. In the SLOC group, LOC was indicated in 139 of 487 patients (28.6%). None of the patients who did not have a LOC developed symptomatic residual BDS in < or = 11 years of follow-up. In a large collection of other SLOC studies, the rate of symptomatic residual BDS was 0.3%. A cost survey in February 1997 revealed that the average minimum global charge (MGC) for an OC was $1283.21; for a transcystic duct LBDE it was $1055.10, and for a transcholedochal LBDE it was $3263.61 [corrected]. The MGC for an ERCP with papillotomy was $4303.00. Thus, to avoid one patient with symptomatic residual BDS, 354 unnecessary procedures (333 RLOC, 18 LBDE, and three postoperative ERCP) costing $473,927.52 would be performed. There were no false negatives, bile duct injuries, or other complications attributable to RLOC or SLOC.The increased morbidity and cost of RLOC to avoid symptomatic residual BDS is not justified. All other reasons given for RLOC are either flawed or indicate that the procedure can be safely employed selectively. SLOC is an effective method of verifying suspected BDS and is safer and less expensive than RLOC.[Peroperative investigation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Laparoscopic ultrasonography versus cholangiography. A prospective study of 150 cases].From November 1994 to March 1996, 150 patients treated by laparoscopic cholecystectomy were included in a prospective study, in order to compare intraoperative cholangiography and laparoscopic ultrasound. The biliary tree was successively explored by the two methods in the systematic detection of common bile duct stones. The feasibility of laparoscopic ultrasound was 100 per cent. Cholangiography was performed in only 125 cases (83 per cent). The duration of the laparoscopic ultrasound exam was significantly shorter (11.6 vs 17.6 minutes, p = 0.0001). In this study, common bile duct stones were found in 14 cases (9 per cent). The detection rates with laparoscopic ultrasound and intraoperative cholangiography were similar. For laparoscopic ultrasound, sensitivity was 80 per cent and specificity was 99 per cent, versus 78 per cent and 97 per cent for cholangiography, respectively. The combination of the 2 examinations had a 100 per cent sensitivity and specificity. Laparoscopic ultrasound failed to recognize the intrapancreatic part of the bile duct (25 cases: 17 per cent), did not show anatomical abnormalities detected by cholangiography, but detected unsuspected digestive lesions. Laparoscopic ultrasound is safe repeatable, and non invasive, but a learning curve is necessary to increase this efficacy. Comparison of cost must be evaluated.[Use of endoscopic retrograde pancreatocholangiography in diagnosing and treating choledocholithiasis].Selective operative cholangiography. Appropriate management for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To evaluate the results of selective intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Retrospective study.Mayo Clinic, Rochester, Minn, from 1990 to 1991.Five hundred forty-two patients underwent attempted laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Excluding 28 (5.2%) who underwent conversion to laparotomy and 19 (3.5%) who did not respond to a follow-up questionnaire, there were 495 respondents (mean follow-up, 25 months).Incidence and management of choledocholithiasis, extrahepatic bile duct injuries, and other findings potentially affected by IOC.Twenty patients underwent preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for suspected common bile duct abnormalities, and 10 had common bile duct stones removed. Nearly a third (n = 161 [32.5%]) of the patients underwent IOC for laboratory, historical, or operative findings or for training purposes. Common bile duct stones were discovered on IOC in five patients (3.1%), three of whom were treated successfully with postoperative endoscopic therapy; the two others had normal findings on endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (false-positive results of IOC). In three other patients in whom IOC was unsuccessful or incomplete, symptomatic common bile duct stones developed. Two patients were treated with endoscopic techniques, and one required open common bile duct exploration. Among the 334 patients who did not undergo IOC, symptoms suggestive of retained stones developed in eight (2.4%) (all within 2 months of surgery; mean, 18 days), but stones were found at endoscopy retrograde cholangiopancreatography in only four patients. Two had preoperative criteria for performing IOC. In only three patients (0.6%) from the study population would symptomatic retained common bile duct stones have developed with selective IOC and routinely successful IOC. No common bile duct injuries occurred.Selective IOC during laparoscopic cholecystectomy is a safe practice when the ductal anatomy is clearly defined and there is no laboratory or clinical evidence of common bile duct abnormalities. Symptomatic retained common bile duct stones will be infrequent, and bile duct injuries will be rare when IOC is performed for the appropriate indications. These data do not support the need for routine IOC, although this procedure is an essential tool for the laparoscopic surgeon.Operative cholangiography.Retrospective analysis of 174 operative cholangiograms done over a 3-year period confirms its substantial benefit when used selectively in patients with clinical criteria for common bile duct exploration. A low incidental ductal stone rate of 1.6%, together with a 3.3% false positive cholangiogram rate and a case of bile duct injury resulting from the procedure makes its routine application appear superfluous.Prevalence of common bile duct stones according to the increasing number of risk factors present. A prospective study employing routinely intraoperative cholangiography in 477 cases.To determine if the use of Intraoperative choliangiography (IOC) should be routinely performed and, if not, which criteria should be used to select patients requiring IOC during open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy.495 Patients with 1 or more gallstones were included in a two-year study. Twelve clinical, laboratory, ultrasonographic and intraoperative factors were chosen and evaluated in all cases. Prior to cholecystectomy, IOC was performed after having identified the common bile duct (CBD) and cystic duct. The majority of the patients were operated on by the same surgeon to avoid differences in criteria and techniques. Statistical evaluation made use of the exact Fisher test and chi square test and, a p-value less than 0.05 was considered as significant.IOC could be performed in 479 out of the 495 cases. IOC resulted in a normal CBD in 76.0%, had a false positive in 2.7%, a false negative in 0.48%, and a presence of 1 or more stones in the CBD in 20.9%. The study revealed that when none of the 12 risk factors were present, there were no cases with CBD stones. As the number of risk factors increased, so did the number of cases presenting with CBD stones.Not all 12 risk factors show the same index of predictability; only 5 in particular (jaundice, ultrasound diameter CBD 7 mm, bilirubin over 26 umol/it, cystic duct > 4 mm and CBI, diameter over 9 mm) showed a high rate of predictability. However, when careful measurement and evaluation of risk factors for CBD stones are undertaken, it is possible to avoid the routine use of IOC.The clinical impact and cost implication of endoscopic ultrasound on use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in a Canadian university hospital.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is a safe alternative to endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) for diagnostic biliary imaging in choledocholithiasis. Evidence linking a decline in diagnostic ERCP with the introduction of EUS in clinical practice is limited.To assess the clinical impact and cost implications of a new EUS program on diagnostic ERCP at a tertiary referral centre.A retrospective review was performed of data collected during the first year of EUS at the University of Alberta Hospital (Edmonton, Alberta). Patients were referred for ERCP because of suspicion of choledocholithiasis based on clinical, biochemical and/or radiological parameters. If they were assessed to have an intermediate probability of choledocholithiasis, EUS was performed first. ERCP was performed if EUS suggested choledocholithiasis, whereas patients were clinically followed for six months if their EUS was normal. Cost data were assessed from a third-party payer perspective, and cost savings were expressed in terms of ERCP procedures avoided.Over 12 months, 90 patients (63 female, mean age 58 years) underwent EUS for suspected biliary tract abnormalities. EUS suggested choledocholithiasis in 20 patients (22%), and this was confirmed by ERCP in 17 of the 20 patients. EUS was normal in 69 patients, and none underwent a subsequent ERCP during a six-month follow-up period. One patient had pancreatic cancer and did not undergo ERCP. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS for choledocholithiasis were 100% and 96%, respectively. A total of 440 ERCP procedures were performed over the same 12-month period, suggesting that EUS resulted in a 14% reduction in ERCP procedures (70 of 510). There were no complications of EUS. The cost of 90 EUS procedures was $42,840, compared with $108,854 for 70 ERCP procedures. The cost savings for the first year were $66,014.EUS appears to be accurate, safe and cost effective in diagnostic biliary imaging for suspected choledocholithiasis. The impact of EUS is the avoidance of ERCP in selected cases, thereby preventing the risk of complications. Diagnostic ERCP should not be performed in centres and regions with physicians trained in EUS.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the elderly: a single unit audit.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) has an established role in the management of pancreato-biliary disease, but its role in elderly patients has not been evaluated. A prospective study was carried out in 50 elderly patients, aged between 65 and 94 years, to compare the sensitivity and specificity of ERCP in this age group with ultrasound and liver blood tests, and to examine its safety and therapeutic effectiveness. ERCP was successful in 46 of 50 (92%) procedures. Thirty-four patients had abnormal findings, and 18 sphincterotomies were performed. No complications were recorded. There was a poor correlation between ultrasound and ERCP with agreement in only 45% of cases; sensitivity 35% and specificity 75%. Liver blood tests, alkaline phosphatase and gamma-glutamyl transferase were elevated in all 30 cases with obstructed ducts on ERCP. Ultrasound revealed obstruction in only 10 (33%) of these. Thus, liver biochemistry proved a more reliable indicator of biliary obstruction than ultrasound. In 22 cases endoscopic stone clearance or demonstration of inoperable lesions obviated surgery while in 9 cases surgery was indicated, because of multiple large stones not cleared at ERCP, or for bypass of a malignant stricture. ERCP is therefore safe and effective with a high diagnostic and therapeutic yield even in the poor risk elderly.Choledocholithiasis: failure of routine operative cholangiography to improve results.Prospective evaluation of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in patients with biliary disease: comparative study with conventional ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography diagnostic algorithm.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is an accurate technique that can replace invasive diagnostic methods of the biliary and pancreatic duct.Our aim was to assess sensitivity and specificity of magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and ultrasonography using the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography as reference, and to establish a diagnostic algorithm under which circumstances magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography can replace endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Eighty-three patients with suspicion of biliary disease based on clinical, biochemical and ultrasonography findings were studied.Ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography were performed, comparing the results of the techniques for the determination of their sensitivity and specificity.Sensitivity and specificity results obtained by magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography were: 100 and 92.8% when dilated ducts were detected (n=61); 97.4 and 97.2% in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis (n=38); 100 and 96.7% in malignant lesions (n=14) and 81.8 and 98.4% when biliary ducts were normal. The percentage of images of diagnostic quality was 97.6%. Sensitivity and specificity achieved by ultrasonography was: 100 and 57.1% in detection of dilatation, 71 and 97.2% in choledocholithiasis, 92.8 and 96.7% in malignancy and 66.6 and 96.8% in normal ducts.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography is a technique with high sensitivity and specificity in the evaluation of biliary ducts. Thus, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography may replace diagnostic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography for purely diagnostic purposes, following an initial clinical and ultrasonographic exam.Diagnosis of asymptomatic common bile duct stones: preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography versus intraoperative cholangiography--a multicenter, prospective controlled study. French Associations for Surgical Research.In patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis, preoperative diagnosis of common bile duct (CBD) stones can modify the therapeutic strategy. The aims of this prospective, controlled multicenter study were to assess the feasibility, concordance, discordance, and indexes such as sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography compared with those of intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) in the diagnosis of asymptomatic CBD stones (i.e., patients undergoing cholecystectomy with no clinical or biologic evidence of CBD stones).From October 1993 to October 1995, 240 consecutive patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis, scheduled for cholecystectomy in 14 surgical centers, were enrolled in this study. All patients were selected for this study according to a preoperative high-risk CBD stone predictive score. Each patient underwent both endoscopic ultrasonography and IOC, as well as surgical exploration of the CBD when stones were detected during one or both preoperative investigations. All patients were seen 1 months and 1 year after operation to check for residual stones.The feasibility of endoscopic ultrasonography was significantly higher overall than that of IOC (99% vs 90%; p < 0.001), except when IOC was through a laparotomy (97% vs 93%; p = 0.16). The number of patients available for study was 215. In 198 cases (92%), results of both investigations were in concordance (161 negative and 37 positive values). Seventeen cases (8%) were discordant. There was overall concordance between the two investigations (kappa coefficient 0.764; 95% confidence interval 0.66 to 0.87), but the percentage of discordance was in favor of IOC. Sensitivity and specificity of IOC were significantly higher than those of endoscopic ultrasonography (1.00 and 0.98 vs 0.85 and 0.93, respectively). With a prevalence of CBD stones of 19%, positive and negative predictive values of IOC were significantly higher than those of endoscopic ultrasonography (0.93 and 1.00 vs 0.75 and 0.96, respectively).Although endoscopic ultrasonography is feasible more often than IOC, IOC is associated with a slightly lower degree of discordance and better information indexes and remains an efficient method of investigation for CBD stones. Endoscopic ultrasonography can be suggested in preference to endoscopic retrograde cholangiography when postoperative residual stones are suspected but need not be performed routinely before cholecystectomy.Preoperative selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and laparoscopic cholecystectomy without cholangiography.The aim of this study was to show that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography. We performed a retrospective analysis of 1750 consecutive patients (1170 females and 580 males with a mean age of 51 years) who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy between January 1991 and January 2000. In all, 193 patients (11%) were selected to undergo preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) on the basis of several criteria for risk of stones. No patients underwent intraoperative cholangiography. ERCP allowed us to make a diagnosis of biliary stones in 62.7% (121 cases). Extraction of the stones was successful in 96% of the cases. In 12% of cases ERCP findings were normal; in the remaining 26.3%, useful diagnostic information was obtained. There were three complications (bleeding and pancreatitis) after endoscopy (complication rate: 1.5%). Laparoscopic cholecystectomy was successful in 92.7% of patients, with a postoperative morbidity rate of 3% (0.5% of major complications). There were no deaths in this series. During a mean follow-up of 60 months (range, 12-120), 7 patients (0.43%) were found to have residual biliary stones (5 had not had preoperative ERCP). The study confirms the hypothesis that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be safely performed without routine intraoperative cholangiography, with selective use of preoperative ERCP.The operative cholangiogram: its interpretation, accuracy and value in association with cholecystectomy.The value and errors of one method of operative cholangiography were assessed prospectively with the aim of reducing further the incidence of unnecessary explorations of the common bile duct and the occurrence of residual stones. Operative cholangiograms were obtained using a cystic duct cannula in 174 cases, the technical failure rate being 2%. All cases were followed up using intravenous cholangiography where necessary. Of 129 judged normal by the operator, 2 were found to have common bile duct stones-false negative rate 1%. Of 45 judged abnormal by the operator, 10 had negative explorations- false positive rate 6%. Anomalies were discovered in 12% of patients. It is concluded that meticulous technique and accurate interpretation are essential for the best results. The high incidence of anatomical variations present is of interest and this alone emphasises the necessity of carrying out the investigation and the need of experienced interpretation.MR cholangiopancreaticography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography in patients with suspected common bile duct stones.To prospectively compare MR cholangiopancreaticography (MRCP) vs. endoscopic retrograde pancreaticography (ERCP) in patients with suspected common bile duct (CBD) stone disease.Fifty consecutive patients with suspected CBD disease underwent MRCP and then ERCP within 12 h of each other. The result of the MRCP was blinded to the reader of the ERCP. The MRCP was done using a superconducting 1.0 T unit with a heavily T2-weighted breath-hold technique. The ERCP was done in the fluoroscopy suite by one of the clinicians and was evaluated by one of the radiologists who had not read the MRCP examinations.There were 28 true-positives, 17 true-negatives, 1 false-positive, and 4 false-negatives. The sensitivity was 87.5% and the specificity 94.4%, respectively. The positive predictive value was 96.6% and the negative predictive value was 81.1%.MRCP was shown to be good enough to replace ERCP as a diagnostic method in patients with suspected CBD disease. MRCP is now our modality of choice after ultrasound in the diagnostic evaluation of these patients.Diagnosing extrahepatic bile duct stones using intraductal ultrasonography: a case series.Intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS), a new ultrasonographic diagnostic procedure, was used to assess the presence of extrahepatic bile duct stones.The IDUS apparatus consisted of a 6-French high-frequency (20 MHz) probe. Prior to clinical application, in-vitro studies were conducted in a water tank. Clinically, IDUS was successful in 31 patients after endoscopic retrograde cholangiography. Interpretations of IDUS images were evaluated in comparison with cholangiographic and fluoroscopic findings.Experimental testing demonstrated that stones or fragments were typically visualized as strong, high-echo images with acoustic shadowing; air bubbles were seen as fan-shaped high-echo areas or comet-shaped high-echo areas; and sludge was visualized as soft, easily changing, high-echo structures. Extrahepatic bile duct stones were visualized by IDUS in 30 of 31 patients (96.8%), while fluoroscopy and cholangiography identified 19 (61.3%) and 25 (80.6%), respectively. Accurate differentiation between stones and air bubbles was also possible.IDUS could be a useful modality in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones.Laparoscopic cholangiography. Results and indications.One hundred sixty-five operative cholangiograms were attempted in 364 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (45%). Laparoscopic cholangiography was successful in 150 of 165 attempts (91%). Eighty-nine per cent of studies were normal (134/150) and 11% were abnormal (16/150). All 134 patients with normal cholangiograms remained asymptomatic (false-negative rate, 0%). False-positive studies occurred in 3 of 150 (2%) total cholangiograms and 3 of 12 (25%) abnormal cholangiograms consistent with choledocholithiasis. A total of 16 of 364 patients had proven common bile duct stones (4.4%). Eight of the sixteen stones were removed by preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography/sphincterotomy. Five of sixteen stones were found at cholangiography, four of which were unsuspected (4/150, 2.6%). Retained common duct stones were found in 3 of 214 patients not undergoing cholangiography (1.4%). No complications or deaths occurred that were due to cholangiography. One biliary injury occurred (1/364, 0.3%), in a patient with aberrant anatomy who did not undergo cholangiography. Laparoscopic cholangiography is a safe technique with a success rate greater than 90%. Routine cholangiography is presently recommended for prevention of biliary injury, detection of stones in the cystic and common ducts, and for training purposes, especially during the learning phase of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the urgent diagnosis of common bile duct stones in acute pancreatitis.The role of clinical and biochemical criteria in predicting common bile duct (CBD) stones was analyzed in 76 patients with acute pancreatitis undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) during the same hospital admission. Forty patients had ERCP within 72 hours; cholangiography was successful in 92%. Fifty patients had biliary pancreatitis; 25 patients had CBD stones and all were successfully removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy (ES). Twenty-six patients had nonbiliary pancreatitis. Two patients had complications from ERCP and/or ES; two patients died (no CBD stones) but ERCP was noncontributory. Significant differences were found between the biliary and nonbiliary disease groups with respect to age, and bilirubin. gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase, alkaline phosphatase, alanine transaminase, and amylase levels. The first four factors also discriminated between those patients with and without CBD stones. Logistic discriminant functions were estimated providing probabilities for the presence of CBD stones for each patient but were too cumbersome for clinical use. A simple scoring system was devised on the basis of cut-off levels: bilirubin greater than or equal to 40 mumol/L, gamma-glutamyl transpeptidase greater than or equal to 250 IU/L, alkaline phosphatase greater than or equal to 225 IU/L, and age greater than or equal to 70 years, indicating CBD stones. Bilirubin alone had a sensitivity and specificity of 80%; the specificity increased to 93% with all four factors. These results suggest that clinical and biochemical criteria and ERCP and/or ES may have important roles in the management of patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis.[Retrograde cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic sphincterotomy for biliary lithiasis. Prospective evaluation in surgical circle].Between January 1982 and 1987, 772 consecutive endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographic examinations (ERCP) were performed in 673 consecutive patients suspected of having biliary tract lithiasis (mean age: 62.1 +/- 18.2 years). Two hundred and thirty-two were emergency procedures (30%). Endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed for common bile duct stones (CBDS) in 257 cases (38.0%), of whom 143 (55.6%) had undergone previous cholecystectomy. In 17.2% of cases, ERCP was either a complete (7.8%) or partial (9.4%) failure. In 124 patients for whom microlithiasis was not identified by sonography and who underwent operation, sensitivity and specificity of ERCP was 70% and 87%, respectively. Of 266 patients in whom ES was attempted, 96.6% were achieved and the common bile duct was cleared of stones in 72% of cases. Nineteen percent of patients required two or more attempts at extraction. After ERCP without ES, mortality and morbidity rates were 0.96 and 3.6% respectively. After ES, complications followed in 12.1% of patients and 3.9% died. Mortality and morbidity directly related to ES were 3.1% and 11.3% respectively. The most common complications after ERCP were acute cholangitis and pancreatitis, whereas after ES, acute cholangitis was the most common complication, followed by hemorrhage and duodenocholechocal perforations. These complications occurred independently of age and previous cholecystectomy but was closely related to stone clearance (P < 0.05). Seventy-one patients (10.5%) required operation. Twenty-nine patients underwent emergency surgery for complications with a mortality rate of 17%. Forty-two patients underwent elective surgery for retained CBDS after ES without any mortality.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Laparoscopic sonography: a real alternative to cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy?The routine use of intraoperative cholangiography (CGP) during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is still under debate. Previous reports suggest that intraoperative sonography can replace CGP in the evaluation of common duct lithiasis during open cholecystectomy. The present study was performed to evaluate the possible role of sonography during LC.45 patients were submitted to laparoscopic sonography of biliary tree during LC. In all cases, CGP was performed.In 37 cases, sonography did not show the presence of stones; in 7 cases, common bile duct stones were identified by sonography; one false negative was observed. A sensitivity of 87.5%, a specificity of 100% and an overall accuracy of 97.8% were obtained. A false positive was obtained with CGP with a sensitivity of 100%, a specificity 97.3%, and an overall accuracy of 97.8%.Laparoscopic sonography can represent an adequate substitute for CGP as a screening procedure during LC.Intraductal ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones: a comparative study.Intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS) is highly accurate in detection of extrahepatic bile duct stones. This study was to compare the accuracy of IDUS and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones.Thirty patients suspected of extrahepatic bile duct stones on B ultrasonography, CT, or MRI were enrolled for study. ERC was performed using a Fujinon duodenoscope (ED-410XT, ED-410Xu), then IDUS was done by inserting a Fujinon microprobe (PL2220-15) through the endoscopic biopsy channel to detect the extrahepatic bile duct. Finally stones in the extrahepatic bile duct were detected and extracted by endoscopic sphincterotomy (EST).Among the 30 patients, 26 were diagnosed as having cholelithiasis accurately through ERC. In one patient the stone detected by ERC was really floccule. Misdiagnosis happened in 2 patients with extrahepatic bile duct stones. So the overall accuracy and sensitivity of ERC in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones were 86.7% (26/30) and 92.9% (26/28) respectively. In contrast, IDUS showed the results of diagnosis were in consistent with those of EST stone extraction. Its accuracy and sensitivity in the diagnosis of extrahepatic bile duct stones were 100% (30/30) and 100% (28/28) respectively.IDUS which is superior to ERC in diagnosing extrahepatic bile duct stones can avoid the visual error of ERC.Comparison of endoscopic retrograde and intravenous cholangiography in diagnosis of biliary calculi.The results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (E.R.C.) and intravenous cholangiography (I.V.C.) were compared in patients undergoing surgery for biliary calculi. E.R.C. gave a significantly higher rate of correct diagnosis of gallbladder calculi (p = 0.026) and common bileduct calculi (p = 0.002) than I.V.C. Biliary stones may thus frequently be present in patients with a normal I.V.C. and E.R.C. may reduce the rate of diagnostic errors in patients with symptoms of biliary disease.Peroperative cholangiogram--routine or selective results of a prospective study.Peroperative cholangiography (POC) performed as a routine during cholecystectomy for cholelithiasis was evaluated in 102 patients. POC was normal 93 patients. Nine patients had abnormal POCs: 5 were true positive--CBD stones (4) and sphincteric fibrosis (1): 4 were false positive--air bubbles (2) and sphincteric spasm (2). Preoperative indication of CBD stones were present in 12 patients-5 of these had abnormal POC (4 true positive and 1 false positive). CBD exploration was avoided in 7 patients with normal POC. Ninety patients did not have any preoperative indication of CBD stones-4 of these had abnormal POC (1 true positive and 3 false positive). None of the patients with a normal POC had any clinical evidence of residual stones on follow up for one year. POC did not help in any case to delineate biliary ductal anatomy. Routine POC during cholecystectomy should be abandoned and should be performed selectively in patients suspected to have CBD stones only to avoid a negative CBD exploration.Routine versus selective intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a survey of 2,130 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Routine use of intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) during laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) is a matter of debate.Data from 2,130 consecutive LCs and patients' follow-up during 9 years were collected and analyzed. During the first 4 years of the study, 800 patients underwent LC, and IOC was performed selectively (SIOC). Thereafter, 1,330 patients underwent LC, and IOC was routinely attempted (RIOC) for all.In the IOC group, 159 patients met the criteria for SIOC, which was completed successfully in 141 cases (success rate, 88.6%). Bile duct calculi were found in nine patients. All other patients with no criteria or failed SIOC were followed, and in nine patients retained stones were documented. Thus, the incidence of ductal stones was 1.1% and sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value (NPV), and positive predictive value (PPV) for the detection of ductal stones were 50, 100, 98.6, and 100%, respectively. In the RIOC group, IOC was routinely attempted in 1,330 patients and was successful in 1,133 (success rate, 90.9%; p = 0.015). Bile duct stones were detected in 37 patients (including 14 asymptomatic stones). In two cases, IOC failed to reveal ductal stones (false negative). There was no false-positive IOC. Therefore, with RIOC policy, the incidence of ductal stones, sensitivity, specificity, NPV, and PPV were 3.3, 97.4, 100, 99.8, and 100%, respectively (significantly higher for success rate, incidence, sensitivity, and NPV; p < 0.05). Abnormal IOC findings were also significantly higher in the RIOC group. Common bile duct injury occurred only in the SIOC group [two cases of all 2,130 LCs (0.09%)].RIOC during LC is a safe, accurate, quick, and cost-effective method for the detection of bile duct anatomy and stones. A highly disciplined performance of RIOC can minimize potentially debilitating and hazardous complications of bile duct injury.Identification of bile duct stones in patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy.To identify patients with common bile duct stones, all patients considered for laparoscopic cholecystectomy in this unit undergo intravenous cholangiography (IVC) with tomography and, more recently, operative cholangiography. To date 100 consecutive patients with symptomatic gallstones have undergone laparoscopic cholecystectomy with no specific exclusion criteria. Eight patients of 100 were found to have duct stones on IVC with one false-positive. These IVC data were compared with data from 52 patients who also had operative cholangiograms performed. One stone was detected on operative cholangiography that was not identified on IVC. No additional information was gained from operative cholangiography. These data suggest that preoperative IVC is adequate for the detection of duct stones in patients considered for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Detection of choledocholithiasis: comparison of unenhanced helical CT and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.To compare unenhanced helical computed tomography (CT) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the detection of common bile duct calculi.Within 13 months, 51 patients (aged 18-94 years) with clinically suspected choledocholithiasis underwent unenhanced helical CT immediately before undergoing ERCP. CT scans were evaluated for the presence of bile duct stones, ampullary stones, the gallbladder and gallbladder stones, intrahepatic biliary dilatation, and the size of the bile duct at the porta hepatis and in the pancreatic head. ERCP images were evaluated for the presence of bile duct or ampullary stones, as well as for biliary dilatation.Unenhanced helical CT depicted common bile duct stones in 15 of 17 patients found to have stones at ERCP. Three patients had stones impacted at the ampulla, all of which were detected with CT. In addition, there was one false-positive finding at CT. CT had a sensitivity of 88%, a specificity of 97%, and an accuracy of 94% in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones.Unenhanced helical CT is useful for evaluating suspected choledocholithiasis.Preoperative ERCP approach to common bile duct stones: results of a selective policy.In a previous study, we made a plea for more selective indications for preoperative ERCP in patients with gallstones based on the results obtained from a liberal policy. Following 3.5 years of implementing this selective policy, a report on the results are presented here. This study was performed in a referral academic hospital.Between June 1994 and December 1997, 328 patients underwent cholecystectomy because of symptomatic cholelithiasis. Absolute indications for preoperative ERCP were: acute cholangitis (4 patients); obstructive jaundice (22 patients); gallstone pancreatitis (within the first 24 h in 14 patients), and wide common bile duct (CBD, >8 mm) with suspicion of stones in the biliary tree (2 patients).In 42 patients (12.8%) a preoperative ERCP was performed for these indications. Stones were found in the CBD in 30 patients and edema in the papilla in 2 patients (total 76.2%). The stones could be extracted by endoscopic sphincterotomy in 24 of the 30 patients (80%). Complications were seen in 7 patients (16.7%). All these complications (bleeding of the papilla in 4 and mild pancreatitis in 3 patients) could be treated conservatively. During a mean follow-up of 2.5 years, CBD stones could be demonstrated postoperatively in 3 patients (0.3%). No mortality was observed in this series.The results of this selective policy included the expected outcome of a significant reduction in the number of ERCPs performed from 29 to 12.8% (p < 0.001, chi(2) test) and a better yield of stones, from 29 to 76.2% of the patients. The mortality of the procedure decreased from 2 to 0% whereas morbidity remained the same. This selective policy seems adequate for the preoperative assessment of CBD stones.One hundred consecutive laparoscopic cholangiograms. Results and conclusions.In 100 consecutive patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the feasibility, reliability, and cost of routine laparoscopic cholangiography were prospectively studied.Fluoroscopic cholangiograms with multiple exposures were successfully completed in all patients in an average time of 6.9 min.Twenty-one percent were abnormal, and 15 common duct stones and 6 significant anatomic anomalies detected. Thirteen out of 15 patients with common duct stones had preoperative suspicion of common duct stones. Two out of 15 were completely unsuspected. The average cost of cholangiography was $768, and there were no complications related to the procedure. There were no false interpretations.When compared with selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), routine laparoscopic cholangiography is safer, more accurate, and less costly, and may have the added benefit of potentially reducing iatrogenic injuries in patients with anatomic variations. Routine laparoscopic cholangiography should be considered by all surgeons.Endosonography- vs. endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography-based strategies in the evaluation of suspected common bile duct stones in patients with normal transabdominal imaging.Endosonography (EUS) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) are highly accurate techniques for evaluating common bile duct stones.To compare the clinical impact and costs of EUS- and ERCP-based strategies for evaluating patients with suspected common bile duct stones but normal transabdominal imaging.The costs of EUS- vs. ERCP-based strategies were compared in patients with suspected acute biliary obstruction from common bile duct stones but normal transabdominal imaging.Over a 15-month period, 110 patients were recruited. EUS detected a common bile duct lesion in 73% (common bile duct stones: 68%; pancreatic cancer: 2%; ampulla tumour: 2%; cholangiocarcinoma: 1%). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of EUS were 98%, 100%, 100% and 93%, respectively. EUS prevented 30% unnecessary ERCP. The mean difference in cost per patient between EUS- and ERCP-based strategies was US$166. When stratified according to clinical indications, an EUS-based strategy was costlier only in suspected biliary sepsis. Costs were similar when the indications were cholestatic jaundice, acute pancreatitis and cholestasis.EUS prior to biliary interventions in patients with suspected common bile duct stones prevented unnecessary ERCP. It allowed a definitive diagnosis to be made prior to more invasive procedures.A prospective experience with selective cholangiography.A prospective study of patients with symptomatic cholelithiasis was undertaken to determine the effectiveness of identifying clinically significant choledocholithiasis with selective cholangiography. Between 1991 and 1995, 262 patients presented to the senior author (K.W.M.) with acute or chronic cholecystitis. Sixteen patients had a preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) for an elevated alkaline phosphatase or total bilirubin greater than twice the normal value or an ultrasound finding suspecting choledocholithiasis. Ten of the ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis, with eight patients having successful clearance by ERCP. Ninety other patients had intraoperative cholangiography for abnormal serum liver biochemistries, a history of jaundice or pancreatitis, or a dilated common bile duct (CBD) (>6 mm) on ultrasound. Fourteen of the intraoperative cholangiography patients and the two remaining ERCP patients had choledocholithiasis requiring CBD exploration for clearance of their stones. There were no false-positive cholangiograms, and there were no bile duct injuries in this series. With 100 per cent follow-up of at least 2 years, only one patient required ERCP clearance of a retained CBD stone 13 months after cholecystectomy. The positive predictive value and the negative predictive value for the selective cholangiography criteria are 23 per cent and 99 per cent, respectively. In conclusion, clinically significant choledocholithiasis can be found effectively with selective cholangiography. Also, utilizing selective cholangiography reduces the number of routine cholangiograms by 60 per cent.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in elderly patients.the presentation of common bile duct disease, value of investigations and treatment outcome in elderly patients undergoing endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were assessed.the clinical presentation, liver function tests, full blood counts, abdominal ultrasound and ERCP results were assessed retrospectively in 101 patients (59 women, 42 men; mean age 83 years, range 75-100) sequentially investigated for possible common bile duct disease.59 patients had common bile duct gallstones, 35 had malignant biliary obstruction (13 with co-existing common bile duct stones) and seven had other outcomes. In the malignant-alone group 68% of those who had jaundice presented painlessly compared with 24% in the gallstones-alone group; 49% of the gallstones-alone group had pain compared with 28% of the malignant group. In the gallstones-alone group 43% had atypical presentations (non-specific symptoms or painless jaundice). Non-specific symptoms were found in 19% of the gallstones-alone group but in only 5% of the malignant group. Of the patients who had common bile duct stones, 18% had pancreatic or biliary malignancy. The co-existence of gallstones and malignancy was emphasized by eight patients in whom the clinical and ultrasound diagnosis was of common bile duct stones but malignancy was detected by ERCP. The sensitivity of ultrasound was 86% for detecting dilated common bile ducts was 86%, but only 69% for diagnosing gallstones within the common bile duct and 67% for diagnosing pancreatic masses. Ultrasound and ERCP were in agreement in 60 patients (60%). Endoscopic clearance of common bile duct gallstones was successful in 53 of 54 attempts (98%). Palliative ERCP treatment was performed in 30 patients who had malignant biliary obstruction and was successful in 22 (73%); in a further four patients (13%) an endoprothesis was successfully inserted percutaneously. The commonest complication of ERCP was cholangitis (four patients); pancreatitis and biliary perforation occurred in one patient each. Twenty-two patients (63%) who had malignancy died during follow-up, the mean survival being 11.3 weeks (range 3 days-2 years). Carcinoma of the ampulla was associated with a relatively good prognosis (three patients survived 18 months or more).in elderly patients, common bile duct stones often present atypically and co-existence with malignancy is not unusual; ampullary carcinoma has a relatively good prognosis and ERCP is a safe and effective procedure in the management of biliary obstruction.Laparoscopic ultrasonography versus operative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: review of the literature and a comparison with open intraoperative ultrasonography.Laparoscopic ultrasonography (LUS) has been used increasingly over the last several years as a new imaging modality. To define the role of LUS during laparoscopic cholecystectomy, we evaluated LUS by prospectively comparing it with operative cholangiography (OC), by reviewing the literature on LUS, and by retrospectively comparing it with intraoperative ultrasonography performed during open cholecystectomy.LUS and OC were compared prospectively in 100 consecutive patients during laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The success rate of examination, the time required, the accuracy in diagnosing bile duct calculi, and the delineation of biliary anatomy were evaluated.The success rate of examination was 95% for LUS and 92% for OC. The main reason for unsatisfactory LUS was incomplete visualization of the distal common bile duct. The time required was 8.2 minutes for LUS and 15.9 minutes for OC (p<0.0001). Nine patients had bile duct calculi. LUS had one false-negative result and OC had two false-positives and one false-negative. The accuracies of LUS and OC were comparable except for a slightly better positive predictive value of LUS (100% versus 77.8%; p>0.1). In a literature review, 12 recent prospective studies comparing LUS and OC and three studies on open intraoperative ultrasonography were reviewed. Twelve studies of LUS with a total of 2,059 patients demonstrated results similar to the present study. The success rate was 88% to 100% for both tests. The time for LUS was approximately 7 minutes, about half of the time needed for OC. Overall, LUS was associated with fewer false-positive results than OC; the positive predictive value and specificity of LUS were better, while the sensitivity and negative predictive value of LUS and OC were comparable. OC detected ductal variations or anomalies more distinctly than LUS. Compared with open intraoperative ultrasonography, LUS had a slightly lower success rate and required a slightly longer time because it was technically more demanding, but the two procedures had a similar accuracy for diagnosing bile duct calculi.Because of their different advantages and disadvantages, LUS and OC can be used in a complementary manner. There is a learning curve for LUS because of its technical difficulty. Once learned, however, LUS can be used as the primary screening procedure for bile duct calculi because of its safety, speed, and cost-effectiveness. OC can be used selectively, particularly when ductal anatomic variations or anomalies or bile duct injuries are suspected.A comparison of intraoperative ultrasound versus cholangiography in the evaluation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Indications for intraoperative evaluation of the common bile duct during laparoscopic cholecystectomy are controversial, as is the goal of either anatomic definition or assessing for choledocholithiasis. One hundred twenty-five consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy underwent both intraoperative ultrasound and intraoperative cholangiography. Cholangiography required slightly more time to perform; it was more sensitive (92.8% vs 71.4%) but less specific (76.2% vs 100%) for choledocholithiasis than was ultrasound. Ultrasound was somewhat more difficult to perform, and, particularly in the setting of intraabdominal obesity, was often inadequate at providing clear visualization of the intrapancreatic common bile duct. It did not provide the same anatomic definition as an adequate cholangiogram. The overall incidence of choledocholithiasis was 11.2%.[Selective intraoperative cholangiography].300 consecutive cholecystectomies performed from 1984 through 1986 were studied retrospectively to answer the following questions: which are suitable preoperative indicators for selective operative cholangiography, and which is the failure rate to detect biliary concrements by selective cholangiography? Patients with a history of jaundice, suspected concrements from preoperative intravenous cholangiography or ultrasound examination, a common bile duct wider than 8 mm, and elevated serum levels of bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, ALAT (GPT) or ASAT (GOT) all had significantly higher rates of biliary concrements. Of these indicators, preoperative radiologic studies, serum levels of ALAT (GPT) and serum levels of alkaline phosphatase showed the best sensitivity, specificity as well as positive and negative predictive value. If two criteria, preoperative radiology and serum levels of ALAT (GPT), had been used, intraoperative cholangiography would have been performed in 34% of the cases. 82% of all biliary concrements would have been detected; in 3% of all cholecystectomies, the diagnosis of concrements would have been missed. We conclude that prospective studies should be performed to better define necessity and benefit of routine operative cholangiography still widely performed today.Ultrasound detection of choledocholithiasis: prospective comparison with ERCP in the postcholecystectomy patient.The role of ultrasound as a screening test for choledocholithiasis was prospectively assessed by comparing the results of upper abdominal ultrasound with direct cholangiography in 59 unselected symptomatic postcholecystectomy patients. Ultrasound detected duct stones in 13 of 29 patients (sensitivity, 45%) and their absence in 29 of 30 (specificity, 97%). A positive ultrasound diagnosis of choledocholithiasis was correct 13 times out of 14 (predictive value, 93%) whereas a negative diagnosis was correct on only 29 of 45 occasions (predictive value, 64%). No significant learning effect was seen. Intestinal gas obscuring the distal common duct was the most important factor limiting the ability of ultrasound to detect duct stones. Duct stones were present in 25 of 35 patients shown to have a dilated common duct on ultrasound, and in 4 of 24 with nondilated ducts; the predictive value of duct dilatation at ultrasound for duct stones was therefore 71% and that of nondilatation in excluding stones was 83%. Dilated intrahepatic bile ducts were demonstrated at ultrasound in only 17% of patients with choledocholithiasis. We conclude that ultrasound cannot reliably diagnose or exclude bile duct stones and is an inadequate screening test for the symptomatic postcholecystectomy patient.The importance of intraoperative cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) using an electrosurgery energy source was successfully performed in 59 (95%) out of 62 selected patients. The procedures were performed by different surgical teams at Trakya University, Medical Fakulty, in the department of General Surgery and the Karl-Franzens-University School of Medicine, in the department of General Surgery. Cholangiography was routine at Karl Franzens University and selective at Trakya University. Laparoscopic intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was performed in 48 (81.3%) patients, and open IOC was performed in 3 patients. Two patients had common duct stones; one of which was unsuspected preoperatively. These cases underwent endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and endoscopic papillotomy (EP). One patient had a choledocal tumor, unsuspected preoperatively. Anatomical anomalies were not identified. Cholangiography could not be performed in one case in which there was no suspected pathology. ERCP was performed on one patient 30 days after being discharged because of acute cholangitis. In this case, residual stones were identified in the choledocus. Four patients underwent open cholecystectomy because of tumor, unidentified cystic duct or common bile duct pathology that could not be visualized on the cholangiogram. Our study suggests that cholangiography performed via the cystic duct before any structures are divided can prevent the most serious complication of laparoscopic cholecystectomy--common duct injury. We recommend that cholangiography be attempted on all patients undergoing LC.The role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the laparoscopic era.The optimal approach to patients with suspected common bile duct (CBD) stones remains unsettled. Options include pre- and postoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) or laparoscopic exploration of the CBD. This retrospective study evaluates the role of ERCP in the management of suspected CBD stones, with an emphasis on indications, endoscopic findings, and outcome.We retrospectively reviewed the consecutive medical records of 99 patients (67 females and 32 males) who underwent ERCP for suspected CBD stones between March 1992 and December 1995.In 86 patients, ERCP was performed preoperatively. Indications for ERCP included jaundice, pancreatitis, elevated liver functions tests (LFT), and ultrasound (US) or computed tomography (CT) scan findings. Forty one (48%) of 86 preoperative ERCP had positive findings; 37 (43%) were negative, and in 8 (9%) we failed to demonstrate the CBD. There were seven (8%) major complications: four cases of acute pancreatitis, one case of acute bleeding, and two cases of acute bleeding with perforation. There was no mortality. When pancreatitis was the only indication for ERCP, 0 of 8 patients had positive findings in comparison with 50% when pancreatitis was associated with jaundice and LFT, and 93% when US or CT scan demonstrated stones or dilation of the CBD.We conclude that ERCP is a valuable option for management of CBD stones but should be performed selectively. Neither pancreatitis alone nor LFT alone is an indication for ERCP. The presence of CBD stones is more likely when multiple indications are present.The utility of intraoperative cholangiography with acute cholecystitis.An increasingly important subset of patients with biliary tract disease are those with acute cholecystitis. The indications for both routine or selective intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) during elective cholecystectomy may not be appropriate for this group. The utility of IOC in the presence of acute cholecystitis was examined. The medical records of 223 patients with histologically confirmed acute cholecystitis were reviewed. Clinical and laboratory criteria included age, sex, white blood cell count (WBC), serum bilirubin and alkaline phosphatase levels. In 52 (23%) patients, IOC was not attempted and was technically unsuccessful in 15 (7%) patients. IOC was successful in 156 (70%) patients and, of these, six (4%) had a false-positive examination. The remainder are divided into two groups. Group 1 (131 patients) had true-negative IOC, whereas Group 2 (19 patients) had true-positive IOC as evidenced by stone recovery upon surgical exploration. When comparing Group 2 with Group 1, the mean preoperative laboratory values are higher; these differences do not reach statistical significance. Further, within Group 2, five (26%) patients did not demonstrate any clinical or laboratory elevations suggestive of common duct pathology. Thus, in acute cholecystitis, laboratory criteria do not appear to discriminate between the presence or absence of choledocholithiasis. IOC is advocated as an integral component of the operative procedure.Selective endoscopic retrograde cholangiography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for gallstones.To assess the outcome of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) for symptomatic gallbladder and suspected duct stones.During 3 years, one or more of four criteria led to ERC: jaundice, choledocus >8 mm, cholestasis, and severe biliary pancreatitis. Endoscopic extraction (ESE) of ductal stones was attempted before LC.In all, 990 patients were prospectively included. There were no exclusions. There were no deaths. A multivariate logistic regression analysis identified jaundice (P = 0.001), pancreatitis (P = 0.001), and cholestasis (P = 0.001) as statistically significant predictors of ductal stones. Choledocus >8 mm was not a significant predictor (P = 0.12). A total of 155 (16%) patients underwent ERC for suspected stones: 21 of 155 (13%) patients had no stones; and 6 of 134 (4%) patients had stone impaction cleared at open surgery. ERC clearance rate was 95% (128 of 134). LC was performed in 149 of 155 patients after a median interval of 3 days (range 1 to 7). Morbidity rates were 3% (4 of 134), 2% (3 of 149), and nil (0 of 6) after ESE, LC, or open surgery, respectively. Median hospital stay was 11 days. A total of 835 patients underwent LC with a 1.5% complication rate. Laparoscopic fluoro-cholangiography showed < or =3 mm-sized stones in 10 of 835 (1.2%) patients. No stones were reported at a median follow-up of 4 months including 990 patients.Ninety-five percent of patients with ductal stones can be successfully and safely managed by ERC prior to LC.Prospective comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the detection of bile duct stones.Conventional ultrasonography is used widely in the investigation of gallstone disease but is limited in the detection of bile duct stones due to poor visualization of the distal bile duct. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is currently the investigation of choice for suspected choledocholithiasis, but is not without morbidity. Endoscopic ultrasonography clearly visualizes the entire extrahepatic biliary tree and avoids the need for ERCP in many patients.Some 50 patients with suspected duct stones underwent endoscopic ultrasonography followed by ERCP. All cholangiograms were performed or interpreted by a second doctor blinded to the results of endoscopic ultrasonography.Both tests were successful in 46 patients; both tests failed in two patients and ERCP alone failed in a further two. Duct stones were confirmed in 24 patients. Sensitivity (95 per cent confidence interval (c.i.)) of ERCP and endoscopic ultrasonography in identifying these stones was 79 (58-93) per cent and 88 (68-97) per cent respectively; specificity (95 per cent c.i.) was 92 (75-99) per cent and 96 (80-100) per cent.Endoscopic ultrasonography accurately identifies bile duct stones. It is recommended in all patients with a risk of duct stones but especially in those with a history of ERCP-induced pancreatitis, when other pathology is suspected, when ERCP has failed, when bile duct abnormalities are suspected during pregnancy and in patients with acute pancreatitis.A comparison of ultrasound, computed tomography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the differential diagnosis of benign and malignant jaundice and cholestasis.To assess the accuracy of ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in distinguishing between benign and malignant causes of jaundice and cholestasis without jaundice.Prospective study.University Hospital in Finland.A consecutive series of patients with jaundice (n = 187) or cholestasis without jaundice (n = 33).Correlation between diagnosis on imaging and final diagnosis at follow up 6 months later. Final diagnoses made on histology (n = 79), cytology (n = 5), operative or endoscopic findings (n = 96), and clinical course or serology (n = 40).The most common benign disease was choledocholithiasis (n = 83) and the most common malignant disease was carcinoma of pancreas (n = 33). The benign nature of the extrahepatic obstruction was correctly defined by US, CT, and ERCP in 53%, 53%, and 90% of patients, respectively, and the corresponding figures for choledocholithiasis were 22%, 25%, and 79% (ERCP compared with each of the other techniques, p < 0.0001). Intrahepatic benign diseases were diagnosed by US and CT in a third of cases. Malignant extrahepatic obstruction was correctly diagnosed in 57%, 80%, and 83%, respectively and the corresponding figures for pancreatic cancer were 60%, 97%, and 89% (US compared with CT, p < 0.01, and with ERCP, p < 0.05). Intrahepatic malignant lesions were diagnosed by US, CT, and ERCP in 100%, 77%, and 60% of patients, respectively.When the obstruction was benign and extrahepatic ERCP was the most accurate, but when it was malignant CT was comparable. Intrahepatic disease was best diagnosed by US and CT. The results emphasise that the three methods of imaging are complementary.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in patients with jaundice and suspected biliary obstruction.During a 4-year period (1978-1982), 206 patients were examined with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) because of jaundice with suspected biliary obstruction. The total of examinations was 223. Duodenoscopy with ERCP gave a positive primary diagnosis in 160 cases (78%), six (4%) of which later proved to be incorrect. Extrahepatic obstruction could be excluded in 16 patients with normal cholangiogram (8%). Clinically relevant information thus was obtained in 176 cases (85%). The main cause of extrahepatic obstruction was common bile duct stone(s), which were found in 73 patients. Immediate endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed in 64 of them and cleared the duct of stones in 54 (84%). Benign stenosis of the ampulla of Vater was relieved with endoscopic sphincterotomy in six patients. Malignant bile duct obstruction was diagnosed in 56 patients, and in three of them an endoprosthesis for internal drainage of the biliary tract was endoscopically inserted. Immediate complications after ERCP without endoscopic sphincterotomy occurred in 5 of 136 patients (4%), one of whom died. The authors conclude that ERCP is a rapid, reliable and safe diagnostic method in patients with extrahepatic biliary obstruction.Comparison of early endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the management of acute biliary pancreatitis: a prospective randomized study.The role and potential benefits of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the management of acute biliary pancreatitis have not been documented. We report a large prospective randomized study comparing early EUS and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the management of these patients.A prospective randomized study was performed on 140 patients with acute pancreatitis suspected to have a biliary cause. The patients were randomized to have EUS (n = 70) or ERCP (n = 70) within 24 hours from admission. In the EUS group, when EUS detected choledocholithiasis, therapeutic ERCP was performed during the same endoscopy session. In the ERCP group, diagnostic ERCP was performed, followed by therapeutic endoscopy when choledocholithiasis was detected.Examination of the biliary tree by EUS was successful in all patients in the EUS group, whereas cannulation of the common duct during ERCP was unsuccessful in 10 patients (14%) in the ERCP group (P = .001). Combined percutaneous ultrasonography and ERCP missed detection of cholelithiasis in 6 patients in the ERCP group. The overall morbidity rate was 7% in the EUS group, and that in the ERCP group was 14% (P = .172). The hospital stay and mortality rates were comparable in both groups.In selected patients with acute biliary pancreatitis, EUS could safely replace diagnostic ERCP in the management for selecting patients with choledocholithiasis for therapeutic ERCP with a higher successful examination rate, a higher sensitivity in the detection of cholelithiasis, and a comparable morbidity rate.Effect of intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy on outcome after gallstone pancreatitis.Acute gallstone pancreatitis has traditionally been managed by early cholecystectomy with intraoperative cholangiography (IOC). To evaluate the effect of IOC on patient outcome, we analyzed all patients operated on for acute gallstone pancreatitis at our institution over a 3-year period. A total of 200 patients (37 open, 163 laparoscopic) were evaluated. Nineteen of 34 patients who underwent preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were found to have common bile duct (CBD) stones. The 59 patients who underwent cholecystectomy with IOC had significantly longer operative times compared to the 141 patients who underwent cholecystectomy alone (167 vs. 105 minutes for open [P = 0.008] and 89 vs. 68 minutes for laparoscopic [P < 0.0001] operations). Of the 59 patients who underwent IOC, only nine (15%) had abnormal cholangiograms, and CBD exploration in seven revealed stones in four patients, edematous ampullae in two, and no abnormality in one. Six of eight patients (5 IOC, 3 no IOC) who required immediate postoperative ERCP were noted to have CBD stones. Patients who underwent IOC had significantly longer postoperative hospital stays (3.8 vs. 2.0 days [P = 0.007]). The incidence of retained CBD stones following surgery was similar (5.1% IOC, 2.8% no IOC). Although 7 of 122 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy without IOC were readmitted, only one was found on ERCP to have a retained CBD stone. Age, sex, preoperative days, procedure type, and biliary-pancreatic complications after discharge did not differ significantly between patients with and without IOC. We conclude that IOC in patients operated on for acute gallstone pancreatitis results in a longer operative time and a prolonged postoperative course, but has no effect on the incidence of retained CBD stones.Correlation between MRCP and ERCP findings at a tertiary care hospital.It is common clinical practice to obtain Magnetic Resonance Cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) prior to Endoscopic Retrograde Cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) to evaluate the biliary system. With recent improvements of MRCP, it is important to correlate the findings of these two studies.To examine the correlation between MRCP and ERCP findings in patients at a tertiary care hospital.A total of 165 patients were identified who underwent MRCP prior to ERCP at West Virginia University between July 1, 2004 and June 30, 2006 (98 females and 67 males). Patients' demographic information and their laboratory values and diagnostic study outcomes prior to procedure were collected, entered into MS Access, and analyzed using SAS 10.0. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were calculated. Two-tailed p-values of <= 0.05 were considered statistically significant.Baseline demographic characteristics were comparable between male and female patients. Hepatobiliary and pancreatic duct results were grouped together. MRCP was 74.6% sensitive and 83.5% specific for choledocholithiasis, 85.4% sensitive and 87.4% specific for strictures, 85.9% sensitive and 91.2% specific for obstruction, 92.4% sensitive and 93.5% specific for ductal dilatation, and 90.8% sensitive and 92.6% specific for detection of periductal masses. MRCP appeared to have more false negative results for choledocholithiasis and strictures and more false positive results for ductal dilatation and periductal mass detection compared with ERCP.In patients with presentations suggestive of hepatobiliary and pancreatic disease, despite recent improvements in MRCP technique, the sensitivity and specificity of MRCP is still not close enough to that of ERCP for detection of choledocholithiasis, hepatobiliary and pancreatic ductal dilatation, periductal masses, or obstruction to be used as a substitute. Thus, ERCP remains the gold standard for visualization of the hepatobiliary and pancreatic tree.The efficacy of endoscopic ultrasound for the diagnosis of common bile duct stones as compared to CT, MRCP, and ERCP.[Intraoperative cholangiography as a routine method? A prospective, controlled, randomized study].A prospective, controlled, randomized trial was conducted in 275 patients with symptomatic gall stone disease, whose history, laboratory data or sonographical findings did not suggest common bile duct stones. Of these patients, 137 did not undergo intraoperative fluoroscopic cholangiography (IOC), but in the remaining 138 patients IOC was attempted. In 111 cases (80.4%) the biliary system was sufficiently visualized. In 3 patients (2.7%) calculi in the cystic or common bile duct were diagnosed, which would have been overlooked without IOC. IOC was false-positive in one case. One year after the operation the patients were asked to return for a follow-up examination. Three patients in the group without IOC had had symptomatic passage of a stone, and one had a common bile duct stone removed by endoscopic papillotomy. A retained stone was discussed as etiology for a pancreatitis in a fifth patient in this group. No patient sustained long-term sequelae from the retained common bile duct stones. None of the patients in the IOC group had evidence of cholangiolithiasis at follow-up. There was no difference between the study groups concerning the incidence of post-operative complications. The operations with IOC lasted significantly longer (92 +/- 31 min vs 77 +/- 28 min). According to our data and those published earlier, the additional financial and logistic expenditure associated with routine IOC is not justified. Patients with the preoperative suspicion of a common bile duct stone should have endoscopic bile duct clearance (ERCP and EPT) prior to cholecystectomy.A five years review intra-operative cholangiogram.Intra-operative cholangiogram is often performed to detect concurrent common bile duct stones in cholecystectomy patients. Routine cholangiogram add to cost and exposes patients to unnecessary exploration of common bile duct due to frequent false positive results. Thus, there is need of better indicators for cholangiogram in order to minimize unnecessary procedure and its morbidity.A retrospective analysis of patients undergoing intra-operative cholangiogram during open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy was done at Patan Hospital from Oct 1, 2005 to Sep 31, 2009. Indications and outcome of cholangiogram were analyzed together with findings of common bile duct exploration.A total of 68 (2.8%, 68/2400) intra-operative cholangiogram were done in 2400 cholecystectomy patients during five years period. Eight (11.8%, 8/68) patients had abnormal findings. Two (3%, 2/68) patients with abnormal cholangiogram had stones in common bile duct. There was no mortality in this series.Existing indications of intra-operative cholangiogram detects only small percentage of patients with bile duct stones and has high false positive results. This unnecessarily increases bile duct exploration, cost and morbidity. Thus, there is need to redefine indications for intra-operative cholangiogram.Per-operative endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography for common bile duct stones.Routine preoperative infusion cholangiography at elective cholecystectomy: a prospective study in 694 patients.The role of preoperative infusion cholangiography (PIC) before elective cholecystectomy has yet to be defined. Between 1985 and 1991 PIC was performed routinely in 694 patients with median (range) age of 52 (17-85) years with biliary calculus disease 1 or 4 days before elective cholecystectomy. Satisfactory opacification of the biliary system was achieved in 90.1 per cent and mild to moderate adverse reactions to the infusion of contrast medium occurred in 0.9 per cent of patients. Peroperative cholangiography (POC) in 43 of 499 patients with a normal PIC was normal. The presence of common bile duct stones was confirmed in 34 of 36 patients with prominent stones at bile duct exploration and in 8 of 26 with suspected stones at PIC. Bile duct dilatation (median diameter 10 mm) without concomitant stones was seen at PIC and confirmed at POC in 20 patients. Bile duct anomalies were found or suspected in 35 patients at PIC and were confirmed in six by POC (n = 5), or during the cholecystectomy making the anomaly incidence 0.9 per cent. Information provided by the PIC was not of crucial importance for safe execution of cholecystectomy in any patient, while a single (minor) bile duct lesion (1 of 694; 0.1 per cent) could be ascribed to severe pericholecystitis. The results of this study suggest that routine PIC is not warranted. However, PIC is an alternative to selective preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography or selective POC. PIC needs to be supported by POC in approximately 20 per cent of patients (in case of absent or poor opacification of the bile ducts or suspicion of stones or anomalies at PIC).Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography following laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the preferred method of treatment for symptomatic choledocholithiasis. Since its introduction there has been an increase in postoperative diagnostic and therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The aim of this study was to assess the indications and results of ERCP following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Sixty-one patients had an ERCP following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Two broad groups were identified: Group 1 (35 patients) had filling defects (consistent with stones) noted on operative cholangiography, which were not successfully flushed or extracted at the time of laparoscopic cholecystectomy; Group 2 consisted of patients who developed problems following laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Nine patients had post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain with abnormal liver function tests (LFT), four of whom had common bile duct (CBD) injuries and three had CBD stones. Eleven patients had post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain with a normal diameter common bile duct on ultrasound and normal LFT; only one had a CBD stone. Five patients with a persisting bile leak following laparoscopic cholecystectomy had an ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy. In three the leak ceased, while two required subsequent open surgery to drain bile collections and ligate the cystic duct. One patient presented with an episode of transient jaundice but had a normal ERCP. There were six post-ERCP complications; three patients had mild pancreatitis, two had a minor haemorrhage and one an asymptomatic duodenal perforation. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy was most valuable for the management of retained stones and the diagnosis and management of post-laparoscopic cholecystectomy pain in association with abnormal LFT. The diagnostic yield was low (9%) when the LFT were normal.Predictive ability of choledocholithiasis indicators.[Upper-abdominal ultrasonography and ERCP? (author's transl)].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as well as upper-abdominal ultrasonography were performed on 134 patients. Organ structure was optimally demonstrated by ultrasonography in 94 patients (70.2%) and partially in 29 (21.6%) Comparing the diagnostic assessment in 62 patients who had undergone 73 tests and had subsequently been operated on (57) or examined post-mortem (5) there was a statistically significant advantage of ERCP in diseases in which the choledochal duct had been involved. The method was successful in 95% of cases of choledocholithiasis (20 cases) compared with 45% by ultrasound and in 85% of cases of gall-bladder carcinoma which also involved the choledochal duct (38% by ultrasound). In clinically manifest carcinoma of the head of the pancreas (9 cases) and cholecystolithiasis (19 cases) ultrasonography provided the correct diagnosis in 89%, while the results for ERCP were 56% and 74%, respectively.[The importance and value of pre-, intra- and postoperative roentgenologic biliary tract diagnosis].Routine intraoperative cholangiogram.The value of a routine intraoperative cholangiogram is controversial. We reviewed 352 consecutive instances of cholecystectomy for nonmalignant disease during a period of three years to assess the diagnostic accuracy and additional cost of the roentgenographic technique. Intraoperative cholangiogram was done in all except 11 patients. Forty-nine of 341 patients underwent exploration of the common bile duct. The diagnosis was determined by the cholangiogram and was correct in 46 patients with three false-positive results. The other 292 patients did well without exploration of the common bile duct. The cholangiocatheter and a special cholangioclamp made the procedure easy and minimized additional operation time (five minutes with no mortality and negligible morbidity). Clinical indications for exploration of the common bile duct correlated poorly with abnormal findings in the bile duct. Unsuspected common duct stones were detected by cholangiogram in 17 (5 per cent) patients. Possible iatrogenic trauma to the common duct was prevented when significant abnormal findings were demonstrated by cholangiogram. The results of this study indicate that routine intraoperative cholangiogram is: accurate for diagnosis of common bile duct stones; useful in identification of bile duct anomalies and, thus, aids in preventing injury to the common bile duct; safe with negligible risk, and neither expensive nor time consuming if done correctly as a routine procedure.Routine intraoperative laparoscopic cholangiography.Whether intraoperative laparoscopic cholangiography should be routine is debatable.We reviewed the cholangiography experience in 669 consecutive laparoscopic cholecystectomies.Mean age of the patients was 39 years, 78% were female, and 29% had acute cholecystitis. Cholecystectomy was completed laparoscopically in 606 (91%). Laparoscopic cholangiography was completed in 562 (93%) and 348 (62%) were routine (no preoperative indication). The mean operating time in 1996 was 61 minutes. Out of the 348 routine cholangiograms, 17 demonstrated evidence of unsuspected choledocholithiasis. Five patients had choledocholithiasis documented by laparoscopic common bile duct exploration and/or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Two patients had normal postoperative cholangiopancreatography. One of 10 patients managed expectantly was readmitted postoperatively with obstructive jaundice. In 4 patients, routine cholangiography revealed unexpected anatomy, and in 2, this prevented misidentification and transection of the common bile duct.Laparoscopic cholangiography is safe, quick, detects unsuspected choledocholithiasis, and can prevent common bile duct transection. It should be routine.Proposed criteria for preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy.There has been a dramatic increase in the number of endoscopic retrograde cholangiograms (ERC) performed on patients who are candidates for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). The majority of these procedures result in normal findings. This study is an attempt to determine useful clinical criteria and strategy for predicting the presence or absence of common bile duct stones (CBDS) and the need for ERC in patients who are candidates for LC.The observational portion of this study explored laboratory and ultrasound data from 134 consecutive patients who had undergone preoperative ERC, followed by LC, over a 4-year period. The data were then analyzed by multivariate logistic regression to determine the best models for predicting the presence or absence of stones in the common bile duct. Models using gamma glutamyl transpeptidase (GGT), alkaline phophatase (AP), common bile duct diameter (CBDIA), and amylase (AMY) were then evaluated retrospectively in 36 additional patients (validation group).A model based on GGT and common bile duct diameter as positive predictors and amylase as a negative predictor correctly classified 78% of the patients in the validation group. This model resulted in a negative predictive value (NPV), positive predictive value (PPV), sensitivity, and specificity of 0.88, 0.68, 0.87, and 0.71, respectively. The model utilizing AP was almost as effective. This model resulted in a NPV, PPV, sensitivity, and specificity of 0.83, 0.67, 0.80, and 0.71, respectively.Although a number of laboratory values and imaging techniques correlate with the presence or absence of CBDS, our study confirms that individually they have poor predictive value. Our data and models suggest that elevated serum amylase is a negative predictor for CBDS. Elevated GGT and/or AP with widened CBDIA and normal AMY strongly suggest the presence of CBDS and the need for preoperative ERC. Elevated GGT, AP, or widened CBDIA with elevated amylase, in the absence of clinical pancreatitis, may suggest that small stones have passed through the ampulla of Vater and that the CBD is generally cleared of stones.Cholangiography during cholecystectomy: a plea for selective use.Routine peroperative cholangiography was retrospectively studied in 376 patients who underwent elective cholecystectomy. Adequate cholangiograms were obtained in 325 patients using a C-arm image intensifier. Pre- and peroperative indications for common bile duct stones were correlated to the outcome of peroperative cholangiography. The sensitivity and specificity of the cholangiographic technique were 96 and 95 per cent respectively. A false-positive rate of 4.6% and a false-negative rate of 0.6% were found. No serious complications due to the method were observed. Peroperative cholangiography prevented unnecessary exploration of the common bile duct in 70 per cent of the patients with clinical indications for exploration. Abnormal cholangiograms were rare (0.8%) in the absence of clinical signs of stones in the bile ducts. These results demonstrate that selective rather than routine peroperative cholangiography should be performed.[Retrograde pancreaticocholangiography in the diagnosis of residual choledocholithiasis].[Endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography performed during the same anesthesia session].To evaluate the feasibility, results and importance of a diagnostic and therapeutic biliary and pancreatic exploration associating endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography during the same anaesthesia session.From November 1997 to October 1998, 179 patients (83 males, 96 females), mean age 62 years (range 22 to 95 years), were investigated in our gastroenterology unit for biliary or pancreatic disorders. Two hundred and sixty two examinations were performed by a single physician for patients under general anaesthesia. In 87 cases (42%), endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was performed immediately without prior endoscopic ultrasonography; these patients were not included. When endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography followed endoscopic ultrasonography, it was performed during the same anaesthesia session.In 118 cases, endoscopic ultrasonography was performed first, followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography 57 times (48%). The sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography was 96.5% and the success of therapeutic endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was 100%. Endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography was necessary for 83% of patients with angiocholitis, 60% with cholestasis, 45% with acute biliary pancreatitis and only 28% with common bile duct stone migration.To decrease the number of anaesthesia sessions, endoscopic ultrasonography--endoscopic retrograde cholangio-pancreatography during same anaesthesia session appears to be particularly interesting for the diagnosis and treatment of biliary and pancreatic disorders, in terms of cost, accuracy, morbidity and patient comfort.Prospective randomized trial of LC+LCBDE vs ERCP/S+LC for common bile duct stone disease.To compare outcome parameters for good-risk patients with classic signs, symptoms, and laboratory and abdominal imaging features of cholecystolithiasis and choledocholithiasis randomized to either laparoscopic cholecystectomy plus laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (LC+LCBDE) or endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography sphincterotomy plus laparoscopic cholecystectomy (ERCP/S+LC).Our study was a prospective trial conducted following written informed consent, with randomization by the serially numbered, opaque envelope technique.Our institution is an academic teaching hospital and the central receiving and trauma center for the City and County of San Francisco, California.We randomized 122 patients (American Society of Anesthesiologists grade 1 or 2) meeting entry criteria. Ten of these patients, excluded from outcome analysis, were protocol violators having signed out of the hospital against medical advice before 1 or both procedures were completed.Treatment was preoperative ERCP/S followed by LC, or LC+LCBDE.The primary outcome measure was efficacy of stone clearance from the common bile duct. Secondary end points were length of hospital stay, cost of index hospitalization, professional fees, hospital charges, morbidity and mortality, and patient acceptance and quality of life scores.The baseline characteristics of the 2 randomized groups were similar. Efficacy of stone clearance was likewise equivalent for both groups. The time from first procedure to discharge was significantly shorter for LC+LCBDE (mean [SD], 55 [45] hours vs 98 [83] hours; P < .001). Hospital service and total charges for index hospitalization were likewise lower for LC+LCBDE, but the differences were not statistically significant. The professional fee charges for LC+LCBDE were significantly lower than those for ERCP/S+LC (median [SD], $4820 [1637] vs $6139 [1583]; P < .001). Patient acceptance and quality of life scores were equivalent for both groups.Both ERCP/S+LC and LC+LCBDE were highly effective in detecting and removing common bile duct stones and were equivalent in overall cost and patient acceptance. However, the overall duration of hospitalization was shorter and physician fees lower for LC+LCBDE.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT00807729.Ultrasonic indications to explore the common bile duct.A prospective comparison between operative cholangiography and operative choledochosonography has been made in 100 patients with cholelithiasis and potential choledocholithiasis. Thirty-one common bile ducts were explored, and 25 of them contained stones. Operative cholangiography was attempted in every case, but technical difficulties prevented examination of 12 common bile ducts, two of which contained stones. Both of these stones were detected by operative ultrasonography. Of the remaining 88 ducts, the sensitivity of the operative cholangiogram was 96% and the specificity 96%. Operative ultrasonography was performed for all 100 patients, with a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 93%. The ultrasonic findings of a sonically dense particle, shadowing, dilatation of the duct, and the persistence and meniscus signs are described with their relative incidence in the 100 patients. The time required for choledochosonography (3 to 5 minutes) compared favorably with the time needed for operative cholangiography (10 to 15 minutes). Operative bile duct scanning is a rapid, reliable technique for detecting the presence of choledocholithiasis at the time of routine cholecystectomy.Role of selective intra-operative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The use of routine intra-operative cholangiography (IOC) remains controversial. This prospective study was carried out to determine whether to perform selective or routine IOC in patients undergoing cholecystectomy for gallstones.All consecutive patients undergoing open cholecystectomy over a 16-month period were included in the present study. They were divided into two groups based on the absence (n = 79) or presence (n = 55) of indicators of choledocholithiasis. All patients were subjected to cholangiography. Each indicator, subsets of indicators and all indicators combined were evaluated for their ability to predict choledocholithiasis.There would be only two missed stones (1.5%) if selective cholangiography was to be practised. Intra-operative cholangiography had a positive predictive value of 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive value (NPV) and accuracy of all the indicators combined were 93.5%, 84.6%, 74.5%, 97.5% and 88.0%, respectively. The best indicators in each subset were jaundice, common bile duct diameter as assessed by ultrasonography, and a palpable stone during surgery with NPV of 82.7%, 91.1% and 96.8%, respectively.Routine IOC during cholecystectomy is not essential for the prevention of retained stones. A combination of the various indicators of choledocholithiasis can be used to select patients for cholangiography.Accuracy of direct cholangiography by endoscopic or transhepatic route in jaundice--a prospective study.An exact anatomic diagnosis of bile-duct obstruction is a prerequisite for selecting the appropriate management. In a prospective study on patients with clinically suspected obstructive jaundice, the results of direct cholangiography--by endoscopic retrograde or, alternatively, by transhepatic route--were compared with operative findings or liver biopsy or both. Final diagnoses were based on autopsy, operative biopsy, and clinical course. The study included 105 patients, 90 of whom underwent surgery, and allowed a blind and independent comparison between cholangiography and operative findings. The predictive value of a positive test, i.e., cholangiographic visualization of obstruction, was 0.99 and the predictive value of a corresponding negative test was 0.90, with the final diagnoses as reference. For the operated patients the predictive values were calculated as to obstruction (positive test 0.99, negative test 0.89), malignancy (positive test 0.92, negative test 0.89), and common duct stones (positive test 0.96, negative test 0.98). Thus, laparotomy can be avoided in patients in whom direct cholangiography shows no obstruction or an appropriate nonoperative procedure, like transhepatic insertion of a stent or endoscopic biliary surgery elected.How reliable is intraoperative cholangiography as a method for detecting common bile duct stones? : A prospective population-based study on 1171 patients.Although intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) is a widely used method for detecting common bile duct stones (CBDS), its accuracy has not been fully evaluated in large nonselected patient samples. The purpose of this study was to assess the sensitivity, specificity and predictive value of dynamic IOC regarding its ability to diagnose CBDS in a population-based setting, and to assess the morbidity associated with the investigation.All patients operated on for gallstone disease between 2003 and 2005 in the county of Uppsala in Sweden, a county with a population of 302,000 in December 2004, were registered prospectively. The outcome of cholangiography was validated against the postoperative clinical course.1171 patients were registered, and among these IOC was performed in 1117 patients (95%). Common bile duct stones were found in 134 patients (11%). One perforation of the common bile duct caused by the IOC catheter was recorded. Sensitivity was 97%, specificity 99%, negative predictive value 99%, positive predictive value 95%, and overall accuracy 99%. In 7 of the 134 cases where IOC indicated CBDS, no stones could be verified on exploration. In 4 of the 979 cases where IOC was normal, the clinical course indicated overlooked CBDS.Intraoperative cholangiography is a safe and accurate method for detecting common bile duct stones.Is intravenous cholangiography an alternative to the routine per-operative cholangiogram?Ultrasonography, although an accurate method of detecting stones within the gall bladder, is unreliable for the detection of bile duct stones for which per-operative cholangiography remains the standard investigation. Fifty seven patients undergoing elective cholecystectomy had both a pre-operative intravenous cholangiogram and per-operative cholangiography. The pre-operative investigation is shown to be at least as effective in the detection of common bile duct stones and only missed a duct stone in one patient. The substitution of pre-operative intravenous cholangiography for routine per-operative cholangiography would result in a significant reduction in operating time, may provide advance knowledge on the biliary anatomy and would allow advance planning of the likely procedure. It is suggested that pre-operative intravenous cholangiography, carried out on the day of admission, should be considered as a preferred alternative investigation to per-operative cholangiography.Role of intraoperative cholangiography in laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The results of a policy of selective cholangiography were assessed in 400 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) was performed in 81 patients (20 per cent) of whom 31 (38 per cent) showed definite or possible evidence of stones in the bile duct. Seventeen of the 400 patients underwent intraoperative cholangiography and the majority of these (12) were normal. After a minimum follow-up of 1 year, 17 patients (4 per cent) have had ERCP for suspected residual duct stones. Eight (2 per cent) of these revealed stones and all were successfully treated with sphincterotomy and duct clearance. Preoperative and postoperative ERCP was not associated with mortality or major morbidity. No major duct injury occurred and none was diagnosed within 2 years of operation. Routine intraoperative cholangiography is not a necessary part of laparoscopic cholecystectomy in the presence of an efficient and safe ERCP service.Follow-up of selective endoscopic ultrasonography and/or endoscopic retrograde cholangiography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective study of 300 patients.This prospective study evaluated the selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC) and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the context of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).Between 1993 and 1998, LC for symptomatic gallstones was indicated in 300 consecutive patients. In order to diagnose and treat choledocholithiasis preoperatively, we performed, on the basis of preoperative criteria, ERC in "high-risk" patients and EUS in "intermediate-risk" patients. Choledocholithiasis was treated by preoperative biliary endoscopic sphincterotomy (BES). LC was performed either after the endoscopic procedure or directly in "low-risk" patients.A total of 104 patients (35%) had 118 preoperative procedures: a) EUS (n = 68; feasibility 100%): choledocholithiasis was observed in 14/68 patients (21%); b) ERC (n = 50; feasibility 94%): 36 ERC were indicated on on preoperative criteria, and 14 on the basis of EUS results. Choledocholithiasis was found in 41/ 50 patients (82%) (13/14 patients with positive EUS), 19% of "intermediate-risk" patients, and 78% of "high-risk" patients; ERC failed in three patients who had no choledocholithiasis on subsequent intraoperative cholangiography (IOC). Clearance of the common bile duct (CBD) was achieved after BES in 41/41 patients. There was no mortality; complications occurred in 4/ 300 patients (1%). No retained stones were found in patients of any of the three groups, after a mean follow-up of 32 months.Combined endoscopic and laparoscopie management of cholecystolithiasis and choledocholithiasis is a viable option and is optimized by the use of EUS.Predictive value and main determinants of abnormal features of intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy.The major issue with intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) is whether its diagnostic accuracy for common bile duct (CBD) stones matches that of other diagnostic procedures, and thus, whether it will become a routine diagnostic procedure. The current study aimed to address the main determinants of CBD stone diagnosis in IOC among an Iranian population.In a retrospective review database-based study conducted in Taleghani Hospital in Tehran between 2006 and 2008, baseline data and perioperative information of 2060 patients (male to female ratio 542:1518, mean age 53.7 years) who were candidates for cholecystectomy and underwent concomitant IOC for confirming CBD stones were reviewed. The predictive power of this procedure for diagnosis of abnormal biliary ducts with the focus on biliary stones was determined.Overall mortality and morbidity following cholecystectomy in the study population were 0.6% and 2.6%, respectively. Both early mortality and morbidity due to cholecystectomy were higher in male than female. The prevalence of CBD stones in IOC was 3.4% (5.2% in male and 2.8% in female, P=0.008). Among those without gallstones, 8.7% had CBD stones and only 3.1% had concomitant gallstones and CBD stones. The main predictors of stone appearance as an abnormal feature of IOC during cholecystectomy were: advanced age (OR=1.022, P=0.001), male gender (OR=1.498, P=0.050), history of abdominal surgery (OR=1.543, P=0.040) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (OR=5.400, P<0.001).IOC is a safe and accurate method for the assessment of bile duct anatomy and stones. Therefore, the routine use of IOC within cholecystectomy seems reasonable and is recommended.Common bile duct stones after laparoscopic cholecystectomy and its treatment. The role of ultrasound and intravenous and intraoperative cholangiography.In the present work we recount our experience in handling common bile duct stones (CBDS) in our first 100 cases of laparoscopic cholecystectomy. In the first 50 cases our diagnostic procedures involved the use of ultrasound exploration and intravenous cholangiotomography 48 h before laparoscopic surgery. We found three cases of residual CBDS. One of the cases was treated by means of ERCP. The other two cases were resolved by carrying out a transparietohepatic cholangiography after the ERCP procedure failed. After this experience, we changed our strategy, introducing the intraoperative cholangiography in the cases with an unclear diagnosis. With this new approach, no residual CBDS occurred in the following 50 cases. These findings demonstrate the following: (1) In our hands, intravenous cholangiography is not more effective than ultrasound exploration in resolving dubious cases. (2) These dubious cases are more effectively diagnosed by means of selective intraoperative cholangiography. (3) When CBDS is treated by transparietohepatic cholangiography it proves to be less uncomfortable for the patient than ERCP and, as we found, even more efficient in removing the stones, although our experience is based on only two cases.[Is it necessary to perform routine intraoperative cholangiography during cholecystectomy?].The intraoperative cholangiography was carried out in 361 patients with gallstone disease. In 293 (81.16%) patients cholangiography was normal, in 68 (18.83%) was abnormal. Thirty-six (9.97%) patients had pre-operative asymptomatic common bile duct calculi and 20 (5.54%) patients had confirmed suspect of common bile duct calculi during cholangiography. Twelve (3.32%) patients were false-positive and one (0.27%) was false-negative. It is discussed the value of routine intraoperative cholangiography in patients with gallstone disease.Laparoscopic ultrasonography is a complement to cholangiography for the detection of choledocholithiasis at laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Intraoperative cholangiography and laparoscopic ultrasonography are both used in the detection of common bile duct stones at laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The aim of this prospective study was to determine whether laparoscopic ultrasonography has an alternative or a complementary role with respect to cholangiography in achieving this end.The biliary trees of 900 patients undergoing laparoscopic cholecystectomy were examined routinely by the two methods. The diagnostic power of each investigation and of the two techniques in combination was evaluated. The statistical non-random concordance between the two methods was also determined.Laparoscopic ultrasonography was performed in all 900 patients. Cholangiography was performed in 762 (85 per cent). The mean (range) duration was 9.8 (4-21) min for laparoscopic ultrasonography and 17.6 (7-42) min for cholangiography. For the detection of common bile duct stones, with a kappa coefficient of 0.57 (95 per cent confidence interval (c.i.) 0.43 to 0.71), the non-random concordance between the two methods was considered to be fair to good. The sensitivity of laparoscopic ultrasonography was 0.80 (95 per cent c.i. 0.65 to 0.91) and its specificity was 0.99 (95 per cent c.i. 0.98 to 1.00). The respective values for cholangiography were 0.75 (95 per cent c.i. 0.59 to 0.87) and 0.99 (95 per cent c.i. 0.98 to 1.00). The examinations combined had a sensitivity of 0.95 (95 per cent c.i. 0.86 to 0.99) and a specificity of 0.98 (95 per cent c.i. 0.96 to 1.00).Laparoscopic ultrasonography and intraoperative cholangiography are complementary, as the combination of both methods maximizes the intraoperative detection of choledocholithiasis.Intraductal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of bile duct stones: when and whom?Biliary intraductal ultrasonography (IDUS) is highly sensitive in visualizing bile duct stones (BDS). Indications for IDUS, however, in cases of suspected BDS have not yet been established. The aim of the present study was to elucidate adequate indications for IDUS in cases that undergo endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) due to suspected BDS.A total of 213 patients who were suspected of having BDS were included in this retrospective study. The patients were divided into two groups: Group A in which BDS was visualized by ERCP; and Group B in which BDS was demonstrated only by IDUS. Comparison between the groups was carried out.ERCP successfully visualized BDS in 166 patients. Forty-seven patients underwent IDUS, which revealed BDS and biliary sludge in 12 and eight patients, respectively. The diameter of the largest stone was 13  6 mm in Group A and 5  1 mm in Group B (P < 0.001). The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of ERCP in the diagnosis of BDS were 93%, 100%, and 94%, respectively. The sensitivity was influenced by the size of BDS: 100% in cases of stones  8 mm in size, but 74% in those with stones < 8 mm. In cases with stones < 8 mm, the sensitivity was significantly affected by the bile duct diameter ( 12 mm vs < 12 mm, P < 0.05). When ERCP fails to visualize stones in patients with suspected BDS, IDUS is recommended, especially in those with a bile duct  12 mm in diameter.Echo-endoscopy versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiography for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis: the influence of the size of the stone and diameter of the common bile duct.Endoscopic retrograde cholangiography is highly accurate in diagnosing choledocholithiasis, but it is the most invasive of the available methods. Endoscopic ultrasonography is a very accurate test for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis with a risk of complications similar to that of upper gastrointestinal endoscopy.To compare the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography in the diagnosis of common bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy and to analyze endoscopic ultrasound results according to stone size and common bile duct diameter.Two hundred and fifteen patients with symptomatic gallstones were admitted for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Sixty-eight of them (31.7%) had a dilated common bile duct and/or hepatic biochemical parameter abnormalities. They were submitted to endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography. Sphincterotomy and sweeping of the common bile duct were performed if endoscopic ultrasonography or endoscopic retrograde cholangiography were considered positive for choledocholithiasis. After sphincterotomy and common bile duct clearance the largest stone was retrieved for measurement. Endoscopic or surgical explorations of the common bile duct were considered the gold-standard methods for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.All 68 patients were submitted to laparoscopic cholecystectomy with intraoperative cholangiography with confirmation of the presence of gallstones. Endoscopic ultrasonography was a more sensitivity test than endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (97% vs. 67%) for the detection of choledocholithiasis. When stones >4.0 mm were analyzed, endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography presented similar results (96% vs. 90%). Neither the size of the stone nor the common bile duct diameter had influence on endoscopic ultrasonographic performance.For a group of patients with an intermediate or moderate risk with respect to the likelihood of having common bile duct stones, endoscopic ultrasonography is a better test for the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis when compared to endoscopic retrograde cholangiography mainly for small-sized calculi.Cholecystectomy without operative cholangiography. Implications for common bile duct injury and retained common bile duct stones.This study evaluated the selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the context of laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC) while minimizing the use of operative cholangiography.There has been a long-standing debate between routine and selective operative cholangiography that has resurfaced with LC.Prospective data were collected on the first 1300 patients undergoing LC at McGill University. Preoperative indications for ERCP were recorded, radiologic findings were standardized, and technical points for a safe LC were emphasized.A total of 106 patients underwent 127 preoperative ERCPs. Fifty patients were found to have choledocholithiasis (3.8%), and clearance of the common bile duct (CBD) with endoscopic sphincterotomy was achieved in 45 patients. The other five patients underwent open cholecystectomy with common duct exploration. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOC) was attempted in only 54 patients (4.2%), 6 of whom demonstrated choledocholithiasis. Forty-nine postoperative ERCPs were performed in 33 patients and stones were detected in 17 (1.3%), with a median follow-up time of 22 months. Endoscopic duct clearance was successful in all of these. The incidence of CBD injury was 0.38%, and a policy of routine operative cholangiography might only have led to earlier recognition of duct injury in one case. The rate of complication for all ERCPs was 9% and the associated median duration of the hospital stay was 4 days. The median duration of the hospital stay after open CBD exploration was 13 days.LC can be performed safely without routine IOC. The selective use of preoperative and postoperative ERCP will clear the CBD of stones in 92.5% of patients.The detection of bile duct stones in suspected biliary pancreatitis: comparison of MRCP, ERCP, and intraductal US.Early ERCP and endoscopic sphincterotomy for stone extraction can benefit the prognosis in patients with severe biliary pancreatitis, but are associated with complications. The ability to identify choledocholithiasis by noninvasive means in biliary pancreatitis is limited. The aim of this study was evaluation of the ability of MRCP to detect choledocholithiasis in patients with acute biliary pancreatitis. In addition, we investigated whether intraductal US (IDUS) could help manage these patients.Thirty-two patients with suspected biliary pancreatitis were studied prospectively. MRCP was performed immediately before ERCP by separate blinded examiners within 24 h of admission. Wire-guided IDUS was performed during ERCP within 72 h of admission, regardless of the results of MRCP. Using endoscopic extraction of a stone as the reference standard, the diagnostic yield of MRCP was compared with transabdominal US, CT, ERCP, and IDUS.The sensitivity of US, CT, MRCP, ERCP, and IDUS for identifying choledocholithiasis was 20.0%, 40.0%, 80.0%, 90.0%, and 95.0%, respectively. The overall agreement between MRCP and ERCP was 90.6% for choledocholithiasis (kappa= 0.808, p < 0.01). The sensitivity of MRCP for detecting choledocholithiasis decreased with dilated bile ducts (bile duct diameter > 10 mm, 72.7% vs 88.9%). The combination of ERCP and IDUS improved accuracy in the diagnosis of choledocholithiasis.MRCP can be used to select patients with biliary pancreatitis who require ERCP. IDUS may be applied in the management of biliary pancreatitis if ERCP is performed.Operative cholangiography: a perspective.Two hundred and eighty-seven patients having operative cholangiograms were identified from a prospective study of 346 patients undergoing surgery for gallstones. Forty-two patients (14.6%) had filling defects and bile duct (BD) exploration. The false-positive exploration rate was 2.8%. Eight patients (2.8%) had unexpected BD calculi with no abnormality in pre-operative liver function tests or ultrasound. If a policy of selective operative cholangiography is pursued, then failure to detect a small number of duct stones must be expected, although unnecessary duct exploration is likely to be eliminated. The clinical significance of undetected BD calculi remains debatable.Must ERCP Be routinely performed if choledocholithiasis is suspected?To evaluate the results of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the diagnosis and treatment of those patients suspected of harboring bile duct stones before laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC).A total of 1,235 consecutive LCs performed between 1991 and 1997 were studied prospectively. ERCP was performed to explore the common bile duct (CBD) preoperatively when choledocholithiasis was suspected on the basis of clinical, analytical or echographical data.ERCPs were performed in 268 patients: unsuccessful CBD evaluation in 3%; dilated CBD without lithiasis in 13%, and normal exploration in 37% (99 patients). CBD stones were found in 46% (124 patients), and endoscopic sphincterotomy was then performed and stone extraction attempted. Endoscopic therapy achieved 92.8% successful removal of CBD stones (115 patients). There was no ERCP-related mortality and the morbidity rate was 6%. Retained CBD stones have been observed in 7 cases after ERCP-LC; all of them have been successfully treated by ERCP.A combined approach to bile duct stones with selective use of ERCP followed by LC is a good therapeutical alternative. Nevertheless, the usual selection criteria for ERCP may lead to unnecessary exploration. It appears to be necessary to modify the current diagnostic and therapeutic strategy.EUS versus endoscopic retrograde cholangiography for patients with intermediate probability of bile duct stones: a prospective randomized trial.Factors affecting diagnostic accuracy and comparison of patients in the follow-up period for negative outcomes are not thoroughly investigated in a randomized trial.Our purpose was to compare diagnostic accuracy, complications, and number of interventions.Prospective, unicentric, single-blind, randomized study.Single tertiary referral university hospital.One hundred twenty patients with intermediate risk for common bile duct (CBD) stones were randomized to either an EUS-first, endoscopic retrograde cholangiography (ERC)-second (n = 60) versus an ERC-only (n = 60) procedure.EUS, ERC, sphincterotomy, and balloon sweeping of CBD when needed.Sensitivity of EUS versus ERC, factors affecting diagnostic capability, complications, total number of endoscopic procedures.The sensitivity and specificity of ERC were 75% (95% CI, 42%-93%) and 100% (95% CI, 95%-100%), respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS were 91% (95% CI, 59%-99%) and 100% (95% CI, 95%-100%), respectively. EUS is more sensitive than ERC in detecting stones smaller than 4 mm (90% vs 23%, P < .01). Although not significant, there was a trend for an increased number of endoscopic procedures in the ERC group compared with the EUS group (98 vs 83). The post-ERC pancreatitis rate was 6 in 120 (5%) in all study patients, and the post-ERC pancreatitis rate in patients with an undilated CBD was 5 of 53 (9.43%). The independent factors for post-ERC pancreatitis are undilated CBD (risk ratio [RR] 6.320; 95% CI, 1.703-11.524, P = .009), allocation into the ERC group (RR 2.107; 95% CI, 1.330-3.339, P = .02), female sex (RR 1.803; 95% CI, 1.155-2.813, P = .03), and age less than 40 years (RR 1.888; 95% CI, 1.245-2.863, P = .01). Kaplan-Meier analysis revealed higher rate of negative outcome in the ERC group than in the EUS group (P = .049, log-rank test).The EUS-first approach is not associated with further risk for subsequent endoscopic procedures. Patients with an undilated CBD should be investigated by the EUS-first approach to prevent post-ERC pancreatitis.Intraoperative ultrasonography versus cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomy: a prospective comparative study.The purpose of this study was to compare the functional utility of intraoperative ultrasonography (IOUS) and cholangiography (IOC) during a laparoscopic cholecystectomy for the treatment of gallstone disease.A prospective study comparing IOUS and IOC was carried out in 65 patients. Intraoperative ultrasonography was conducted first using a 7.5-MHz linear array probe. After IOUS, IOC was then conducted in all patients. The respective usefulness of IOUS and IOC in the identification of gallstones, detection of hepatobiliary structures, and demonstration of congenital anomalies was then compared.Intraoperative ultrasonography was successful in all 65 patients, and IOC was successful only in 54. The time required for IOUS was significantly shorter (p < 0.0001) than for IOC. Intraoperative ultrasonography imaged the hepatic ducts and their confluence, the common hepatic duct, the common bile duct, and the ampulla of Vater in 97, 100, 97, and 51% of cases, respectively. Intraoperative cholangiography, on the other hand, depicted these structures in 85, 89, 100, and 94% of cases, respectively. Intraoperative ultrasonography demonstrated the cystic duct and its confluence in 94% of cases. Biliary anomalies were identified by IOUS in 12 patients and by IOC in 13. Intraoperative ultrasonography could detect the hilar vascular structures in most patients and visualized anomalies of the hepatic arteries in 5 patients. In this series, 5 patients had choledocholithiasis. The sensitivities, specificities, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracies in identifying these bile duct stones were 80, 98, 80, 98, and 97% by IOUS, and 80, 97, 67, 98, and 95% by IOC, respectively.Intraoperative ultrasonography is superior to cholangiography with respect to its safety, shorter examination period, and ease of administration in all patients. In addition, IOUS is also better for identifying subtle anatomic detail. Intraoperative ultrasonography compares favorably with IOC in terms of utility in exploring bile ducts for stones. Intraoperative ultrasonography is an effective procedure for biliary exploration during a laparoscopic cholecystectomy.Endoscopic sphincterotomy in 100 patients scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy: ultrasound evaluation.The aim of the study was to determine to what extent ultrasonography may monitor the process of sphincterotomy and its effectiveness. The study also aimed at determining the sensitivity and specificity of ultrasonography in detecting choledocholithiasis, in comparison with the results of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.Between January 1995 and June 2001, endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed on 100 patients with suspected synchronous choledocholithiasis in preparation for laparoscopic cholecystectomy. The main parameters evaluated in the ultrasonography image included the breadth of the common bile duct and absence or presence of concrements in bile ducts before and after sphincterotomy.Applied before the endoscopic operation, ultrasonography revealed choledocholithiasis in 58 patients and dilatation of the common bile duct in 95 patients. Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography confirmed choledocholithiasis in 74 patients, after sphincterotomy concrements were removed in 63 persons. In 26 patients sphincterotomy was performed for stenosis of Vater's papilla. Patients with the breadth of the duct > 10 mm, were referred to a check-up examination.Compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, ultrasonography correctly specifies the breadth of the bile duct and properly monitors the process of endoscopic sphincterotomy, but is less accurate in determining the occurrence of choledocholithiasis, and sensitivity in the test amounted to 73%, and specificity of the examination--84.5%.Comparison of cholangiography and ultrasonography in the operative screening of the common bile duct.A prospective evaluation of the diagnostic work-up before laparoscopic cholecystectomy.A prerequisite for successful laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the exclusion of potential risks such as cholangiolithiasis or anatomical malformations. As there is no general agreement regarding the appropriate preoperative diagnostic work-up, a comparative study of different diagnostic methods was carried out.In 180 consecutive patients admitted to a community hospital for cholecystectomy due to symptomatic cholecystolithiasis, a prospective comparison was carried out of the diagnostic accuracy of patient history, physical examination, laboratory tests, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, intravenous cholangiography, ultrasonography, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP).Measurement of the diameter of the common bile duct was found to be a reliable method as a single noninvasive parameter for diagnosing cholangiolithiasis (sensitivity 100%, specificity 93%), with good predictive power (positive predictive value 0.7, negative predictive value 1.0). The best accuracy achieved noninvasively and without sonography was with a combination of positive patient history and gamma-glutamyl transferase findings (sensitivity 58%, specificity 84%, positive predictive value 0.37, negative predictive value 0.93). ERCP detected additional cholangiolithiasis in 19 of 139 patients (13.7%) and anatomical malformations in three patients. In all 19 patients, the bile ducts were cleared of stones endoscopically within 24 hours, prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy. Among the 163 patients primarily assigned to laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the protocol diagnostic work-up, including ERCP, allocated three patients (1.8%) to open surgery. Conversion from laparoscopic cholecystectomy to open cholecystectomy occurred in a further two of 158 patients (1.3%).These results show that routine ultrasonography prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be recommended in order to determine the diameter of the common bile duct. In patients with a ductal diameter of more than 6 mm, ERCP should be performed. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be carried out within 24 hours after ERCP and papillotomy.Evaluation of perioperative cholangiography in one thousand laparoscopic cholecystectomies.We analyzed a teaching institution's experience with intra-operative cholangiography (IOCG) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) and established an algorithm for their timing and use. The records of all patients undergoing LC during a five year period were reviewed. Patients with a history of jaundice or pancreatitis, abnormal bilirubin, alkaline phosphatase, serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase, or radiographic evidence suggestive of choledocholithiasis were considered "at risk" for common bile duct stones (CBDS). The remaining patients were considered to be at low "risk." LC was attempted on 1002 patients during the study period and successfully completed on 941 (94% of the time). The major complication rate was 3.1% and the common bile duct injury rate 0.1%. Eighty eight (9.5%) patients underwent ERCP, 67 in the preoperative period and 19 in the postoperative period. IOCG was attempted in 272 (24%) patients and completed in 234 for a success rate of 86%. Intraoperative cholangiography (IOCG) and preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) were equivalent in the detection of CBDSs Twelve of the 21 patients (57%) with IOCG positive for stones underwent successful laparoscopic clearance of the common duct, and did not require postop. ERCP. No patients were converted to an open procedure for common bile duct exploration. Because postoperative ERCP was 100% successful in clearing the common duct, reoperation for retained common bile duct stones was not necessary. IOCG is an alternative procedure to ERCP for patients at risk with biochemical, radiological, or clinical evidence of choledocholithiasis. The incidence of CBDS in low-risk patients is 1.7%, a risk that does not warrant routine cholangiography. Preoperative ERCP is recommended in cases of cholangitis unresponsive to antibiotics, suspicion of carcinoma, and biliary pancreatitis unresponsive to supportive care. Although IOCG leads to a similar percentage of nontherapeutic studies as preoperative ERCP, it often allows for one procedure therapy.Selective per-operative cholangiography and scoring method for selection.A prospective clinical study was undertaken over a period of 3 years on a series of 210 consecutive cases of gall stones to review a selective policy for per-operative cholangiography (PC). All patients had elective cholecystectomy and routine PC. A scoring method (SM) based on pre and per-operative surgical criteria was adopted to determine the necessity of PC before this was attempted. The study revealed that PC was indicated in 64 cases (30.5%) only. Of these 64 patients 20 had abnormal cholangiograms of which 18 proved positive on exploration. There were two false positive results (0.95%) of PC but no false negative result. Of 146 patients (69.5%) not clinically indicated for routine PC, 145 had normal cholangiograms and one had a small (5 mm diameter) silent stone (0.47%) in the Common Bile Duct (CBD). The scoring method failed to predict this case of silent stone. PC was technically unsatisfactory in 4 cases (1.9%). Thus by adopting the selective policy X-rays could have been avoided in 69.5% cases in which only a small silent stone would have been overlooked. However, this stone could have passed into the duodenum spontaneously or else it could have been removed by endoscopic sphincterotomy had it caused any symptoms. It is concluded that routine PC is not always necessary, a selective policy may be preferred and a scoring method may be used as a guide for selection of the cases.[Ultrasonics and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography. Correlation in biliopancreatic pathology].[Comparison of laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography during laparoscopic cholecystectomies. Results of a prospective study].Prospective evaluation of the results of laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography to investigate choledocholithiasis and detect variations in biliary anatomy during laparoscopic cholecystectomies.The biliary trees of 600 patients who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy were routinely explored by laparoscopic ultrasound and cholangiography.Laparoscopic ultrasound was performed in all 600 cases. Cholangiography was performed in 498 (83%). Laparoscopic ultrasound required less time than cholangiography: 10.2 minutes versus 17.9 minutes (P=0.0001). Common bile duct stones were detected intraoperatively in 40 cases (7%). Both methods were equally effective. The sensitivity of laparoscopic ultrasound was 80% and its specificity 99%. For cholangiography these values were 75% and 98% respectively. For laparoscopic ultrasound, false positives and false negatives were noted in the first 45 cases of individual trainees. Nevertheless, cholangiography showed 30 anatomical anomalies and laparoscopic ultrasound only 15.Laparoscopic ultrasound can be performed rapidly and in all cases. Results are comparable to cholangiography in the detection of common duct stones. Individual training is necessary to optimize efficacy. Anatomical anomalies are often missed.Comparison of CT duodeno-cholangiopancreatography to ERCP for assessing biliary obstruction.The authors have developed a CT protocol, CT duodeno-cholangiopancreatography (CDCP), which is performed during a single contrast-enhanced phase, proceeding cranially, allowing enhancement of the pancreas during its parenchymal phase followed by enhancement of the liver during its portal-venous phase. This retrospective pilot study evaluates CDCP compared with endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) as a diagnostic tool for assessing the cause and level of biliary obstruction. Forty-one patients with jaundice underwent CDCP and ERCP between October 2002 and May 2004. Pathologic confirmation was obtained in 31 of the 41 (76%) patients. The sensitivity, specificity, and kappa values of CDCP and ERCP compared with pathology were calculated for tumors and stones. Pathology-proven cases included 7 cases of stones, 23 tumors, and 1 other cause of obstruction. The overall level of agreement of diagnoses between CDCP and pathology was 29 of 31 (93.5%); that between CDCP and ERCP was 36 of 41 (88%). Comparing CDCP to pathology for tumors, the sensitivity was 100%, the specificity was 89%, and the kappa was 0.92 (95% CI 0.76-1.0). For stone detection, CDCP had a sensitivity of 86%, a specificity of 100%, and a kappa value of 0.90 (95% CI 0.72-1.0). For level of obstruction of the common bile duct, comparing CDCP to ERCP, observations agreed in 31 of the 36 (86%) cases; for the pancreatic duct, observations agreed in 24 of the 25 (96%) cases. CDCP is a noninvasive diagnostic tool that can be used to assess the cause and level of obstruction. A blinded prospective study would be valuable to further assess the merits of CDCP.Intraoperative imaging of the biliary tree. Sonography vs. operative cholangiography.The accepted technique for diagnosing choledocholithiasis at the time of cholecystectomy is operative cholangiography. Reports in the surgical literature suggest that intraoperative ultrasound can replace operative cholangiography in the accurate detection of common duct stones. This prospective study was performed jointly by radiologists and surgeons together in the operating room. Twenty-one patients underwent intraoperative ultrasonography and operative cholangiography at the time of cholecystectomy. In the 16 cases in which both studies were adequate, there were 11 in which no stones were seen on either; three in which stones were seen on both; and two in which stones were diagnosed by sonography alone. In one of these latter cases, the stones were confirmed, making the cholangiogram falsely negative. In the other case, no stones were found so we presume that sonography was falsely positive. Although this technique can be accurate and useful, it is technically demanding, even for an experienced sonologist. We feel that this technique is likely to be of benefit only to the surgeon with considerable ultrasound training, expertise, and motivation.Laparoscopic management of common bile duct stones. A multi-institutional SAGES study. Society of American Gastrointestinal Endoscopic Surgeons.Laparoscopic common bile duct exploration (CBDE) was the subject of a multi-institutional study on 226 patients from 19 major hospital centers. Female patients predominated (2.3:1); the average age was 54; 75% of cases were chronic, and the remainder were acute. Although 97% had preoperative ultrasonograms, only 12% showed a stone in the dilated common bile duct. The alkaline phosphatase was elevated in 41% and the serum bilirubin in 28% of cases. Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiography with sphincterotomy (ERC-ES) was performed in 8.5%; there was a successful stone extraction in less than half the cases. Cholangiography was performed in 99.5%, and in 94% of those cases, stones were found. In 83% of cases, stones were removed through the transcystic approach, and in 17% removal was throughout the CBD. In the majority of cases, the choledochoscope and wire basket (34%), irrigation (33%), or a combination of both was employed. In the transcystic group, 5% were converted to open procedures due to technical difficulty, as contrasted with the trans-CBD route, where the conversion rate was 19%. There were two ductal injuries. Minor complications occurred in 5.7% within 24 h; there was one death (0.4%). Within 30 days, the morbidity rate was 7% and there were no deaths. Retained stones were discovered in 2.6% of cases. Laparoscopic CBDE is a feasible approach for CBD stones which permits a definitive procedure in one stage, without pre- or postoperative ES. It is a skill which should be mastered by the biliary surgeon. Further improvement in instrumentation and technique should make the laparoscopic approach not only comparable but preferable to the standard open choledocholithotomy.Routine magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and intra-operative cholangiogram in the evaluation of common bile duct stones.Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) is a safe and sensitive investigation for the imaging of common bile duct pathology. When used to exclude common bile duct (CBD) stones, MRCP may obviate the need for intra-operative cholangiogram (IOC). In this prospective study, we looked at the single centre results of patients who underwent cholecystectomy with IOC following pre-operative MRCP.Over a period of 18 months, 69 patients (24 male and 45 female; mean age 59 years [range, 19-86 years]) were investigated by MRCP prior to cholecystectomy. All patients underwent IOC. Inclusion criteria for MRCP consisted of derangement of liver function tests and/or history of jaundice in cases of ultrasound-proven cholelithiasis.Sixteen patients had suspected stones or filling defects on MRCP; all but two of these were confirmed to be stones on IOC. In only one patient was a stone visualised on IOC and not seen on MRCP.MRCP may be the only pre-operative investigation needed for exclusion of CBD stones, obviating the necessity for IOC.Diagnosis of choledocholithiasis. Relations between historical, laboratory, operative, and peroperative roentgen data.Operative cholangiography: a reappraisal based on a review of 400 cholangiograms.In the period 1957-72, 426 patients were operated upon for calculous disease of the biliary tract. For various reasons pre-exploratory operative cholangiography was not performed in 26 patients, but in the remaining 400 patients this examination was the major determinant as to whether or not the common duct contained calculi, and hence required exploration. Analysis of this series of 400 patients shows that without operative cholangiography (a) ductal stones would have been overlooked in 16 of the 78 patients with stones in the common duct (4 per cent of the whole series; 20-5 per cent of those with stones in the common bile duct); (b) exploration of the common duct would have been required in a further 48 (15 per cent) of the 322 patients without stones in the common duct, giving a positive yield from operative cholangiography in 64 patients (16 per cent) in the whole series. Negative exploration of the common duct was performed in only 31 patients, that is 29 per cent of the patients whose duct was explored but only 7-8 per cent of the whole group. The criteria by which an operative cholangiogram should be assessed were re-evaluated in the light of the findings in these 400 patients. In general the criteria of normality previously described were affirmed, and the following points established: a. In the absence of a filling defect the diameter of the duct is the most important indication of the presence of a stone. b. There is a statistically significant increase in the diameter of the common duct with age, and though not great this could, if neglected, give rise to error in the interpretation of the cholangiogram in younger patients. c. Even within the overall normal range of duct diameter (less than 12 mm) the wider the duct, the greater is the chance of it harbouring a stone. d. Impaired flow of contrast material into the duodenum is significantly related to duct diameter. e. Impaired flow of contrast material into the duodenum and failure to delineate the terminal segment of the duct tend to occur together; they may occur in a duct free of stones and if they are the only abnormality the examination should be repeated after the inhalation of amyl nitrite. This study confirms that operative cholangiography is the most accurate method at present available of determining whether or not the common duct contains a stone (or stones), and hence requires exploration.Selective use of preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in the era of laparoscopic cholecystectomy.The use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in the management of suspected common bile duct (CBD) stones prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy is common. The associated morbidity can be significant. The present study determines significant predictors of CBD stones and improves the selection of patients for preoperative ERCP.All preoperative ERCP for suspected CBD stones in the year 1998 were studied retrospectively. Univariate and multivariate analyses of a number of clinical, biochemical and radiological variables were carried out to determine the best predictors of CBD stones.A total of 112 patients had successful preoperative ERCP. Sixty-one per cent of these were negative for stones and the morbidity was 9%. Univariate analysis revealed the following variables as predictors: cholangitis (P = 0.006), abnormal serum bilirubin > or = 3 days (P = 0.002), serum alkaline phosphatase > or = 130 U/L (P = 0.002), deranged liver function tests (P = < 0.001) and CBD diameter > or = 8 mm (P = 0.009) with positive predictive values of 80%, 68%, 49%, 38% and 52%, respectively. Multivariate analysis revealed the model with the best ability to discriminate for CBD stones (P = 0.0005) was cholangitis, abnormal serum bilirubin for > or = 3 days and CBD diameter > or = 8 mm. The best predictors from this study had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 27%.The predictors of CBD stones are imprecise. Until laparoscopic exploration of CBD becomes widely available, ERCP prior to cholecystectomy will remain popular. The use of stricter selection criteria can reduce the number of negative preoperative ERCP.[Retrospective evaluation of 500 endoscopic cholangiopancreatographies performed at the Instituto Nacional de la Nutricin "Salvador Zubiran"].We evaluated 500 endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatographies (ERCP) performed on 422 patients during a 5-year period in the Gastrointestinal Endoscopy Department, Instituto Nacional de la Nutricin Salvador Zubirn, Mxico, D.F. ERCP combines endoscopic and radiologic techniques in order to obtain high quality opacification of pancreatic and biliary ducts. The rate of success for cannulation was 90%; desired duct opacification was possible in 89%. The most frequent indication for ERCP was to establish the differential diagnosis for jaundice; biliary stones in the common bile duct was the most frequent diagnosis, followed by normal biliary ducts. Pancreatography was normal in 74% of patients. ERCP complications were detected in 5.6%; fever and transient pain was the most common complaint in 1.6%. Mortality attributable to the procedure was 0.8%. From histological corroboration of cases by surgery or postmortem studies, diagnostic sensitivity was 92%, specificity 76%, positive predictive value 96% and a prevalence of 89%. We conclude that ERCP is highly sensitive and specific in diagnosing bilio-pancreatic-duodenal disease. Our results are comparable to other's experiences published throughout the world.Selective use of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography to facilitate laparoscopic cholecystectomy without cholangiography. A review of 1139 consecutive cases.The aim of this study was to show that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography.We performed a retrospective analysis of 1139 consecutive patients (376 men and 763 women with an average age of 51.4 years) who underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy between 1991 and 1999. In all, 227 patients (20%) were selected to undergo preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) on the basis of four criteria for risk of stones.ERCP allowed us to make a diagnosis of biliary stones in 53.3% of the selected patients. Extraction of the stones was successful in 97% of the cases. In 14% of cases, ERCP was normal; in 32.7%, some useful diagnostic information was obtained. There were three complications (pancreatitis) following endoscopy (complication rate, 1.3%). Laparoscopic cholecystectomy was successful in 92% of patients. The postoperative morbidity rate was 3.2% (major complications, 0.5%). There were no deaths. During a follow-up period ranging from 3 to 97 months, six patients (0.6%) were found to have residual biliary stones.This study confirms the hypothesis that laparoscopic cholecystectomy can be performed safely without routine intraoperative cholangiography.Preoperative endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography: therapeutic impact in a general population of patients needing a cholecystectomy.The place of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) before open or laparoscopic cholecystectomy remains controversial. Most of the reports study highly selected series of patients and therefore do not give a survey of the actual situation in a general population. We describe here the therapeutic impact of preoperative ERCP in a continuous cohort of patients needing a cholecystectomy.Data concerning a 2-year continuous and unselected series of 452 patients undergoing cholecystectomy were evaluated.Two hundred ninety-three patients (65%) presented with a chronic symptomatic biliary lithiasis and 159 patients (35%) with a complicated biliary lithiasis. A preoperative ERCP was performed in 206 patients, all presenting with a suspicion of associated lithiasis of the common bile duct (CBD). An endoscopic sphincterotomy was performed in 106 patients: 44 patients presented with CBD stones (9.7%), all successfully cleared by endoscopy. Laparoscopic cholecystectomy has been attempted in 367 patients (81%) and successfully performed in 333 patients (74%). Laparotomy as a first-choice procedure was performed in 85 patients (19%). Surgical choledochotomy was never performed. Postoperative ERCP was needed in 4 patients (0.88%) and in only 1 of them for a retained CBD stone (0.22%).In a continuous series of patients needing a cholecystectomy, preoperative ERCP was performed on the basis of suspected CBD disorders. It allows CBD stone detection and extraction in almost 10% of the patients and avoids peroperative CBD exploration, with a very low rate of retained stones after surgery. The association of preoperative ERCP with subsequent laparoscopic cholecystectomy (when feasible) offers the patient a quick recovery and a short hospital stay.[Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography--a 4-year retrospective study].Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) may lead to serious complications. Recently, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) has been introduced as a diagnostic alternative to ERCP. This study was initiated to document the diagnostic and therapeutic capabilities of ERCP, enabling us to compare the two techniques. Results of 567 ERCP procedures in 371 patients were reviewed. Bile duct stones were the most frequent indication for the procedure (66%). Normal duct systems (37%) and common bile duct stones (35%) were the most frequent findings. Stone extraction was performed in 97 patients. In 18 patients minor stones were left behind and in six patients open choledocholithotomy was performed. Procedure related mortality was 0.3% and 0.8% in the diagnostic and therapeutic group respectively. Five patients developed serious pancreatitis, and duodenal perforation complicated two procedures. 56% of the procedures were diagnostic and could probably have been replaced by MRCP if this technique had been available during the study period.The role of endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in management of patients recovering from acute biliary pancreatitis in the laparoscopic era.Traditionally an episode of acute biliary pancreatitis (ABP) is an indication for direct imaging of the biliary tree. The optimal approach may vary according to local expertise, and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) is the most common. The fact that the incidence of choledocholithiasis in patients recovering from ABP varies between 3 and 33% raises a question about the necessity of visualizing the biliary tree in all patients recovering from ABP.In order to evaluate this policy, we reviewed 48 ERCPs performed on patients recovering from ABP who were scheduled for laparoscopic cholecystectomy (LC). We checked the correlations between ERCP findings and the severity of pancreatitis, biochemistry values (which were sampled during the acute phase), and ultrasonographic (US) findings.The ERCP demonstrated common bile duct (CBD) stones in 11 (22.9%) patients. US finding of a dilated CBD and maximal aspartate transaminase (AST) values higher than 90 units/l were significantly correlated with CBD stones (a relative risk [RR] of 2.95 with a 95% confidence interval [CI] for a dilated CBD and RR of 3.89 with a 95% CI of 1.18-12.80 for an AST value higher than 90 units/l). No other parameters were significantly correlated with CBD stones.We, therefore, recommend performing a preoperative ERCP only on patients who present with an ultrasonographic finding of CBD dilatation. The correlation to high AST is still to be proven.[Laparoscopic cholecystectomy and lithiasis of the common bile duct: prospective study on the importance of preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiography].Laparoscopic cholecystectomy is the standard treatment of symptomatic gallstones. At present, no consensus has been reached on the diagnostic and therapeutic methods of concomitant common bile duct stones. Systematic preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography followed, if necessary, by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy during the same anesthetic procedure could be a diagnostic and therapeutic alternative for common bile duct stones making possible a laparoscopic cholecystectomy without intraoperative investigation of the common bile duct.One hundred and twenty-five patients underwent a prospective endoscopic ultrasonographic evaluation prior to laparoscopic cholecystectomy for symptomatic gallstones. Fourty-four patients (35%) had at least one predictive factor for common bile duct stones. Endoscopic ultrasonography and cholecystectomy were performed on the same day. Endoscopic ultrasonography was followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy by the same endoscopist in case of common bile duct stones on endoscopic ultrasonography. Patients were routinely followed up between 3 and 6 months and one year after cholecystectomy.Endoscopic ultrasonography suggested common bile duct stones in 21 patients (17%). Endoscopic ultrasonography identified a stone in 17 of 44 patients (38.6%) with predictor of common bile duct stones and only in 4 of 81 patients (4.9%) without predictor of common bile duct stone. Among these 21 patients, one patient was not investigated with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography because of the high risk of sphincterotomy, 19 patients had a stone removed after sphincterotomy, one patient had no visible stone neither on endoscopic retrograde cholangiography, nor on exploration of the common bile duct after sphincterotomy. Endoscopic ultrasonography was normal in 104 patients (83%). However, two patients in this group were investigated with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography because endoscopic ultrasonography was incomplete in one case and because endoscopic ultrasonography was normal in the second case but a stone in the left hepatic duct was detected by ultrasonography. A stone was removed after endoscopic sphincterotomy in these two patients. In the group of 102 patients without stone, 91 out of 92, continued to be asymptomatic during a median follow-up of 8.5 months. One patient with symptoms one month after cholecystectomy underwent endoscopic sphincterotomy but no stone was found.Systematic preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography followed, if necessary with endoscopic retrograde cholangiography and sphincterotomy is a diagnostic and therapeutic alternative for common bile duct stones making possible a laparoscopic cholecystectomy without intraoperative investigation of the common bile duct for all patients. This alternative is only justifiable in patients with predictor of common bile duct stones.[Comparative study of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography in common duct stones].To compare the diagnostic value study the technique of ultrasonography, magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP) in common duct stones.Three hundreds and eighty-four patients suspected common duct stones from August 2005 to October 2007 were undergone abdominal ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP.There was stone in common duct in 370 and no stones in 14 of 384 patients. Ultrasonography indicated stones 268 cases, 8 false positive result was among them. MRCP diagnosed stones in 362 cases and false positive result in 6 cases, ERCP diagnosed stones 370 cases. The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography, MRCP and ERCP was 70.3% (260/370), 96.2% (356/370) and 100% respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of ultrasonography for common duct stone was little higher, US should be used as a primary checking method. There was higher concordance between MRCP and ERCP for common duct stone. Combination of MRCP and ERCP can improve diagnostic accuracy of common duct stone.Comparison of operative ultrasonography and radiography in screening of the common bile duct for calculi.